 HEADNOTE CRIMINAL LAW Criminal Procedure Code 1973 Section 31 Conviction under Section 381 IPC and Section 52 Post Office Act 1898 Theft of a registered insured parcel containing Gold Chain Chief Judicial magistrate while awarding sentences under the two Acts not mentioning whether they were to run concurrently or consecutively Revision dismissed by High Court Plea that court should invoke the power under Section 31 CrPC and allow sentences to run concurrently as both the offences were tried in one trial and arose out of one act theft Appellant 61 years old suffering from heart ailment Lost job Incident of year 1993 Gold chain recovered and handed out to owner. Held on facts sentences to run concurrently. Sawal Das s case relied upon. HELD This is a fit case where we can direct the sentences awarded to the appellant to run concurrently for the reasons that firstly the case out of which this appeal arises relates to the year 1993 and is pending for a long period of 21 years secondly the two sentences which were imposed on the appellant arose out of one offence of theft punishable under Section 381 IPC tried in one trial thirdly the provisions of Section 52 of the IPO Act were required to be invoked against the appellant because he was the postal employee fourthly the Gold Chain was long recovered and also handed over to the person concerned fifthly the appellant has already been dismissed from services due to impugned conviction and lastly the appellant has been suffering from heart ailment since long as is proved by documents filed along with the appellant s affidavit 03.11.2014. Para 21 CASES REFERRED 1.Manoj Panu v. State of Haryana JT 2013 15 SC 384 Para 19 2.State of Punjab v. Madan Lal JT 2009 3 SC 326 Para 19 3.Chatar Singh v. State of M.P. 2006 12 SCC 37 Para 19 4.State of Maharashtra Anr. v. Najakat Alia Mubarak Ali JT 2001 Suppl.1 SC 279 Para 18 5.Mohd. Akhtar Hussain Ibrahim Ahmed Bhatti v. Assistant Collector of Customs Prevention Ahmedabad Anr. JT 1988 3 SC 586 Para 17 ABHAY MANOHAR SAPRE J. 1. Leave granted. 2. This appeal is filed by the accused against the judgment and final order dated 25.04.2014 passed by the High Court of Karnataka at Bangalore in Criminal Revision Petition No. 924 of 2009 whereby the learned single Judge of the High Court dismissed the revision petition and upheld the order dated 23.09.2008 01.10.2008 passed by the XVII Additional Chief Metropolitan Magistrate Bangalore in CC No. 2408 of 1995 convicting and sentencing the appellant accused for the offences punishable under Section 381 of the Indian Penal 3. Facts of the case lie in a narrow compass. 4. The appellant accused at the relevant time 1.3.1992 to 11.3.1993 was working as Sorting Assistant in Bangalore Packet Sorting Office Head Record Office Main Unit at Bangalore. On the intervening night between 05.03.1993 and 06.03.1993 the appellant accused while on duty committed theft of a registered insured parcel bearing receipt No. 0127 dated 03.03.1993 containing Gold Chain V shape weighing 173.650 Grams worth Rs. 70 410 which was sent by its owner from Ramavadi Post Office Bombay for being delivered to the consignee Gulab Jewellery Shop at K.H.B. Road Post Office Bangalore. The parcel thus could not be delivered to the party concerned though reached to Bangalore post office. 5. Mr. M.N. Narasimha Murthy Assistant Superintendent of Bags PW 1 in the office of Chief Post Master General of Karnataka on coming to know of the missing of parcel and commission of the theft of the parcel immediately lodged a complaint Ex P 1 in the High Grounds Police Station. The complaint was accordingly investigated which revealed complicity of the appellant in commission of its theft which led to registration of Crime Case No. 115 1993 against the appellant for the offences punishable under Sections 381 and 419 of IPC read with Section 52 of the IPO Act. The case was then handed over to the CBI. The CBI registered the case being RC No. 14 S 93 BLR which eventually led to filing of the charge sheet against the appellant in the Court of XVII Additional Chief Metropolitan Magistrate Bangalore for appellant s prosecution for commission of aforementioned offences. 6. The appellant abjured the guilt and claimed the trial. The Chief Metropolitan Magistrate by his order dated 23.09.2008 01.10.2008 passed in CC No 2408 of 1995 convicted the appellant for the offences punishable under Section 381 IPC and Section 52 of the IPO Act and sentenced him to undergo simple imprisonment for 6 months and to pay a fine of Rs. 2000 under Section 381 IPC and in default of payment of fine amount to undergo further simple imprisonment for 3 months. Similarly the appellant was also sentenced to undergo simple imprisonment for 6 months and to pay a fine of Rs. 2000 for the offence punishable under Section 52 of the IPO Act and in default of payment of fine amount to undergo further simple imprisonment of 3 months. So far as the offence punishable under Section 419 IPC was concerned the appellant was acquitted of the charge. 7. It may be pertinent to mention that the Chief Judicial Magistrate while awarding the punishment for commission of two offences as mentioned above did not mention as to whether both the punishments will run concurrently or consecutively . In other words the order of the Chief Judicial Magistrate in so far as it relates to the award of punishment was concerned it was silent on this issue. 8. Feeling aggrieved by the order of conviction and sentence the appellant filed an appeal being Criminal Appeal No. 845 of 2008 before the XXI Additional City Civil and Sessions Judge and Special Judge for CBI Cases Bangalore. The appellate Judge by his order dated 08.10.2009 confirmed the conviction and sentences awarded to the appellant and dismissed his appeal. Against the said order the appellant preferred a revision being Criminal Revision Petition No. 924 of 2009 in the High Court. The High Court by impugned order dismissed the revision and in consequence upheld the conviction and sentences awarded to the appellant. It is against this order the appellant accused has filed this appeal by way of special leave. 9. While assailing the legality and correctness of the impugned order learned Counsel for the appellant urged only one point. Learned Counsel however did not question the legality and correctness of the conviction on its merit and confined his challenge only to the sentences awarded to the appellant. According to him the Courts below erred in not directing both the sentences awarded to the appellant i.e. the one awarded under Section 381 IPC and the other awarded under Section 52 of the IPO Act to run concurrently . It was his submission that since both the offences which resulted in appellant s conviction under two different Acts IPC and IPO Act were tried in one trial and arose out of one act namely theft this was a fit case where the Courts below should have directed both the sentences to run concurrently . Learned Counsel pointed out that in every case of this nature it is the duty of the Court to specifically mention in the order of conviction as to whether the sentences awarded for the offences under the different sections would run concurrently or consecutively by taking recourse to the provisions of Section 31 of the Code of Criminal Procedure 1973 hereinafter referred to as the Code . Learned Counsel contended that in any event having regard to the nature of offence committed by the appellant his advanced age 61 years the serious heart ailment suffered by him while undergoing the sentence duly proved by documents and the fact that he has already been dismissed from service due to his conviction this Court should invoke the power under Section 31 of the Code and direct both the sentences i.e. the one awarded under IPC and other awarded under IPO Act to run concurrently instead of to run consecutively . 10. In contra learned counsel for the respondent State supported the impugned judgment and submitted that no interference is called for in the impugned judgment. 11. Having heard the learned counsel for the parties and on perusal of the record of the case we find force in the submissions made by the learned counsel for the appellant. 12. The question which arises for consideration in this appeal is whether the sentences awarded to the appellant under IPC and the IPO Act should run concurrently or consecutively 13. The expressions concurrently and consecutively mentioned in the Code are of immense significance while awarding punishment to the accused once he is found guilty of any offence punishable under IPC or and of an offence punishable under any other Special Act arising out of one trial or more. It is for the reason that award of former enure to the benefit of accused whereas award of latter is detrimental to the accused s interest. It is therefore legally obligatory upon the Court of first instance while awarding sentence to specify in clear terms in the order of conviction as to whether sentence awarded to the accused would run concurrently or they would run consecutively 14. Section 31 of the Code deals with power of the Court to award sentence in cases where the accused is convicted of several offences at one trial. It reads as under 31. Sentence in cases of conviction of several offences at one trial. 1 When a person is convicted at one trial of two or more offences the Court may subject to the provisions of section 71 of the Indian Penal Code 45 of 1860 sentence him for such offences to the several punishments prescribed therefor which such Court is competent to inflict such punishments when consisting of imprisonment to commence the one after the expiration of the other in such order as the Court may direct unless the Court directs that such punishments shall run concurrently. 2 In the case of consecutive sentences it shall not be necessary for the Court by reason only of the aggregate punishment for the several offences being in excess of the punishment which it is competent to inflict on conviction of a single offence to send the offender for trial before a higher Court Provided that a in no case shall such person be sentenced to imprisonment for a longer period than fourteen years b the aggregate punishment shall not exceed twice the amount of punishment which the Court is competent to inflict for a single offence. 3 For the purpose of appeal by a convicted person the aggregate of the consecutive sentences passed against him under this section shall be deemed to be a single sentence. 15. The issue as to in which circumstances the Court should direct the sentences to run concurrently or consecutively after the accused is convicted of more than one offence in one trial or more has been the subject matter of several cases in this Court and thus remains no more res integra. This issue was considered by this Court while considering the scope of Sections 31 427 and 428 of the Code and Section 71 of IPC. 16. We consider it apposite to refer to some of the decisions. 17. In Mohd. Akhtar Hussain Ibrahim Ahmed Bhatti v. Assistant Collector of Customs Prevention Ahmedabad Anr. JT 1988 3 SC 586 1988 4 SCC 183 the accused was sentenced to undergo 7 years imprisonment and a fine of Rs. 10 lakhs was imposed for having found to be in possession of primary gold worth Rs.1.4 crores which was in violation of the Gold Control Act. He was subsequently indicted for infringing the provisions of Customs Act by smuggling gold valued at Rs. 12.5 Crores and exporting silver worth Rs. 11.5 Crores. The accused pleading guilty in commission of the offences was awarded 4 years imprisonment and also a fine. Both the sentences were directed to run consecutively . However the State contended that the offence under the Customs Act merited the maximum sentence while the accused contended that sentences should run concurrently . The High Court however enhanced the sentence as contended by the State and rejected the plea of the accused in regard to the award of sentences. This Court in an appeal filed by the accused accepted the plea raised by him and while allowing his appeal directed both the sentences to run concurrently by referring to Section 427 of the Code. The following observations made by this Court in paras 9 and 10 are apposite 9. The section relates to administration of criminal justice and provides procedure for sentencing. The sentencing court is therefore required to consider and make an appropriate order as to how the sentence passed in the subsequent case is to run. Whether it should be concurrent or consecutive 10. The basic rule of thumb over the years has been the so called single transaction rule for concurrent sentences. If a given transaction constitutes two offences under two enactments generally it is wrong to have consecutive sentences. It is proper and legitimate to have concurrent sentences. But this rule has no application if the transaction relating to offences is not the same or the facts constituting the two offences are quite different. 18. Likewise a question arose before the three judge Bench in State of Maharashtra Anr. v. Najakat Alia Mubarak Ali JT 2001 Suppl 1 SC 279 2001 6 SCC 311 as to whether the accused convicted in two cases one after another was entitled to claim set off the period of detention during investigation inquiry or trial from the sentence imposed on conviction in both the cases. While interpreting Section 428 of the Code the majority of the judges answered the question in affirmative. While answering the question Justice Thomas speaking for majority of the Judges made the following observations which are pertinent. 17. In the above context it is apposite to point out that very often it happens when an accused is convicted in one case under different counts of offences and sentenced to different terms of imprisonment under each such count all such sentences are directed to run concurrently. The idea behind it is that the imprisonment to be suffered by him for one count of offence will in fact and in effect be imprisonment for other counts as well. 19. The aforesaid principle of law was relied upon by this Court in Chatar Singh v. State of M.P. 2006 12 SCC 37 and State of Punjab v. Madan Lal JT 2009 3 SC 326 2009 5 SCC 238 and lastly recently in Manoj Panu v. State of Haryana JT 2013 15 SC 384 2014 2 SCC 153 wherein this Court taking recourse to Section 31 of the Code directed in somewhat similar facts that the sentences awarded to the accused to run concurrently in place of consecutively . 20. Keeping the aforesaid principle of law in mind and applying the same to the facts of this case in the light of powers available under Section 31 of the Code we are of the considered opinion that both the sentences awarded to the appellant in the case at hand should run concurrently and this we do by invoking Section 31 which enables the Court to so direct. 21. In our considered opinion this is a fit case where we can direct the sentences awarded to the appellant to run concurrently for the reasons that firstly the case out of which this appeal arises relates to the year 1993 and is pending for a long period of 21 years secondly the two sentences which were imposed on the appellant arose out of one offence of theft punishable under Section 381 IPC tried in one trial thirdly the provisions of Section 52 of the IPO Act were required to be invoked against the appellant because he was the postal employee fourthly the Gold Chain was long recovered and also handed over to the person concerned fifthly the appellant has already been dismissed from services due to impugned conviction and lastly the appellant has been suffering from heart ailment since long as is proved by documents filed along with the appellant s affidavit 03.11.2014. 22. It is for all these reasons in our considered opinion the interest of justice would be sub served by directing both the sentences awarded to the appellant to run concurrently . Since we have upheld the conviction which was not challenged by the appellant in this appeal the directions to run both the sentences concurrently can always be passed by the appellate Court because such directions are in the nature of consequential on and incidental to the affirmance of the conviction as held by this Court in the case reported in Sawal Das v. State of Bihar 1975 3 SCC 156 . 23. In the light of foregoing discussion the appeal succeeds and is allowed in part. The conviction and sentences awarded to the appellant by the courts below for the offences punishable under Section 381 of IPC and Section 52 of the IPO Act are upheld. However it is directed that both the sentences awarded to the appellant under IPC and IPO Act would run concurrently . 24. As a consequence if the appellant has already undergone the period of sentence imposed on him he shall be released forthwith if not required in connection with any other case. 0 CROSS CITATION 1965 SCR 1 293 CRIMINAL APPELLATE JURISDICTION Criminal Appeal No. 29 of 1963. Appealby special leave from the judgment andorder dated December 13 1962 of the Patna High Court in Government Appeal No. 24 of 1960. Nuruddin Ahmed B. P. Singh and U. P. Singh for the appellants. B. P. Jha for respondent No. 1. The Judgment of the Court was delivered by Raghubar Dayal J. This appeal by special leave raises the question whether a person who seizes cattle illegally purporting to act under S. 10 of the Cattle TrespassAct 1871 hereinafter the Act commits the offence of theft or robbery or not. The question arises in this way. On the morning of November 28 1957 a number of cattle belonging to several persons including Shamnarain Singh were observed by a number of persons including Ramnandan Singh and Ram Rattan alias Ratan Ahir grazing in a kurthi fieldabout which there was a dispute between the authorities of the Basic School and Shamnarain Singh each of them claiming the field. Ramnandan Singh and others seized those cattle and proceeded to take them to the pound at village Tilauthu. These persons were armed with sharp edged weapons and lathis. The report of the seizure of the cattle reached Shamnarain Singh and other people in the village.A number of people variously armed started from the village to rescue the cattle. They were joined by others on the way. This party including Sukhari Mahto Deocharan Sheodutt Hari Mahto and Ramdeo caught up with the other party a short distance from the cattle pound and asked that party to release the cattle. Altercation took place between the parties and thenthey fought together. According to the prosecution case members of the appellants 295 party attacked Shamnarain Singh and his companions. According to the appellants it was the other party which attacked them. As a result of the fight five persons got injured on the side of Shamnarain Singh. Of them Ramdeo got one gaping punctured wound in the right thigh with a spear. He died as a result of the injury received. Sukhari Mahto received 16 injuries including 4 incised wounds. The other three injured persons received ordinary injuries. Deocharan had an abrasion Sheodutt Singh got a lacerated wound a swelling and an abrasion and Hari Mahto hada lacerated wound. On the side of the appellants fourpersons got injured. Ramnandan Singh received 12 injuries including 4 incised wounds and 3 punctured wounds.Ratan Ahir got three injuries including 2 punctured wounds. Sheorattan got 5 injuries including 2 punctured wounds.Rajkumar Singh got 2 injuries including one punctured wound. Reports were made at the police station on behalf of the two parties. Hari Mahto lodged a report on behalf of the complainantparty against 20 persons. Ratan Ahir lodged a reportagainst 26 persons. The police as a result of investigation sent up 28 persons for trial. The Additional Sessions Judge Arrah acquitted all of them. He found that 1 Shamnarain Singh was in lawful possession of the kurthi field in question on the date of occurrence and that the supposed claim thereto raised on behalf of the defence was not in good faith 2 the cattle were seized in the presence of the charwahas in spite of their protest 3 even though the seizure of the cattle from the kurthi field by the accused party in these circumstances was an unlawful act the conduct of the complainant party who were fully armed in following them in order to release the cattle was not justified as it showed a determination on their part to get their cattle released by use of force and that therefore there did not exist any right on the part of the owners of the cattle to the extent of securing the release of their cattlefrom the hands of those who had seized them earlier by use of force 4 there was strong Probability in favour of the view that it was the prosecution party which created the crisis and took the aggression to initiate the assault and that the prosecution narration as to the manner in which the assault commenced at the scene of occurrence where the assault took place did not commend itself to him andthat part of the prosecution story appeared tosufferfrom material Suppression and that in these circumstances the accused party had the reasonable apprehension of suffering grievous hurt or death at the hands of the prosecution party and they were justified in the exercise of their right of private defence of their bodies in 296 causing such injuries to the men on the prosecution side as might cause death the death so caused being justifiable homicide. The State of Bihar appealed against the acquittal of the 28 accused. The High Court allowed the appeal against 13 respondents and convicted Ratan Ahir under S. 302 I.P.C. and the others under s. 326 read with s. 149 I.P.C. and ofsome other offences. It may be mentioned thatone of the respondents had died and 14 others were acquitted. The High Court agreed with the Sessions Judge that the plot insuit was in the possession of Shamnarain Singh and that the seizure of the cattle by the accused party was illegal. The learned Judges however were of opinion that the Sessions Judge had taken a wrong view of the law in thinking that the members of the prosecution party were not entitled to rescue the cattle by gleans of force only because the respondents had succeeded in taking away the cattle for some distance. They held that once the seizure of cattle was found to be illegal members of the accused party were in the position of thieves rather dacoits when they had seized the cattle by show of force to the cowherd boys and that therefore the members of the prosecution party had the right of private defence of property and could recover their cattle by use of force subject to the limitation that force in excess of what was necessary be not used. It also found that the prosecution party in their attempt to rescuethe cattle. had been violently attacked by the party of the accused. The learned Judges probably did not agree with the view of the Sessions Judge that the attackwas opened by the prosecution party as there was no material in support of the view on the record but held that even the opening of the attack by the prosecution party would not give any justification to thedefence party for it was bound to defend itself in the act of rescuing the cattle. To consider the question of law raised in this appeal we accept the findings of the High Court to the effect that the plot in suit was in the possession of Shamnarain Singh that the appellants and others seized the cattle grazing inthat plot alleging that they were damaging their crops andthat they would take them to the pound that Shamnarain Singh and othersarmed went to rescue the cattle and on meeting the accused partyasked them to release the cattle andthat after some altercation the accused party opened the attack. It is not disputed and it has been alleged from thevery beginning in the reports lodged by both the parties that the appellants and others had seized the cattle allegingthat they 297 were damaging their crops. It follows that they purported to seize the cattle in pursuance of the provisions of s. 10 of the Act. In view of the finding that the plot was in possession of Shamnarain Singh and that he had raised the crop such seizure was illegal. It is thus that the question arises whether by so seizing the cattle the appellants committed the offence of theft. It is necessary to determine this point as it is only when the appellants and others had committed the offence of theft in so seizing the cattle that any right of private defenceof property arises in favour of Shamnarain Singh and his party whowent to rescue the cattle. If the act ofthe appellants and othersdid not amount to theft they committed no offence and therefore no right of private defence of property arose in favour of Shamnarain Singh and others as such a right arises against the commission of an offence as defined in s. 40I.P.C. i.e. an act which amounts to a thingmade punishable by the Code. It may be mentioned that no other offence is alleged to have been committed by the appellants and others which would have given the right of private defence of property to Shamnarain Singh and others. To determine the question raised it is desirable to refer to the provisions of the Act in order to findwhat actions of the appellants would be in accordance with its provisions what would be against them and to whatthey would be liable if they acted against such provisions. Section 10 authorizes certain persons having interest in the crops grown on any land to seize or cause to be seized cattle trespassing on it and doing damage thereto or to any crop or produce thereon. It requires them to send the cattle so seized within 24 hours to the pound established for the village in which the land is situate. It further provides that all officers of police shall when required aid in preventing resistance to such seizuresand rescues from persons making such seizures. Section 11authorises certain persons to seize cattle which damage public roads canals embankments and other thingsmentioned in that section. Section 12 provides for the levy of fine for every head of cattle impounded. Chapter V deals with complaints of illegal seizure or detention and has four sections ss. 20 to 23. Section 20 reads Power to make complaints. Any person whose cattle have been seized under this Act or having been so 298 seized have been detained in contravention of this Act may at any time within tendays from the date of the seizure make a complaint to the Magistrate of the District or any Magistrate authorized to receive and try charges without reference by the Magistrate of the district. Section 21 deals with the procedure onsuch complaint and S. 22 reads Compensation for illegal seizure or detention. If the seizure or detention be adjudgedillegal the Magistrate shall award to the complainant for the loss caused by the seizure or detention reasonable compensation not exceeding one hundred rupees to be paid by the person who made the seizure or detained the cattle together with all fines paid and expenses incurred by the complai nant in procuring the release of the cattle. Release of cattle. And if thecattlehave not been released the Magistrate shall besides awarding such compensation order their release and direct that the fines and expenses leviable under this Act shall be paid by the person who made the seizure or detained the cattle. Section 23 provides that the compensation and expensesmentionedin s.22 maybe recovered as if they were fines imposed by the Magistrate. Section 24 provides penaltyfor forcibly opposing the seizure of cattle liable to be seized under the Act or for rescuing such cattle after seizure either from a pound or from any person taking or about to take them to a pound. The punishment on conviction is not to exceedsix months imprisonment or a fine of five hundred rupees. TheAct does not make the illegal seizure of cattle punishable asan offence. The person seizing cattle illegally is made liable to pay compensation for theloss caused to the owner of the cattle on account of the illegal seizure of cattle or of detaining the cattle in contravention of the Act. He is also liableto pay the fine and expenses paid in procuring release of the cattle. The expression under this Act in S. 20 does not mean in accordance with the provisions of the Act but means purporting to be in accordance with the provisions of the Act as seizure under the Act i.e. seizure in accordance with the provisions of the 299 Act could never be illegal and S. 20 deals with complaints of illegal seizure or detention. The expression used in S. 24 isdifferent and makes the forcible opposition of the seizure of cattle punishable when the cattleseizedwere liableto be seized under the Act. If the cattle were not liableto be seized forcible opposition to their seizure would not be punishable under s. 24. Section 25 of the Act provides a mode for the recovery of penalty for mischief committed bycausing cattle to trespass. Itthus takes notice of the offence under the Penal Code committed by the person who causes cattle to trespass on other s land and provides that any fine imposed for the commission of that offence can be recovered bysale of all or any of the cattle by which trespass was committed whether those cattle were seized in the act of trespassing or not and whether they were the property of the person convicted of the offence or were only in his charge when the trespass was committed. Section 26 inter alia provides for penalty for damage causedby pigs through neglect or otherwise to crops etc. or public roads or damage by cattle generally if the State Government so notifies. Section 29 expressly provides that nothingin the Act prohibits any person whose crops or other produce ofland have been damaged by trespass of cattle from suing for compensation in any competent Court and S. 30 provides that any compensation paid to such person under the Act by order of the convicting Magistrate shall be set off and deducted from any sum claimed by or awarded to him as compensation in such suit. There is no provision in the Act for the award of compensation to the person whose crops or other produce of land had been damaged by trespass of cattle. Section 30 therefore appears to refer to the award of compensation to such person under S. 545 Cr. P.C. by the Magistrate convicting the person whose cattle had caused damage of the offence of mischief under the Penal Code or of the offences under ss. 24 and 26 of the Act. TheAct has not any provision comparable to the provisions ofss. 29 and 30 stating that a person whose cattlehad been illegally seized or detained may sue for compensation in a competent Court and thatcompensation awarded by the Magistrate under s. 22 of the Act be deducted from any sum awarded to him in such proceedings. The Act does not make the illegal seizure or detention of cattle an offence. It appearsthat the legislatureintended that the provisions of Chapter V of the Actwoulddeal comprehensively with the 300 case of illegal seizures or detentions of cattle andthat the remedy available to a person whose cattle had been so seized or detained would be the one provided by S. 22 of the Act and no other and that illegal seizure or detention of cattlewould amount to no offence under thePenal Code. There appears to be good reason for this as the object of the Act was the protection of crops and other produce of land from the damage by cattle trespassing on the land and of the cultivators and occupiers of land from consequent loss and injury. The Cattle Trespass Act of 1871 was enacted to consolidate and amend the law relating to trespass by cattle. The first CattleTrespass Act was Act ITT of 1857 and its preamble reads Whereasloss and injury aresuffered by cultivators and occupiers of land from damage done to crops and other produce of land by the trespass of cattle and whereas damage is done to the sides and slopes of public roads and embankments by cattle trespassing thereon and whereas it is expedient to authorize the seizure and detention of cattle doing damage as aforesaid and also to make provision for the disposal of cattle found straying in any public place It is enacted as follows Section II of the 1857 Act empowered the cultivator or occupier of any land to seize or cause to be seized any cattle trespassing on his land and doing damage to anycrop or produce thereon. Section 10 of the Act gave such right to other persons is well. It did not however give the right to seize cattle damaging the crops to everyone who might noticethe cattle damaging the crops.Though the power to seize cattle trespassing on a person s land was givenonly when the cattle were damaging the land or the crop the eon it should have been considered a difficult matter for the person authorized to seize cattle to determine first whether the cattle had caused damage to his land or crop and thereafter to seize them. The person so authorized would instinctively first seize the cattle on his land presuming that they must have damaged the crop or the land andthat any further presence of the cattle in the field without their being seized would lead to further damage. Further s. 10of the Act directs all officers of police when required to do so to aid in preventing resistance tosuch seizures and rescues from persons making such seizures. The personseizing the cattle is thus given police protection. Me police officers required to aidwould not in the circumstances be 301 determining before rendering aid whether the seizure of cattle Was legal Or not. They haveto prevent resistance to seizures and rescue of cattle from persons making seizures if they are called upon by the persons seizing the cattle to prevent resistance to the seizure or the rescue. This emphasizes the view that seizures of cattle whether legal or illegal are protected from interference. The remedy of the person whose cattle are illegally seized is contained in the provisions of Chapter V. In view of these realisticconsiderations the person happening to seize the cattle which had not actually caused damagewas considered to be acting underthe Act as expressed in S. 20 so that no action not authorized by the Act be taken against him for conduct which be not strictly legal. At the same time the interest of the person whose cattleare seized even when they had not caused damage to the crop had to be protected.It was also bound to happen at times that persons not authorized to seize cattle in the exercise of their larger duty to the people whose crops were being damaged may be inclined to take action against the cattlethey might notice damaging the crops. Such persons would be actuated by good intentions. but actuallythey would not be acting in accordance with the provisions of the Act and might be liable for damages in civil courts or possibly alsocriminally if the seizure of cattle could amountto an offence under the Penal. Code or any other law. It was on a balancing of the interest of the persons purporting toseize the cattle to protect crops and the interest of the owners of the cattle that these provisions of Chapter V seem to have been made. In view of these considerations we are of opinion that the provisions of Chapter V comprehensively deal with the cases of such seizure of cattle which had been seized in the exercise of the power conferred by the Act or in furtherance of its objects though not in full accordance with the provisions ofthe Act. In view of these considerations based on the provisions of the Act it does not appearthat illegal seizure of cattle by persons. purporting to act in accordance with the provisions of the Act could be an offence of theft under the Penal Code. We arrive at the same conclusion by a scrutiny of the provisions of the Penal Code. We may now consider what acts constitute the offence of theft under the Penal Code. Theft is defined in s. 378 thus Whoever intending to take dishonestly any movable property out of the possession of any person 302 without that person s consent movesthat property in.. order to such taking is said to commit theft. This Court had occasion to consider at lengthwhat commission of theft consists of in K. N. Mehra v. The State of Rajasthan 1 . It said at p. 630 Commission of theft therefore consists in 1 moving a movable property of a person out of his possession without his consent 2 the moving being in order to the taking of the propertywith a dishonest intention. Thus I the absence of the person s consent at the time ofmoving and 2 thepresence of dishonest intention in so taking and at the time are the essential ingredients of the offence of theft. At p. 631 it said It is rightly pointed out that since the definition of theft requires that the moving of the property is to be in order tosuch taking such meaning intending totake dishonestly the very moving out must bewith the dishonest intention. After stating the provisions of ss. 23 and 24 of the Indian Penal Code this Court said Taking these two definitionstogether a person can be said to have dishonest intention if in taking the property it is his intention to cause gain by unlawful means of the property to which the person so gaining is not legally entitled or to cause loss by wrongful means of property to which the person so losing is legally entitled. It is further clear from the definition that the gain or loss contemplated need not be a total acquisition or a total deprivation but it is enough if it is a temporary retention of property by the person wrongfully gaining or a temporary keeping out of property from the person legally entitled. This is clearly brought out in illustration 1 to s. 378 of the Indian Penal Code.... The Court did not express an opinion with respect to the submission that the Penal Code makes a distinction between intention to cause a particular result and knowledge or likelihood of causing a particular result and that the maxim that every person must be taken tointendthe natural consequence of his act is a 1 1957 S.C.R. 623. 303 legal fiction which is not recognized for penal consequences in the Indian Penal Code. Till the property is moved no offence of theft can becommittedeven if the alleged offender had intended totake dishonestly the property out of the possession of any other personwithout his consent. Mere seizure of cattle found trespassing on land does not amount to movingthe cattle. The act Of moving the cattle would be subsequent to seizing them.It follows therefore that theseizure of cattle though illegal cannot amount to the offence of theft. It is after the seizure of cattle that the person seizing them moves them in order to take them to the pound.This act of taking them to the pound is what he is directed to do by the Act Section 10 specifically directs so. Of course the direction is in regard to the cattle seized for damaging the land or crop but the same direction will be deemed to be operative when the cattle are seized in the purported exercise of the right to seize them under s. 10 of theAct specially when s. 20 speaks of such seizure as being under the Act. An act done in accordance with the provisions of the Act cannot be considered prima facie to be a dishonest act and would not justify the conclusion that the taking of the cattle to the pound amounted to the offence of theft. A person is said to do a thing dishonestly when hedoes anything with the intention of causing wrongful gain to one personor wrongful loss to another person. In the case of illegal seizures andimpounding ofcattle the person seizing the cattle does not gain anything. He simply takes the cattle to the pound. He does not use them for his purpose. He in fact exercises no greater dominionover those cattle than that of being in their custody on their journey to the pound.It is said that it causes wrongful loss to the owner of the cattle inasmuch as he keeps the owner out of possession of the cattle as he was wrongfully deprived of the property for the time being it being not necessary that the deprivation of property be of a permanent character. We do not think that in such circumstances the owner of thecattle can be said to be deprived of his property. The person seizing the cattle can act in either of these three ways. He can keep them himself. Thismay in certain circumstances make him guilty of theft. He can let them loose after taking them out of the field.This action will not remove the danger of the cattle trespassing again on the land. He can take them to the pound.. 304 In so doing he not only acts as directed by the Act but also in the interests of both himself and the owner of the cattle. He avoids the risk of further harm to himself and protects the interest of the owner by having the cattle in safe custody and keeping them from doing any further damage to anyone s land or crop. The owner can get back the cattle from the pound on payment of the fine andexpenses in accordance with the provisions of S. 15 of theAct. Whatever he would have to pay forgetting the cattle released he can reimburse himself by suitable action under S. 20of the Act as the Magistrate dealing with his complaint is empowered under S. 22 to order the payment of finesand expenses paid by him in addition to the compensation for any loss that he suffers. The owner of the cattle illegally seized is thus not only reimbursed for the fine and expenses which he paid but also for any lossthat he has suffered on account of illegal seizure. This means that in the ultimate analysis the owner ofthe cattle seized illegally suffers no loss and that therefore the act of illegal seizure of cattle does not cause any wrongful loss to the owner of the cattle. It follows that the person seizing cattle purporting to act under the provisions of the Act does not cause any wrongful loss to the owner of the cattle. Even if it be assumed that some sort of loss which is wrongful in nature is caused to the owner of the cattle by illegal seizure and impounding them the question arises whether the person seizing the cattle illegally from a field with the avowed object of taking them to the pound on the groundthat it was damaging the field or the crop can be imputed the intention to take the cattle dishonestly. The effect of his seizing the cattle illegally may be assumed to cause wrongful loss to the owner of the cattle but did he so intend We are of opinion that he did not so intend. His intention at the time though based on his wrong notions that he was entitled to seize the cattle was to takethem to the poundas required by the Act so that no further damagebe done to the land or property. It is truethat intention is mostly gathered from the consequences of the act committed by the accused but that is so because it is not often that the intention with which an act is committed can be definitely known from any previous fact. When a person does a certain act by openly expressing his intention in committingthe act there seemsno reason why his intention should be gathered by the consequences of his act exceptin those cases where it is found that the avowed intention was a mere cloak for some other real 305 intention which is then to be determined in the same way as it is determined in cases of non expressed intention. In view of the various considerations mentioned above we are of opinion that when a person seizes cattle on the groundthat they were trespassing on his landand causing damageto his crop or produce and gives out that he was takingthem to the pound he commits no offence of theft however mistaken he may be about his right to that land or crop. The remedy of the owner of the cattle so seized is to take action under S. 20 of the Act. He has no right to use force to rescue the cattle so seized. We may now briefly consider the cases referred to in support of the contention that illegal seizure of cattle amounts to theft. These cases were not of the seizure and impounding of cattle in the purported exercise of the powers under s. 10 ofthe Act. They are Queen v. PreonathBanerjee 1 Wazuddi v. Rahimuddi 2 Abdul Khaliq v. Emperor 3 ParyagRai v. Arju Mian 4 Queen Empress v. Sri Churn Chungo 5 . In these cases seizure of cattle was notmade even ostensibly on account of their causing damage to any land or crop. They were seized and taken away by persons in order to get their claims against the owners satisfied or in order to cause them loss otherwise. Suchseizures of cattle was rightly held to amount to theft. On the other hand there are cases which held that no offence is committed by a person seizing cattle illegally. In Empress v. Ramjiawan 6 it was held that illegal seizure of cattleunder the Act was not an offence of mischief under the Penal Code and that the remedy of the owner of the cattlewas to be found in the provisions of ss. 20 21 and 22. In Dayal v. Emperor 7 persons who had seized cattle from a pound and impounded them in retaliation of the action of the owners of the cattle in justifiably impounding their cattle a day earlier were held not to have committed the offence of mischief under s. 425 T.P.C. inasmuch asdriving the cattleto the pounddid not in any way lead to the diminution in the utility or value of the cattle and not to have committed the offence of theft as no wrongful loss was causedto the owners of cattle even though they wouldhave had to incur expenses in order to get them released. 1 5 W.R. 68 criminal . 3 A.I.R. 1941 Lah. 221. 5 I.L.R. 22 Cal. 1017. 2 1917 18 Crl. L.J. 849. 4 I.L.R. 22 Cal. 139. 6 1881 1 All. W.N. 158. 7 A.I.R. 1943 Oudh. 280. 306 We therefore hold that in the circumstances of this case Rattan and others appellants who had seized the cattle from the .disputed field committed no offence of thefteven if they had no right to that fieldand that therefore Shamnarain Singh and others who went armed with sharp edged weapons and lathis to rescue the cattle had no right of defence of their property against Rattan and others. The learned Sessions Judge was inclined to the viewthat Shamnarain Singh s party was the aggressor. The view cannot be said to be unreasonable even though the prosecution witnesses did not actually state so. The circumstances of the case however indicate that normally Shamnarain Singh s party would have been the aggressors.It is they whowere aggrieved atthe conduct of Rattan andothers and deliberately followed those persons in order to rescue their cattleand therefore would have in that state of temper. started the attack. The fact that four persons in Rattan s party receivedmore injuries thanfive persons in Shamnarain s party and the numberof serious injuries was also larger on theirside support this view. These four persons received 8 punctured wounds and 4 incised wounds out of the total of 26 injuries on them all. The five persons on Shamnarain s side received 22 injuries which included only one punctured wound the only one on Ramdeo deceased and 4 incised wounds on Sukhari Mahto. Even if Shamnarain Singh s party were not the aggressors and the attack was started by the party of Rattan as appears to be the view of the High Court that would not give any right of private defence of person to Shamnarain s party as Rattan and others could have apprehended in the circumstances that Shamnarain s party was not peacefully inclined and would use force against them in order to rescue the cattle and that the force likely to be used could cause grievous hurt. We are of opinion that Rattan and others appellants committed no offencein causing injuries to persons in Shamnarain s party and in causing the death of Ramdeo who was in that party. We accordingly allow theappeal set aside the conviction of Rattan Ahir under s. 302 I.P.C. and of others under s. 326 I.P.C. and also their conviction of the other offences they were convicted of. They will be released forthwith from custody. Appeal allowed. 307 0 HEADNOTE CRIMINAL LAWS Penal Code 1860 Sections 302 380 read with Section 34 Murder of land lady Recovery of her husband s PW1 s wrist watch pursuant to appellant s disclosure statement Appellant was the only inmate with deceased present when the incident took place Both accused convicted under Section 302 380 34 by trial court Whether appellant s conviction was justified in view of first accused s acquittal by High Court when said first accused had allegedly strangulated deceased No appeal by State against his acquittal. Held merely because both accused were seen with deceased by PWs 3 4 in the morning of the date of incident and were not seen for two days thereafter does not show that appellant authored the crime. As per prosecution first accused had strangulated deceased. First accused had left for village after receiving information about his mother s illness and appellant too had gone to his home from where he was arrested later. Thus they were not absconders as alleged. Sunil Kundu s case referred. HELD None of the circumstances by itself would lead to the irresistible conclusion that the appellant herein is the author of the crimes under Sections 302 and 380 IPC. It is in evidence of PWs 3 and 4 the key witnesses that apart from the appellant one Ranjit Roy was also seen in the house of the deceased and according to prosecution also as noted in their report it was Ranjit Roy accused no.1 who quietly put a strip of cloth round the neck of the deceased and strangulated her . It is in evidence that both the accused belonged to New Jalpaiguri. It is the case of the prosecution itself that the first accused had received a message on the evening of 5.7.2001 that his mother was seriously ill and she was at home. PW 13 Kakulay does not support the case of the prosecution that she had seen the accused in the afternoon of 4th July 2001 as proceeding to Siliguri. She is specific and categoric of that date because it was the first death anniversary of her father in law. The accused were in fact not absconding. They had gone to their native place New Jalpaiguri and they were arrested from their respective homes only. Para 9 On the only ground that the accused was seen with the deceased in the morning of the date of incident and that they were not seen in that place for another two days cannot by themselves lead to the conclusion that it is the appellant who authored the crime. Para 13 To abscond means go away secretly or illegally and hurriedly to escape from custody or avoid arrest. Accused had told others that they were from their place of work at Gangtok to their home at New Jalpaiguri. They were admittedly taken into custody from their respective houses only at New Jalpaiguri on the third day of the incident. Therefore it is difficult to hold that the accused had been absconding. Para 14 Evidence Act 1872 Sections 8 27 Murder Motive Recovery of deceased s husband s PW1 s wrist watch pursuant to appellant s disclosure statement Whether could be a basis of conviction Whether theft was the motive behind murder Delay of 10 days in effecting recovery Neither disclosure nor seizure supported by witnesses As per recovery memo wrist watch handed over to police by appellant s mother whereas as per disclosure statement appellant had concealed the same in his house How mother was in possession of the watch and why it was recovered through her when appellant was available not explained His mother also not examined Neither PW1 nor deceased s sons PWs 2 3 ever stated about theft of watch and cash Jewelry worn by deceased was also not stolen. Held recovery on the basis of which conviction was recorded by High Court was doubtful and hence conviction cannot be sustained. Motive also could not be proved. Madhu v. State of Kerala referred. HELD The conviction of the appellant is by placing reliance solely on the recovery of the wrist watch. It is faulty in procedure and apart from that the same does not infuse any confidence in the mind of the Court in the given circumstances when pitted against the rest of the evidence that the appellant committed the murder with the motive of theft. There is no explanation for the delay of about ten days in effecting recovery. The owner of the wrist watch PW1 does not have a case that his wrist watch had been stolen by the appellant. That version is not also supported by the children of the deceased. They have no case of theft of wrist watch or cash. Para 20 Exhibit P5 recovery memo says that the wrist watch had been handed over to the investigating officer by the mother of the appellant. However Exhibit P6 disclosure statement recorded on 12.07.2001 which has already been extracted above though not admissible as such states that the appellant had kept the wrist watch in his house at New Jalpaiguri and that he could handover the same to the police. The investigating officer examined as PW16 states that the wrist watch was recovered from the house of the appellant. It is not explained as to how the mother of the appellant came into custody of the wrist watch which had been allegedly kept in concealment by the appellant in his house. She was not examined. Yet another significant aspect is that the disclosure statement Exhibit P6 is made only on 12.07.2001 after five days of the incident and yet the recovery is effected only on 17.07.2001. The witnesses to the disclosure statement as well as seizure memo PWs 11 and 12 have very clearly stated in their evidence that their signatures were obtained on some papers which had already been filled up by the police and that no statement had been given by the appellant in their presence. Para 11 If the motive for the accused in committing the murder of Manorama Devi was theft it is again difficult to understand why the accused did not remove any ornaments worn by the deceased. Para 15 . Section 302 380 read with section 34 Conviction under Acquittal of one of the accused who allegedly strangulated deceased Whether is a ground to acquit the other as ground of common intention disappears. Held if there is independent evidence against other accused he cannot be acquitted. Krishna Govind Patil s case referred. Para 17 CASES REFERRED 1.Raja v. State JT 2013 11 SC 439 Para 19 2.Sunil Kundu v. State of Jharkhand JT 2013 6 SC 599 Para 14 3.Madhu v. State of Kerala JT 2012 1 SC 181 Para 15 4.Amrita alias Amritlal v. State of M.P. JT 2004 2 SC 295 Para 18 5.Krishna Govind Patil v. State of Maharashtra AIR 1963 SC 1413 Para 17 KURIAN J. 1. Appellant is the second accused in Criminal Case No. 31 of 2001 on the file of the Sessions Judge Sikkim at Gangtok. He was charged along with one Ranjit Roy under Sections 302 380 read with Section 34 of the Indian Penal Code 45 of 1860 hereinafter referred to as IPC . According to the prosecution These two accused persons were already in need of money for their expenses as Durga Roy Burman had already borrowed much cash from his master Sujit Basak before completing his works and he had nothing to get from his master for few days. The money problem became more serious when on 5.7.2001 the accused person received telephonic call from the father of Ranjit Roy stating that his mother is seriously ill at home and he should return home immediately. That night both the accused persons slept late discussing about their monetary problems. Next day i.e. 6.7.2001 in the morning Ranjit Roy went to the rented room. Shibu Barman had already left for his job. After some time Durga Roy Barman also arrived in the room. Both of them were under the strong impression that Lalan Prasad had enough money in his house as he was engaged in lottery business and both his sons were also working. Therefore the two accused persons made a plan to steal money from Lalan Prasad s house as he was already left for job. The accused persons had hot discussion with Raju Kumar elder son of deceased in connection with use of bathing soap for toilet purposes. By 0900 hrs both the sons also left for their daily works. Then only the deceased Manorama Devi remained in the house besides the two accused persons. The two accused persons decided to kill the deceased Manorama Devi in order to steal money from her house as she was the only person present in the house. Deceased Manorama Devi was inside the room of her sons when accused Durga Roy Barman pretended to talk to her thereby diverting her mind. At that moment the other accused Ranjit Roy came from his room bringing a strip sic of cloth and quietly went behind the deceased Manorama Devi and on getting the opportunity the accd. Ranjit Roy quietly put the strip round the neck of the deceased and strangulated her. As the victim became unconscious he encircled the ligature twice on her neck and tightly made a knot on the back of the neck sic as a result she died on the spot due to strangulation by ligature. Then leaving the dead body on the floor the accused persons searched the house and took away one wrist watch SITCO and cash Rs.2300 and fled away from P.O. At about 1200 hrs the accused persons were seen by one Mrs. Kakulay Biswas w o. Parusotham Biswas at Tenzing and Tenzing Gangtok going towards Deorali side. Accused Durga Roy who was known to her told her that they were going home. Then they never came back to Gangtok. Emphasis supplied 2. It is thus further case of the prosecution that the appellant herein made Exhibit P6 disclosure statement while in custody on 12.07.2001 My true statement is that on 6 7 01 Friday that the Watch which I had stolen after murdering the Lottery Seller s wife I have kept the same in NJP. I can hand over the said Watch to Police. I have kept the said Watch in homes at NJP. Sd illegible Accused Durga Roy Witness 1 BRIJ KISHORE PRASAD S o. Ram Janam Prasad Basantpur Near Police Station Dist. Sewan Bihar A P. R.N. Chamling Building Sd Brij Kishore Prasad M.G. Marg gangtok Ext.P 6 a Occupation Lottery Agent. 2 TASHI TSHERING BHUTIA S o. Tensang Bhutia Sd Dalep Busty Kewzing SJ E N South Sikkim Gangtok A P Rajya Sainik Board Palger Stadium Road Sd Gangtok Tashi Occupation Lottery Seller Ext.P6 b Sd SJ E N Recorded by Sd Ex.P6 c P.M. Rai Sd Police Inspector SJ E N Sadar P.S. Gangtok 3. On the basis of above disclosure made on 12.7.2001 recovery of the watch was made on 17.07.2001 as per Annexure P5 memo. The two witnesses in Exhibit P6 are witnesses to the seizure also. The Sessions Court as per judgment dated 31.12.2002 convicted both the accused under Section 302 380 34 IPC. 4. In appeal the High Court of Sikkim by judgment dated 15.12.2003 acquitted the first accused Ranjit Roy for the following reasons 12. At this stage it is relevant to state that the appellants were charged under section 302 34 IPC and have been found guilty thereunder. To invoke the aid of section 34 IPC it is necessary that the criminal act complained against was done in furtherance of the common intention of all the accused persons. The common intention implies prior meeting of mind. It can also be formed suddenly at the spot. The prosecution has not laid any evidence on this score. So far as appellant no.1 Ranjit Roy is concerned there is no evidence against him except that in the morning on the date of occurrence he was present in the house of the deceased and remain absconded till he was arrested on 8th July 2001 at New Jalpaiguri. An act of absconding is no doubt a relevant piece of evidence but the said act does not by itself lead to a conclusion that he is guilty. There is no other incriminating material against him to connect with the offence. The suspicion however strong be cannot take the place of proof. For reasons aforesaid we are inclined to hold that the prosecution has not been able to prove its case against appellant no.1 Ranjit Roy beyond reasonable doubt. He is therefore entitled to be acquitted on the benefit of doubt. Emphasis supplied 5. However in the case of second accused appellant herein it was held by the court as follows 13. In the present case the charge against both the appellants is specific in the sense that in furtherance of their common intention they committed the murder of the deceased. With the acquittal of appellant no.1 Ranjit Roy the charge of sharing common intention fails. It does not however mean that appellant no. 2 Durga Roy can also secure acquittal. There is no legal bar to convict him under the substantive provision if on the basis of evidence it could be held that he was the author of the crime. Let us therefore examine his case separately. As already stated he was found in the house of deceased in the morning on the date of occurrence. In the said house no other inmate was present except the deceased. He was a co tenant along with Shibu PW4 in respect of one room belonging to the deceased. Shibu PW4 deposed that he had gone to the house of the deceased at 2.30 p.m. to 2.45 p.m. to find out if he was present in his room but he did not find him and his room was locked. He had not returned to his room since then and remained absconded till he was arrested on 8th July 2001. He gave recovery to the Sitco wrist which was found missing on the date of occurrence. Having regard to the above circumstances we have no hesitation to hold that he appellant no.2 Durga Roy after committing murder of the deceased also committed the theft of the wrist watch exhibit IX. He is therefore clearly guilty of offences punishable under sections 302 and 380 IPC. The conviction recorded by the Sessions Judge under sections 302 380 34 IPC is hereby converted to one under sections 302 and 380 IPC. Emphasis supplied 6. Heard learned counsel appearing for the appellant and learned counsel appearing for the State of Sikkim. 7. The basis of maintaining the conviction against the appellant herein who is the second accused is i. He was in the house of the deceased in the morning on the date of occurrence. ii. No other inmate was present except thedeceased. iii. The co tenant had deposed that when he went to the house of the deceased between 2.30 2.45 p.m. on the same day he could not find the appellant and room was locked. iv. He had not returned to his room and remained absconded till he was arrested on 8th July 2001. v. He gave recovery of the wrist watch belonging to husband of the deceased which was allegedly found missing on the date of occurrence. 8. On these grounds it was concluded that the appellant accused after committing the murder of the deceased also committed theft of the wrist watch and hence he was guilty of offence punishable under Sections 302 and 380 IPC. 9. We are afraid none of the circumstances by itself would lead to the irresistible conclusion that the appellant herein is the author of the crimes under Sections 302 and 380 IPC. It is in evidence of PWs 3 and 4 the key witnesses that apart from the appellant one Ranjit Roy was also seen in the house of the deceased and according to prosecution also as noted in their report it was Ranjit Roy accused no.1 who quietly put a strip of cloth round the neck of the deceased and strangulated her . It is in evidence that both the accused belonged to New Jalpaiguri. It is the case of the prosecution itself that the first accused had received a message on the evening of 5.7.2001 that his mother was seriously ill and she was at home. PW 13 Kakulay does not support the case of the prosecution that she had seen the accused in the afternoon of 4th July 2001 as proceeding to Siliguri. She is specific and categoric of that date because it was the first death anniversary of her father in law. The accused were in fact not absconding. They had gone to their native place New Jalpaiguri and they were arrested from their respective homes only. 10. The only other ground is that of recovery under Section 27 of the Indian Evidence Act 1872 hereinafter referred to as Evidence Act recovery of the wrist watch which was alleged to have been stolen by the appellant. From the evidence available on record we find it extremely difficult to place reliance on that recovery for many reasons. The wrist watch belongs to PW1 the husband of the deceased. PWs 2 and 3 are the sons of the deceased and were staying with PW1 and the deceased. PWs 1 2 and 3 do not have a case that the wrist watch belonging to PW1 had been stolen by the appellant. They do not also have a case about the money that has been allegedly taken by the accused after committing murder. There is not even a whisper in the evidence of PWs 1 2 and 3 regarding the theft of either the wrist watch or the cash except for the identification of the wrist watch by PW1 as belonging to him. There is not even a reference to the alleged missing of the wrist watch since 06.07.2001 or the loss of cash. It is only in the evidence of PW16 the investigating officer that the accused had a motive of committing theft after murdering Smt. Manorama Devi and that an amount of Rs.2 300 and wrist watch belonging to PW1 had been taken by the accused. 11. Exhibit P5 recovery memo says that the wrist watch had been handed over to the investigating officer by the mother of the appellant. However Exhibit P6 disclosure statement recorded on 12.07.2001 which has already been extracted above though not admissible as such states that the appellant had kept the wrist watch in his house at New Jalpaiguri and that he could handover the same to the police. The investigating officer examined as PW16 states that the wrist watch was recovered from the house of the appellant. It is not explained as to how the mother of the appellant came into custody of the wrist watch which had been allegedly kept in concealment by the appellant in his house. She was not examined. Yet another significant aspect is that the disclosure statement Exhibit P6 is made only on 12.07.2001 after five days of the incident and yet the recovery is effected only on 17.07.2001. The witnesses to the disclosure statement as well as seizure memo PWs 11 and 12 have very clearly stated in their evidence that their signatures were obtained on some papers which had already been filled up by the police and that no statement had been given by the appellant in their presence. 12. Another significant aspect in the case is that all ornaments worn by the deceased were on the body and nothing had been removed. If the accused had a motive to commit theft it is only normal that they would lay their hands on the jewelry as well. 13. On the basis of the evidence we have discussed above we find it extremely difficult to hold that the prosecution has laid a foundation for an effective prosecution and has proved beyond doubt that it is the appellant who committed the murder of Manorama Devi. It has to be noted that this case is set up only on circumstantial evidence. All the circumstances should lead to without breaking the chain the involvement of the accused and the accused only. On the only ground that the accused was seen with the deceased in the morning of the date of incident and that they were not seen in that place for another two days cannot by themselves lead to the conclusion that it is the appellant who authored the crime. 14. To abscond means go away secretly or illegally and hurriedly to escape from custody or avoid arrest. It has come in evidence that the accused had told others that they were from their place of work at Gangtok to their home at New Jalpaiguri. They were admittedly taken into custody from their respective houses only at New Jalpaiguri on the third day of the incident. Therefore it is difficult to hold that the accused had been absconding. Even assuming for argument sake that they were not seen at their work place after the alleged incident it cannot be held that by itself an adverse inference is to be drawn against them as held by this Court in Sunil Kundu v. State of Jharkhand JT 2013 6 SC 599 . To quote paragraph 28 28. It was argued that the accused were absconding and therefore adverse inference needs to be drawn against them. It is well settled that absconding by itself does not prove the guilt of a person. A person may run away due to fear of false implication or arrest. See SK. Yusuf v. State of W.B. JT 2011 6 SC 640 It is also true that the plea of alibi taken by the accused has failed. The defence witnesses examined by them have been disbelieved. It was urged that adverse inference should be drawn from this. We reject this submission. When the prosecution is not able to prove its case beyond reasonable doubt it pic cannot take advantage of the fact that the accused have not been able to probabilise their defence. It is well settled that the prosecution must stand or fall on its own feet. It cannot draw support from the weakness of the case of the accused if it has not proved its case beyond reasonable doubt. 15. If the motive for the accused in committing the murder of Manorama Devi was theft it is again difficult to understand why the accused did not remove any ornaments worn by the deceased. Hence the prosecution version regarding the motive also is shaken. Please see the decision of this Court in Madhu v. State of Kerala JT 2012 1 SC 181 . 16. The evidence available on record would on the contrary give an indication that theft is a story of the investigation officer only. Neither PW1 whose wrist watch is said to be stolen nor the sons of the deceased PWs 2 and 3 have any case of the alleged theft of wrist watch or cash. The recovery is also doubtful. There is no consistent version of the recovery. The person from whom the recovery has been effected viz. the mother of the appellant has not been examined. Despite the availability of the appellant the recovery is through his mother. There is no explanation as to how she got to watch. This could also be the reason why the trial court in the judgment dated 31.12.2012 held that Technically speaking there is no compliance of Section 27 Evidence Act. Though the wrist watch Ext. IX was recovered from the house of accused Durga Roy but the record reveals that the said wrist watch was handed over to the Police by the mother of the accused Durga Roy . It has to be noted that recovery of the wrist watch from the house of the appellant is the only ground on which the High Court has maintained the conviction of the appellant. 17. It has been argued by the learned counsel for the appellant that the accused no.1 Ranjit Roy on whom the overt act of strangulation is alleged having been acquitted by the High Court the conviction of the appellant cannot be maintained. It is further contended that by the acquittal of the main accused the whole theory of common intention has been shattered and that the appellant is entitled to succeed on that ground. We are afraid the contention cannot be appreciated. No doubt there are only two accused and they have been charged under Sections 302 380 34 IPC and one of them has been acquitted. That by itself is not a ground to acquit the co accused in case there is independent evidence. Of course in the absence of such independent evidence the accused could succeed on that ground as held by this Court in Krishna Govind Patil v. State of Maharashtra AIR 1963 SC 1413 which is a case of Section 302 read with Section 34 IPC. To quote 8. ... While it acquitted Accused 1 3 and 4 under Section 302 read with Section 34 of the Indian Penal Code it convicted Accused 2 under Section 302 read with Section 34 of the said Code for having committed the offence jointly with the acquitted persons. That is a legally impossible position. When accused were acquitted either on the ground that the evidence was not acceptable or by giving benefit of doubt to them the result in law would be the same it would mean that they did not take part in the offence. The effect of the acquittal of Accused 1 3 and 4 is that they did not conjointly act with Accused 2 in committing the murder. If they did not act conjointly with Accused 2 Accused 2 could not have acted conjointly with them. ... 18. In the case before us the allegation is that after committing the murder the accused committed theft also. As held by this Court in Amrita alias Amritlal v. State of M.P. JT 2004 2 SC 295 at paragraph 8 that 8. ... Mere acquittal of some of the accused on the same evidence by itself does not lead to a conclusion that all deserve to be acquitted in case appropriate reasons have been given on appreciation of evidence both in regard to acquittal and conviction of the accused. ... 19. The same view was followed by this Court in Raja v. State JT 2013 11 SC 439 . To quote paragraph 12 12. ... It is also relevant to point out that the High Court took note of the general principle that if the prosecution case is the same against all the accused or with regard to some of the accused on the same set of evidence available on record with reference to any of the accused then the Court would not be committing any mistake in acquitting all the accused and conversely if it is possible to do so namely to remove the chaff from the grain the Court would not be committing any mistake in sustaining the prosecution case against whom the evidence is shown to be intact. 20. Thus there should be independent evidence. The conviction of the appellant is by placing reliance solely on the recovery of the wrist watch. We have already held above that it is faulty in procedure and apart from that the same does not infuse any confidence in the mind of the Court in the given circumstances when pitted against the rest of the evidence that the appellant committed the murder with the motive of theft. It is not enough that the circumstances lead to possibility or probability of the involvement of the accused the circumstances should point all the fingers to the accused and the accused only. That is not the situation in this case. The circumstances can lead to many other inferences. The chain is also not complete. The first accused who according to the prosecution is the perpetrator of the offence under Section 302 IPC has been acquitted. The State has not filed an appeal against the acquittal. It is a case of Sections 302 380 read with Section 34 IPC. The whole theory of the prosecution is that it is the first accused who has been acquitted by the High Court who tied the piece of cloth on the neck of the deceased and strangulated her. The only piece of shaky evidence against the appellant is of recovery of the wrist watch of PW1 from and through the mother of the appellant. She was not examined. There is no explanation as to how despite the availability of the appellant the recovery is effected through his mother. There is no explanation for the delay of about ten days in effecting recovery. The witnesses have not supported the disclosure statement or the seizure. The owner of the wrist watch PW1 does not have a case that his wrist watch had been stolen by the appellant. That version is not also supported by the children of the deceased. They have no case of theft of wrist watch or cash. 21. In such circumstances we have no hesitation in holding that the prosecution has miserably failed in proving the case against the appellant and the appellant is entitled to succeed. The appeal is allowed. The conviction of the appellant under Section 302 380 IPC is set aside. He shall be released forthwith in case he is not required to be detained in connection with any other case. 0 CROSS CITATION 1967 SC 349 11 1963 SCR Supl. 1 689 CRIMINAL APPELLATE JURISDICTION Criminal Appeal No. 2 of 1962. Appealby special leave from the judgment andorder dated April 25 1953 of the Rajasthan High Court Jaipur Bench Jaipur in Criminal Revision No. 237 of 1956. S. P. Varma for the appellant. S. K. Kapur and P. D. Menon for the respondent. 1962. October 22. The judgment of the Court was delivered by SUBBA RAO J. This appeal by specialleave is directed against the decisionof the High Court of Rajasthan in Criminal Revision No. 237 of 1956 confirming that of the Sessions judge Alwar convicting the appellant under s. 379 of the Indian Penal Code and sentencing him to a fine of Rs. 200 . To appreciatethe questions raised in this appeal the following facts either admitted or found by the High Court may be stated. On November 24 1945 one Ram Kumar Ram obtained permission Ex. PB from the Government oftile former Alwar State to supply electricity at Rajgarh Khertal and Kherli. Thereafter he entered into partnership with 4 otherswith an understanding that the licence would be transferred to a company that would be floated by thesaid partnership. After the company was formed it put in an application to the Government through 691 its managing agents for the issue of a licence in its favour. Ex. P. W. 15 B is that application. On the advice given by the Government Advocate theGovernment required Ram Kumar Ram to file a declaration attested by a Magistrate with regard to the transfer of his rights and the licence to the company.On April 8 1948 RamKumar Ram filed a declaration to that effect. The case of the prosecution is that Ram Kumar Ram was a friend of the appellant. Pyarelal Bhargava who was a Superintendent in the Chief Engineer s Office Alwar. At the instance of Ram Kumar Ram Pyarelal Bhargava got the file Ex. PA 1 from the Secretariat through Bishan Swarup a clerk before December 16 1948 took the file to his house sometime between December 15 and 16 1948 made it available to Ram Kumar Ram for removing the affidavitfiled by him on April 9 1948 and the application Ex. P. W. 15 B from the file andsubstituting in their place another letter Ex. PC and another application Ex. PB. After replacing the said documents Ram Kumar Ram made an application to the Chief Engineer on December 24 1948 that the licence should not be issued in the name of the company. After the discovery of the tampering of the said documents Pyarelal and Ram Kumar were prosecuted before the Sub Divisional Magistrate Alwar the former for an offence under s. 379 and s. 465 read with s. 109 of the. Indian Penal Code and the latter for an offence underss. 465 and 379 read with s.109 of the Indian Penal Code. The Sub Divisional Magistrate convicted both the accused under the said sections and sentencedthem on both the counts. On appeal the Sessions judge set aside the Conviction under s. 465 but maintained the conviction and sentence of Pyarelal Bhargava under s. 379 and Ram Kumar Ram under s. 379 read with s. 109 of the Indian Penal Code. Ram Kumar Ram was sentenced to pay a fine of Rs. 500 and Pyarelal Bhargava to pay a fine of Rs. 200 . Against these convictions both the accused 692 filed revisions to the High Court and the High Court set aside the convictionand sentence of Ram Kumar Ram but confirmed those of Pyarelal Bhargava. Pyarelal Bhargava has preferred the present appeal. Learned counsel for the appellant raised before us three points namely 1 the High Court has wrongly reliedupon the confession made by the accusedbeforeShri P. N. Singhal Officiating ChiefSecretary tothe Matsya Government atthat time as that confession was notmade voluntarily and therefore irrelevant under s. 24 of the Evidence Act 2 the said confession having been retracted by the appellant the High Court should not have relied upon it as it was not corroborated in material particulars and 3 on the facts found the offence of theft has not been made out within the meaning of s. 379 of the Indian Penal Code. Another argument namely that the statement made by Pyarelal Bhargava before the Chief Secretary was not a confession inlaw was suggested but not pursuedand therefore nothing need be said about it. The first question turns upon the interpretation of the provisions of s. 24 of the Evidence Act and its application to the facts found in this case. Section 24 of the Evidence Act lays down that a confession caused by inducement threat or promise is irrelevant incriminal proceedings under certain circumstances. Under that section a confession would be irrelevant if thefollowing conditionswere satisfied 1 it should appear to the court to havebeen causedby any inducement threat or promise 2 thesaid threat inducement or promise must have reference to the charge against the accused person 3 it shall proceed from a personal authority and 4 the court shall be of the opinion that the said inducement threat or promise is sufficient to give the accused per son grounds which would appear to him reasonable in supposing that he would gain an advantage or avoid any 693 evil of a temporal nature in reference to the proceedings against him. The crucial word in the first ingredient is the expression appears . The appropriate meaning of the word appears is seems . It imports a lesser degree of probability than proof. Section 3 of the Evidence Act says A factis said to be proved when after considering the matters before it the Court either believes it to exist or considers its existence so probable that aprudent man ought under the circumstances of the particular case to act upon the supposition that it exists. Therefore the test of proof is that there is such ahigh degreeof probability that a prudent man would act on the assumption that the thing is true. But under s. 24 of the Evidence Act such a stringent rule is waived but a lesser degreeof assurance is laid down as the criterion. The standard of a prudent man is not completely displaced but the stringent rule of proof is relaxed. Even so the laxity of proof permitted does not warrant a court s opinion based on pure surmise. A prima facie opinion basedon evidence and circumstances may be adopted as the standard laid down. To put it in otherwords on the evidence and the circumstances in a particular case it may appear to the court that there was a threat inducement or promise though the said fact is not strictly proved.This deviationfrom the strict standards of proof has been designedly accepted by the Legislature with a. view to exclude forced or induced confessions which sometimes are extorted and put inwhen there is a lack of direct evidence. It is not possible or advisable to lay down an inflexible standard for guidance of courts for in the ultimate analysis it is the court which is called upon to exclude a confession by holding in the circumstances of a particular case that the confession was not made voluntarily. The threat inducement or promise must proceed from a person in authority and it is a question 694 of fact in each case whether the person concerned is a man of authority or not.What is more important is that the mere existence of the threat inducement or promise is not enough but in the opinion of the court the said threat inducement orpromise shallbe sufficientto cause a reasonable belief in the mind of accused that by confessing he would get an advantage or avoid any evil of a temporal naturein reference to the proceedings against him while the opinion is that of the court the criterion is the reasonable belief of the accused. The section therefore makes it clear that it is the duty of the court to place itself in the position of the accused and to form an opinion as to the state of his mind in the circumstances of a case. In the present case it was found that certain documents in the Chief Enginecr s Office were tampered with and certain papers weresubstituted.The appellant was the Superintendent in the Chief Engineer s Office.On April 11 1949 Shri P. N. Singhal Officiating Chief Secretary to the MatsyaGovernment was making a departmental inquiry in respect of the missing documents. The appellant among others was questioned about the said documents. The appellant first madea statement Ex. PL in which he stated that he neither asked Bishan Swarup to bring file No. 127 nor did he recollect any cause for calling forthat file on or about that date. As Shri Singhal was not able to find out the culprit he expresser his opinion that if the whole truth did not come out he would hand over the inquiry to the police.Thereafter the appellant made a statement Ex. P.L. 1 wherein in clear terms he admitted that about the middle of December 1948 Ram Kumar Ram took file No. 127P. W. 48 regardingissue of licence tothe Bharat Electrical and Industrial Corporation Ltd. Alwar from his residence to show it to his lawyers and that he took the file more than once for that purpose.He also addedthat this was 695 a voluntary statement. Learned counsel for the appellant argued that the Chief Secretary gave the threat that if the appellant didnot disclose the truth he would place the matterin the hands of the police and that the threat induced the appellant to make the disclosure in thehope that he would be excused by the authority concerned. There is no doubt that the Chief Secretary is an authority within the meaning of s. 24 of the Evidence Act but the simple question is whether the alleged statement by thesaid authority reappears to the court to be athreatwith reference to the charge against the accused.As wehave said under particular circumstances whethera statement appears to the court to be a threat or not is a question of fact. In this case the three lower courts concurrently held that in the circumstances of the case the statement did not appearto be a threat within the meaning of s. 24 of The Evidence Act. but that was only a general statement which any person who lost his property and was not able tofind out the culprit would make. It may be that such a statement under different circumstances may amount to a threat or it may also be that another court may take a differentview even in the present circumstances of the case but in exercising the powers under Art. 136 of the Constitution we are not prepared to differ from the concurrent finding given by the three courts that in the circumstances of the present case that the said statement did not appear to them to be a threat. The second argument also has no merits.A retracted confession may form the legal basis of a conviction if the court is satisfied that it was true and was voluntarily made But it has been held that a court shallnot base a conviction on such a confession without corroboration. It is not a rule of law but is only rule of prudence. It cannoteven be laid down as an inflexible rule of practice or prudence that under no circumstances such a conviction can be 696 made without corroboration for a court may in a particular case be convinced of the absolute truth of a confession and prepared to act upon it without corroboration but it may be laid down as a general rule of practice that it is unsafe to rely upon a confession much less on a retracted confession unless the court is satisfied that the retracted confession is true and voluntarily made and has been corroborated in material particulars. The High Court having regard to the said principles looked for corroboration and found it in the evidence of Bishan Swaroop P.W 7 and the entry in the Dak Book Ex. PA. 4 and accepted the confession in view of the said pieces of corroboration.The finding is one offact and there is no permissible ground for disturbing it in this appeal. The last point is that on the facts found no case of theft has been made out. The facts found were that the appellant got the filebetween December 15 and 16 1948 to his house made it available to Ram Kumar Ram andon December 16 1948 returned it to the office. On these facts it is contended that the prosecution has not made out that the appellant dishonestly took any movable property within the meaning of s. 378 of the Indian Penal Code. Thesaid section reads Whoever intending to take dishonestly any movable property out of the possession of any person without that person s consent moves that property in order to such taking is said to commit theft. The section may be dissected into its component parts thus a person will be guilty of the offence of theft 1 if he.intends to cause a wrongful gain or a wrongful loss by unlawful means of Property to which the person gaming is not legally entitled or to which the person losing is legally entitled as the case may be 697 see ss.23 and 24 of the Indian Penal Code 2 thesaid intention to act dishonestly is inrespect of movable property 3 the said property shall be taken out of the possession of another person without his consent and 4 he shall move that property in order to such taking. In the present case the record was in the possession of the Engineering Department underthe control of the Chief Engineer. The appellant was the Superintendent inthat office he took the file out of the session of thesaid engineer. removed the file from office and handed it over to Ram Kumar Ram. But it is contended that the said facts do not constitute the offence of theft for three reasons namely i the Superintendent was in possession of the file and therefore he could not have taken the file from himself ii there was no intention to take it dishonestly as he had taken it only for the purpose of showing the documents to Ram Kumar Ram and returned it the next day to the office and therefore he had not taken the said fileout of the possession ofany person and iii he did not intend to take it dishonestly as he did not receive any wrongful gain or cause any wrongful loss to any other per son. We cannot agree that the appellant was in session of the file. The file was in the Secretariat of the Department concerned which was in charge of the Chief Engineer. The appellant was only one of the officers working in that department and it cannot therefore be said that he was in legal possession of the file. Nor can we accept the argument that on the assumption that the Chief Engineer was in possession of the said file the accused had not taken itout of his possession. To commit theft one need not take movable property permanently out of the possession of anotherwith the intention not to return it to him.It would satisfy the definition ifhe took any movable propertyout of the possession of another person though he intended to return it later on. We cannot also agree with learned counselthat there is no wrongful loss in the present case. 698 Wrongful loss is loss by unlawful means of property to which the person losing it is legally entitled. It cannot be disputed thatthe appellant unauthorisedly took thefile from the office and handed it over to Ram Kumar Ram. He had therefore unlawfully taken the file from the department and for a short time he deprived the Engineering Department ofthe possession of the said file. Theloss need not be caused by a permanent deprivationof property but may be caused even by temporary dispossession though the per son taking it intended to restore it sooner or later. A temporary period of deprivation or dispossession of the property of another causes loss to the other. That a person will act dishonestly if he temporarilydispossesses another of his property is made clear by illustrations b and 1 of s.378 of the Indian penal code. They are b A puts a bait for dogs inhis pocket and thus induces z s dog to follow it. Here if A s intention be dishonestly to take the dog out of Z s possession without Z s consent A has committed theft as soon as Z s dog has begun to follow A. 1 . A takes an article belonging to Z out of Z s possession without Z s consent with the intention of keeping it until he obtains money from Z as a reward for its restoration.Here A takes dishonestly A has therefore committed theft. It will be seen from the said illustrations that a temporary removal of a dog which might ultimately be returned to the owner or the temporary taking of an article with a view to returnit after receiving some reward constitutes theft indicating thereby that temporary deprivation of another personof his property causes wrongful loss to him. We therefore hold that the facts found in this case clearly bring them within the four comers of s. 378 of the Indian 699 Penal Code and therefore the courts have rightly held that the appellant had committed the offence of theft. No other Point was pressed before us. In the result the appeal fails and is dismissed. Appeal dismissed. 0 HEADNOTE ELECTRICITY LAWS Indian Electricity Act 1910 Section 26 6 Scope Dispute regarding fraud in tampering with meter or breaking body seal. Held to be outside the ambit of the provision. Para 10 Bihar State Electricity Tariff Clause 16.9 Applicability Assessment made on the basis of theft for 180 days Justification. Held that the Board has rightly applied Clause 16.9 and there is no infirmity in the bill raised. HELD In the cases of theft of electricity or dishonest abstraction of electrical energy the assessment for compensation has to be done on the basis of a formula wherein D stands for number of days for which the pilferage took place and where there is no possible evidence to establish the period this factor can be taken to be equivalent to 180 days. Similarly in case where connected load is more than the sanctioned load the assessment charge has to be done on the basis of a formula where C stands for six months or the number of months or part thereof elapsed from the date of connection installation whichever is less. Therefore under the tariff in both the cases the period can be taken as 180 days or six months. It is on the basis of this formula that the assessment for consumption of units has been done for 180 days. The electricity board rightly applied Clause 16.9 of the Tariff and there is no infirmity in the assessment made and the bill prepared in pursuance thereof. Para 12 Clause 16.9 with Electricity Act Section 39 44 Assessment as per tariff Case of dishonest abstraction or theft Trial of accused in criminal court. Held that it has no bearing on assessment made according to tariff. Para 13 Clause 16.9 and 16.10.3 Fuel surcharge Method of calculation Dishonest abstraction Assessment thereof Fuel surcharge at thrice the rate per unit Legality. Held that Clause 16.10.3 is separate from Clause 16.9 and it does not lay the fuel surcharge at thrice the rate of per unit. Para 17 CASES REFERRED 1.Apparel Export Promotion Council v. A.K. Chopra JT 1999 1 SC 61 Para 15 2.Hyderabad Vanaspathi Ltd. v. A.P. State Electricity Board Ors. JT 1998 3 SC 84 Para 12 3.State of U.P. Ors. v. Maharaja Dharmander Prasad Singh JT 1989 1 SC 118 Para 14 4.Madhya Pradesh Electricity Board Ors. v. Basantibai JT 1987 4 SC 294 Para 10 FOREIGN CASES REFERRED 1.North Wales Police v. Evans 1982 1 W.L.R. 1155 Para 14 G.P. MATHUR J. 1. These appeals are directed against the judgment and order dated 18.4.2000 of a Division Bench of Patna High Court by which the writ petition preferred by M s J.M.D. Alloys Ltd. was partly allowed and the Bihar State Electricity Board was directed to serve a fresh bill as per the observations made in the judgment and to restore the electricity connection within two days of the payment of the said bill. 2. M s J.M.D. Alloys Ltd. hereinafter referred to as the petitioner has a high tension industrial connection of electricity for running induction furnaces for manufacturing steel ingots. The officials of the Bihar State Electricity Board hereinafter referred to as the electricity board inspected the petitioner s factory premises on 26th and 27th August 1999 and found that the seal fixed on CT PT box was tampered. An FIR was lodged at the concerned police station on 27.8.1999 alleging that the petitioner had committed theft of 6.96 lakh units and had thereby caused a loss of Rs. 2.58 crores to the electricity Board. The electricity board thereafter issued a bill dated 31.8.1999 for Rs. 8 85 77 131 . This bill was challenged by the petitioner by filing CWJC no. 8939 of 1999 before the High Court. The learned single judge who heard the writ petition vide his judgment order dated 27.9.1999 directed that a show cause notice in the light of the observations made in the judgment be given to the petitioner within a week and it will be open to the petitioner to raise all its defences against the charge of committing theft of electrical energy and or drawing electrical energy at a load higher than its contracted demand. It was further directed that the show notice shall be given by the general manager cum chief engineer Central Bihar Area Electricity Board Patna or by any other officer of the electricity board of equal or higher rank and he shall pass final order after giving an opportunity of hearing to the petitioner. The liability of the petitioner was to be determined afresh on the basis of the final order passed by the chief engineer. 3. The chief engineer Transmission Bihar State Electricity Board thereafter issued a notice dated 13.10.1999 to which a reply was given by the petitioner on 20.10.1999. After affording an opportunity of personal hearing and considering the reply the chief engineer passed an order on 27.10.1999 holding that clause 16.9 b and c of Tariff is attracted and the consumer M s J.M.D. Alloys Ltd. is liable to pay compensatory bill in terms of the aforesaid clauses of the Tariff. In accordance with the decision of the Chief Engineer a fresh bill dated 29.10.1999 for Rs. 8 85 77 131 was issued. This bill was again challenged by the petitioner by fling a writ petition which was dismissed by a learned single judge on 13.12.1999. Against the said decision the petitioner preferred a letters patent appeal which was partly allowed by the Division Bench by the impugned judgment and order dated 18.4.2000. The Division Bench held that the petitioner is liable to pay electricity charges in accordance with Clause 16.9 of the Tariff. However with regard to fuel surcharge it was held that the same cannot be levied at thrice the rate in accordance with Clause 16.9 of the Tariff which permits consumption of electricity to be assessed at thrice the rate per unit. Feeling aggrieved by the aforesaid decision M s J.M.D. Alloys Ltd. have preferred civil appeal no. 8394 of 2002 and the Bihar State Electricity Board has preferred civil appeal no. 8395 of 2002. 4. As stated earlier the chief engineer transmission Bihar State Electricity Board issued a notice dated 13.10.1999 to the petitioner. The notice was issued on the grounds inter alia that the inspection of the business premises of the petitioner was conducted from 14.15 hours to 20.30 hours on 26.8.1999 and thereafter on the following day that on examination of CT PT unit and its terminal box the seal bearing no. 04566OP which was put on CT PT terminal box on 14.5.1999 was found to be tampered with and the signature of the authority was also not found on the same that a seizure memo of the tampered seal was prepared on the same day that on account of the fact that the seal on the terminal box had been removed it had become easily accessible to the consumer and by fiddling with the terminals namely by removing the wires or putting wires of higher resistance the flow of energy to the metering unit was manipulated to show a very low recording of both KVA and unit consumption that the total capacity of induction furnaces on operation was 12 M.T. for which energy requirement was 7200 KVA but the petitioner had entered into a contract demand of 4850 KVA and therefore the consumer was engaged in theft of electricity and was consuming energy at a much higher load than the contracted demand that the supplier of the furnaces to the petitioner namely Megatherm Electronic Pvt. Ltd. had reported to the director general of police vigilance Bihar State Electricity Board consumption equivalent to approximately 3000 KVA for running the furnaces exclusive of auxiliary load like water supply cooling systems cranes etc that the feasibility report given to the electricity board by the petitioner showed that the minimum required energy for each MT furnace was 500 KVA for the furnace alone besides 100 KVA for auxiliary load and thus 600 KVA was required for each MT furnace that the electronic meter showed that the power had been consumed by the factory on an average basis of 21.25 hours per day which runs into two shifts of 12 hours each having 40 workers in each shift and the load and the capacity of two furnaces showed production of 3000 MT ingots every month and therefore the minimum consumption of power was 16.20 lakh units per month whereas bills had been paid on an average of 9.24 lakh units per month that the theft of power was further substantiated from the meter reading of J.D. Feeder at 3311 KV Air Force Sub station Bihta and also the claim filed by the petitioner under Clause 13 of the agreement and on the basis of the aforesaid facts and material it was obvious that the petitioner had been committing theft of electricity on a massive scale by tampering with the seal of the CT PT terminal cover. The petitioner was accordingly directed to show cause as to why a bill in terms of Clause 16.9 of the tariff notification be not raised. The petitioner give a reply to the show cause notice raising various pleas and denying that it had committed any theft of electricity. It was pleaded that the meter had been regularly inspected by different teams of the electricity board but no tampering of the seal of the CT PT terminal cover had been found that the furnaces can operate only to the extent of 80 of its rated capacity that the electricity board itself had assessed the capacity of the connected load at 5100 KVA which was very near to the contracted demand that the meter installed in the factory premises never recorded a maximum demand of more than the contracted demand that the assumption that 100 KVA per ton is required for auxiliary load was not based on facts and that in the case of a high tension industrial consumer the connected load is of no relevance because to constantly monitor the load availed of by a high tension consumer a trivector meter containing the maximum demand indicator is compulsorily installed. It was further submitted that the seal in CT PT unit had not been tampered with an the allegation regarding tampering of the seal was being investigated by the investigating officer of the criminal case registered against the petitioner and his report shall be considered by the court of law at the appropriate time. 5. The chief engineer after consideration of the material and the submissions made held that the theft of electricity cannot be found physically and this has to be worked out from evidences parameters and various circumstances under which the consumer is availing power. He passed a detailed order on 27.10.1999 and the relevant part of the findings recorded by him are being reproduced below It appears from annexure 1 of show cause notice that two nos. of induction furnaces of six M.T. capacity each totalling 12 MT were in operation. This is supported by the facts with the inspection report that the total capacity of transformer was 7230 KVA. The CTPT cover terminal seal which was found tampered was unsigned. There were large number officials of the board including executive magistrates and therefore there is no reason to disbelieve that seal of terminal cover of CTPT was tampered. The capacity of the furnaces being 12 MT it is evidently clear that the power was used unauthorised by the consumer because the consumption recorded in the meter was much less than what it ought to have been on actual load i.e. 7200 KVA 600 x 12 T . In this connection the annexure 3 4 the vouchers of the purchase of induction furnace from Megatherm show the capacity of induction furnace 6 MT as 2500 KW i.e. equivalent to 3000 KVA therefore the load of 12 M.T. Furnace besides KVA MT as auxiliary load totalling to 7200 KVA as the actual load. It is not out of place to mention here that the induction furnace association of Bihar has proposed and agreed that the load of induction furnace could be 600 KVA per M.T. This is also brought to my notice that on average basis the power was consumed at the average period of 21.25 hrs. per day. The factory runs into two shifts with 40 workers in each shift. So far as the nos of days of pilferage is concerned it has been rightly interpreted and assessed the maximum period of six months for the assessment of compensatory amount under clause 16.9 of Tariff. The variant factors of the consumption as per formula i.e. LEFXIIED have been thoroughly taken care of in the formula provided in the Tariff. From the facts and circumstances as set forth above it is absolutely clear that clause 16.9 b and c of Tariff is attracted and the consumer M s JMD Alloys is liable to pay the compensatory bill in terms of Clause 16.9 of Tariff. 6. In accordance with the order of the chief engineer a fresh electricity bill was prepared on 29.10.1999 for Rs. 4 09 32 925 towards the cost of units of electricity and Rs. 3 90 73 217 towards fuel surcharge. After adding the electricity duty and charges for rental of transformer and fuse replacement etc. a bill was issued for Rs. 8 85 77 131 . 7. Shri Gopal Subramanium learned senior counsel for the petitioner has submitted that the factory premises of the petitioner had been inspected on 14.5.1999 and then again on 20.7.1999 and no irregularity of any kind had been found on the said dates and therefore the allegation that the petitioner had tampered with the seal of CT PT unit is wholly incorrect. There was no material or evidence to show that any effort had been made by the petitioner to interfere with the metering unit which may have the effect of showing lesser consumption of energy. learned counsel has also submitted that in absence of any evidence relating to presence of artificial means which would have rendered abstraction of electrical energy possible the provisions of Clause 16.9 of the tariff could not be made applicable and the electricity bill issued to the petitioner is incorrect It has also been urged that the last inspection of the petitioner s premises having been done on 20.7.1999 there is no justification for counting the period of dishonest abstraction of energy as 180 days six months and therefore the bill issued to the petitioner is for much longer period which was not permissible in law. The learned counsel has further submitted that the findings recorded by the chief engineer are wholly incorrect as instead of basing his order on the actual production of steel he has gone by the capacity of the furnaces. Shri Subramanium has also urged that the faulty recording of the meter has to be judged from the standpoint of section 26 6 of the Indian Electricity Act 1910 and the matter should have been referred to electrical inspector. 8. Shri V.R. Reddy learned senior counsel for the Electricity Board has submitted that section 26 6 of the Indian Electricity Act has no application to a case where the seal fixed on CT PT terminal box had been tampered with and the recording of consumption by the meter had been effected by recourse to artificial means. Learned counsel has laid stress on the fact that the chief engineer after considering all the relevant material and circumstances has recorded a categorical finding that the seal of the CT PT terminal box had been tampered with and the petitioner had exceeded the contracted load and had also dishonestly abstracted electrical energy to a very large extent. According to the learned counsel the findings recorded by the Chief Engineer being based upon relevant material are not open to challenge in proceedings under Article 226 of the Constitution of India. In support of the appeal preferred by the Electricity Board Shri Reddy has submitted that the surcharge being part of the electricity bill the Division Bench of the High Court had erred in holding that the same was chargeable on per unit basis and not at thrice the value thereof. According to the learned counsel in view of Clause 16.9 of the Tariff the fuel surcharge has also to be levied at three times the units assessed. 9. It may be stated at the very outset that a detailed show cause notice dated 13.10.1999 mentioning all the relevant facts was served upon the petitioner to which the petitioner gave a reply on 20.10.1999. The order of the chief engineer mentions that the petitioner was afforded an opportunity of personal hearing and its counsel appeared before him and argued the matter on 25.10.1999 and 26.10.99. The chief engineer has recorded a clear finding that the seal on CT PT terminal box was found to be tampered with. A seal bearing No. 045660P had been put on the CT PT terminal box on 14.5.1999 and the authority fixing the seal had put his signatures thereon. At the time of the inspection on 27.8.1999 the seal was found to be tampered with which was seized by the inspecting team. The seal did not contain the signature of the authority who had put the seal. The record shows that the inspection had been done by a high level team consisting of as many as 8 responsible officers some of whom had come from the headquarters of the electricity board at Patna. An executive magistrate was also a member of the team. The manager of the petitioner himself lodged a report on 28.8.1999 with the deputy superintendent of police Danapur Patna alleging that 8 officers of the Bihar State Electricity Board with armed force visited and tested the installation and the members of the team with the help of screw and plier themselves tampered with the cover of the LT terminal box of CT PT and the plastic seal was removed and brought down by one of the executive engineers. However in reply to the show cause notice filed by the petitioner tampering of the seal was denied and it was pleaded that the matter was being investigated by the investigating officer of the criminal case registered against the petitioner and his report shall be considered by the court at the appropriate time. The chief engineer after considering the entire material and taking into consideration the fact that there were large number of officers of the board at the time of the inspection has recorded a finding that the seal had been tampered with. It is an admitted position that in the factory of the petitioner there were two furnaces each of 6 MT and thus the total capacity was 12 MT. The manufacturer of the induction furnaces namely Megatherm Electronic Pvt. Ltd. had given in writing that the load of 6 MT induction furnace was 2500 KV which is equivalent to 3000 KVA and therefore the actual load of the furnaces installed at the petitioner s factory after taking into consideration the auxiliary load came to 7200 KVA. The Induction Furnaces Association of Bihar of which the petitioner is also a member had agreed and proposed that the load of an induction furnace could be taken to be 600 KVA per MT. On consideration of these factors the chief engineer came to a conclusion that the actual load of the petitioner s factory was 7200 KVA. The other material which has been considered by the chief engineer is that on an average the power was consumed for 21.25 hours per day as the factory was running in two shifts with 40 workers in each shift and therefore the number of units being actually consumed were much higher than that recorded in the meter. On the basis of these findings the assessment has been made of the compensatory amount under clause 16.9 of the tariff. 10. The contention that the dispute regarding tampering of the seal of CT PT terminal unit should have been referred to the electrical inspector has hardly any merit. In Madhya Pradesh Electricity Board Ors. v. Basantibai1 it has been held that a dispute regarding the commission of fraud in tampering with the meter and breaking the body seal is one outside the ambit of section 26 6 of the Indian Electricity Act and the electrical inspector has no jurisdiction to decide such cases of fraud. It was further held that under section 26 6 the only dispute which can be decided by the electrical inspector is as to whether the meter is correct and is accurately recording the reading or there is some fault in the same. Since in the present case it has been found that the seal on the CT PT terminal box had been tampered with and the natural working of the meter had been affected by taking recourse to external devices a dispute of this kind cannot be referred to an electrical inspector. 11. The next contention raised is that the period of 180 days for which theft of electricity has been assessed is absolutely wrong and has no rational basis. The electricity board has proceeded on the footing that Clause 16.9 of the Tariff framed by the Bihar State Electricity Board with the approval of the State government is applicable. Clause 16.9 of the Tariff reads as under 16.9 A Detection of unauthorised load If at any time the consumer is found exceeding the contracted load without specific permission of the board the board may without prejudice to its other rights under the agreement or under the provisions of the Electricity Act estimate the value of the electrical energy so extracted consumed or used shall be calculated as below and may also disconnect the supply without notice I. Necessary assessment for compensation in the following malpractice and theft of energy cases shall be made as below a ................ b In case of using energy by creating obstruction in running of meters or interfering with the system of supply or wires etc. c .................... Unit assessed L x F x H x D Where L ..................... H ..................... D is the no. of days for which the pilferage took place which can be established from production of satisfactory evidence by the consumer. In case there is no possible evidence to establish the period this factor be taken equivalent to 180 or the no. of days elapsed from the date of connection installation of meter till the date of detection of the pilferage whichever is less. F ................................ II. .................. III Method of charging the assessed units as indicated in para I II above. a The consumption so assessed shall be charged at thrice the rate per unit of the tariff applicable to the consumer excluding the consumption recorded by the meter and the latter shall be charged at the appropriate tariff rates. The amount billed at this thrice the tariff rate shall not be taken into consideration for the purpose of computing consumer s liability to pay monthly minimum guarantee. b ................ IV When connected load is more than the sanctioned load in case of all categories LT connection except domestic service. Assessment charge Rs. C x M LD LS x3 Where M Minimum consumption guarantee charge pet BHP per month as applicable in the tariff schedule. LD is the load detected in BHP at the time of inspection. LS is the load sanctioned to the consumer in BHP C This factor be taken equivalent to six months or no. of months or part thereof elapsed from the date of connection installation whichever is less. 12. The relevant part of the tariff quoted above shows that in the cases of theft of electricity or dishonest abstraction of electrical energy the assessment for compensation has to be done on the basis of a formula wherein D stands for number of days for which the pilferage took place and where there is no possible evidence to establish the period this factor can be taken to be equivalent to 180 days. Similarly in case where connected load is more than the sanctioned load the assessment charge has to be done on the basis of a formula where C stands for six months or the number of months or part thereof elapsed from the date of connection installation whichever is less. Therefore under the tariff in both the cases the period can be taken as 180 days or six months. It is on the basis of this formula that the assessment for consumption of units has been done for 180 days. In Hyderabad Vanaspathi Ltd. v. A.P. State Electricity Board Ors.1 it has been held that the terms of conditions for supply of electricity to consumers notified by the board in exercise of power under section 49 of Electricity Supply Act 1948 and made applicable to all consumers availing supply of electricity are statutory in character. This being the legal position the electricity board in our opinion rightly applied Clause 16.9 of the Tariff and there is no infirmity in the assessment made and the bill prepared in pursuance thereof. 13. Shri Gopal Subramanium has also submitted that after the inspection had been done on 27.8.1999 an FIR had been lodged against the petitioner on the same day by Shri Om Prakash Assistant Executive Engineer at the police station and a criminal case was registered under section 39 44 of Indian Electricity Act. This case was investigated and thereafter a final repot was submitted which was accepted by the concerned magistrate and as a result of this order the petitioner stands exonerated from the charge of theft of electricity and no compensatory bill could be issued by taking recourse to Clause 16.9 of the tariff. Shri V.R. Reddy learned senior counsel for the electricity board has submitted that before accepting the final report the learned magistrate had issued notice to Shri Om Prakash assistant executive engineer but the said notice was not served upon him as he was transferred from Patna on account of his allocation to Jharkhand State and as such no representation could be made on behalf of the electricity board against the final report. Subsequently an application has been moved on behalf of the electricity board before the concerned magistrate for recall of the order by which final report was accepted. In our opinion the mere acceptance of final report by the magistrate cannot amount to a finding by the criminal court that theft of electricity was not committed. The accused was not even summoned no charge was framed nor any evidence was recorded. In such a situation it cannot be held that the criminal court has recorded any finding to the effect that the petitioner has not committed theft of electricity. That apart the purpose of a trial under section 39 44 of the Indian Electricity Act is entirely different and the object is to punish and sentence the person who is alleged to have committed the offence. The trial of an accused in a criminal case can have no bearing in the matter of assessment made in accordance with the tariff of the value of electricity dishonestly abstracted or consumed. Therefore the contention raised on the basis of alleged acceptance of the final report in the criminal case has absolutely no merit. 14. It is to be noted that in pursuance of the order passed on 27.9.1999 by the High Court in CWJC no 8939 of 1999 the chief engineer decided the matter holding that the petitioner had exceeded the contracted load and had also committed theft of electricity and consequently assessment of compensatory amount had to be done in accordance with clause 16.9 of the tariff. In terms of the order of the chief engineer the bill dated 29.10.1999 was prepared which was challenged by the petitioner by filing the writ petition before the High Court under Article 226 of the Constitution. The High Court was not hearing an appeal against the decision of the chief engineer. The scope of inquiry in such a matter is a limited one. We would like to quote here what was said by Venkatachaliah J. in State of U.P. Ors. v. Maharaja Dharmander Prasad Singh1 which reads as under However Judicial review under Article 226 cannot be converted into appeal. Judicial review is directed not against the decision but is confined to the examination of the decision making process. In Chief Constable of the North Wales Police v. Evans 1982 1 W.L.R. 1155 refers to the merits legality distinction in judicial review. Lord Hailsham said The purpose of judicial review is to ensure that the individual receives fair treatment and not to ensure that the authority after according fair treatment reaches on a matter which it is authorised by law to decide for itself a conclusion which is correct in the eyes of the Court. Lord Brightman observed ..........Judicial review as the words imply is not an appeal from a decision but a review of the manner in which the decision was made..... And held that it would be an error to think ..........that the Court sits in judgment not only on the correctness of the decision making process but also on the correctness of the decision itself . When the issue raised in judicial review is whether a decision is vitiated by taking into account irrelevant or neglecting to take into account of relevant factors or is so manifestly unreasonable that no reasonable authority entrusted with the power in question could reasonably have made such a decision the judicial review of the decision making process includes examination as a matter of law of the relevance of the factors............ 15. In Apparel Export Promotion Council v. A.K. Chopra1 Chief Justice Anand held as under Judicial Review not being an appeal from a decision but a review of the manner in which the decision was arrived at the court while exercising the power of judicial review must remain conscious of the fact that if the decision has been arrived at by the administrative authority after following the principles established by law and the rules of natural justice and the individual has received a fair treatment to meet the case against him the court cannot substitute its judgment for that of the administrative authority on a matter which fell squarely within the sphere of jurisdiction of that authority. 16. There is not dispute that the chief engineer issued notice to the petitioner mentioning all the relevant facts to which the petitioner gave a reply. The petitioner was also afforded an opportunity of hearing and it appeared through a counsel who made submissions on two days and thereafter the chief engineer passed the order. As discussed earlier the chief engineer has taken into consideration relevant factors and the findings recorded by him are clearly borne out from the material available before him. It cannot be said that the order passed by him is unreasonable or perverse in any manner. The High Court therefore rightly took the view that the order passed by the chief engineer that the compensatory bill is to be prepared in accordance with Clause 16.9 of the tariff could not be interfered with in a writ petition under Article 226 of the Constitution. 17. The Bihar State Electricity Board feels aggrieved by that part of the judgment and order of the Division Bench of the High Court by which it has been held that the surcharge cannot be levied at thrice the rate per unit and has accordingly filed civil appeal no. 8395 of 2002. Shri V.R. Reddy learned senior counsel for the electricity board has submitted that the cost of a unit of electricity is not fixed and on the contrary it is dependent upon the fuel surcharge. The formula for calculating the fuel surcharge is a long and complicated one and is given in Clause 16.10.3 of the tariff. A host of factors have to be taken into consideration in calculating the fuel surcharge and they depend upon many variables. Shri Reddy has submitted that since the surcharge has necessarily to be taken into consideration and has to be added in the cost of electricity and therefore in accordance with part III of clause 16.9 of the tariff it should also be assessed at three times the rate per unit. We are unable to accept the contention raised. Clauses 16.9 and 16.10.3 are separate and distinct clauses in the tariff. Clause 16.9 lays down the formula for calculating the value of the electrical energy abstracted or consumed by a consumer by exceeding the contracted load or by creating obstruction in running of meter. Part III of this Clause deals with method of charging the assessed units and sub para a thereof lays down that the consumption so assessed shall be charged at thrice the rate per unit of the tariff applicable to the consumer excluding the consumption recorded by the meter and the latter shall be charged at the appropriate tariff rates. Clause 16.10.3 is a separate clause which deals with fuel surcharge and it nowhere lays down that this additional surcharge will also be levied at thrice the rate per unit of the tariff. The two clauses namely 16.9 and 16.10.3 have to be read separately and there being no specific provision for assessing the fuel surcharge at thrice the rate per unit it is not possible to hold that in such a case the fuel surcharge should also be charged at thrice the rate per unit. 18. We are therefore of the opinion that the view taken by the High Court is perfectly correct and called for no interference. In the result both the appeals lack merit and are hereby dismissed. No costs. 0 HEADNOTE CRIMINAL LAW Criminal Procedure Code 1898 Sections 236 237 and 403 1 The Customs Act 1968 Sections 111 and 135 Gold Control Act 1968 Section 85 Whether the acquittal for the offences under the Customs Act operates as a bar to the prosecution of the same person in connection with the charge of having committed the offence under the Gold C2ontrol Act Tests to be applied Ingredients of the two offences are different in scope and content What is necessary is to analyze the ingredients of the two offences and not the allegations made in the two complaints Framing of alternative charge Held that if the ingredients of both the offences are satisfied the same act of possession of the gold would constitute an offence both under the Customs Act as also under the Gold Control Act 0 there is therefore no question of framing an alternative charge Judgment of the High Court holding that subsequent trial was barred set aside. Appeal allowed. Held i In order to successfully establish their plea of bar under Section 403 1 the concerned respondents will therefore have to establish that...... 1 there must have been a doubt as to whether the offence under the Customs Act could be proved or whether the offence under the Gold Control Act would be proved and 2 that in the context of this doubt an alternative charge could have been framed under Section 236. Now on a true interpretation of Section 236 it would appear that the Section WOULD BE ATTRACTED where the offence would fall either under one or the other of the two alternative charges. It WOULD NOT BE ATTRACTED if an offence could all under both of the alternative charges. What is contemplated by Section 236 if framing of an alternative charge where on the facts of the case an offence would fall under one of the two alternative charges but the act would not constitute an offence under both the charges. This point is made clear by the illustrations to Section 236. Para5 ii IIIustration a refers to framing of an alternative charge in respect of theft or receiving of stolen property or criminal breach of trust or cheating. It will be seen that a person cannot be said to have committed the offence both of theft as also of receiving of stolen property . A person who himself commits the theft cannot be guilty of the charge of receiving stolen property whereas a person who may have nothing to do with the commission of theft but who may be found in possession of the stolen property would be guilty of the offence of receiving stolen property . Now the prosecution cannot foresee whether the person from whose possession the stolen article was found was himself the thief or was merely a person who had received stolen property from the thief. A person cannot be found guilty of both theft as also for receiving stolen property . And it is in such a case that an alternative charge under Section 236 could be framed. In the present case the concerned respondents could be found guilty of both the offences in the context of the possession of gold. If it was established that there was a prohibition against the import of gold and that he was found in possession of gold which he knew or had reason to believe was liable to confiscation he would be guilty of that offence. He would also be guilty of an offence under the Gold Control Act provided the gold is of a purity of atleast 9 carats. He would have violated the provisions of both the Customs Act and the Gold Control Act if the aforesaid ingredients were established. It is not as if in case he was found guilty of an offence under the Customs Act he could not have been found guilty under the Gold Control Act or vice versa. Upon being found guilty of both the offences the Court may perhaps impose a concurrent sentence in respect of both the offences but the Court has also the power to direct that the sentence shall run consecutively. There is therefore no question of framing of an alternative charge one under the Customs Act and the other under the Gold Control Act. If the ingredients of both the offences are satisfied the same act of possession of the gold would constitute an offence both under the Customs Act as also under the Gold Control Act. Such being the position it cannot be said that they could have been tried on the same facts for an alternative charge in the context of Section 236 Cr. P.C. at the time of the former proceedings. The submission urged in the context of Section 403 1 cannot therefore succeed for it cannot be said that the persons who are sought to be tried in the subsequent proceedings could have been tried on the same facts at the former trial under section 236. Para 6 CASES REFERRED 1. Maqbool Hussain v The State of Bombay and Ors. etc. etc. 1953 S.C.R. Vol. IV p. 730 2. State of Bombay v S.L.Apte and Another 1961 3 SCR p.107 THAKKAR J. 1. Does the acquittal of an accused charged with having committed an offence punishable under Section 111 read with Section 135 of the Customs Act 1969 create a legal bar to the said accused subsequently being prosecuted under Section 85 of the Gold Control Act 1968. The High Court having answered this question in the affirmative against the prosecution and having directed the dropping of the subsequent proceedings on the premise that the acquittal in the former proceedings operated as a legal bar to the prosecution of the accused in the latter proceedings operated as a legal bar to the prosecution of the accused in the latter proceedings the State has approached this Court by way of the present appeal. 2. Respondents 1 to 3 came to be prosecuted as a result of a raid at their house in which primary gold valued at Rs. 84 770 at the material time was found along with some other articles. They were prosecuted for an offence punishable under section 111 read with Section 135 of the Customs Act 1969. In that case present respondent No.3 was convicted whereas present respondent Nos. 1 and 2 were acquitted. The same alleged offenders were later on sought to be prosecuted under Section 85 of the Gold Control Act 1968 relying on the find of primary gold from the very same premises at the time and on the occasion of the very same raid which gave rise to the prosecution under the Customs Act which had culminated in the conviction of respondent No. 3 and the acquittal of respondents 1 and 2. A contention was thereupon raised on behalf of respondents 1 to 3 that the new trial was barred. The Chief Judicial Magistrate accepted this plea and ordered that the prosecution be dropped. The learned Sessions Judge confirmed the said order. The appellant challenged the order passed by the learned trial Magistrate as confirmed by the learned Sessions Judge by way of a Revision Application to the High Court the High Court affirmed the decision of the Courts below holding that the present trial was barred by virtue of Section 403 1 of the Code of Criminal Procedure 1898 Cr. P.C. . Hence this appeal. In order to determine this question it is necessary to identify the ingredients which will have to be established by the prosecution in order to bring home the guilty under the different provisions. These ingredients may be catalogued as under Ingredients of the charge for the Ingredients of the charge for offence under Section 111 read with the offence under Sec. 85 of Sec. 135 of the Customs Act 1969 the Gold Control Act 1968 in respect of which the respondents for which the respondents are were acquitted. sought to be prosecuted. i Interalia being in possession The offender owns or has of or being concerned in keeping in his possession custody or concealing of goods which the or control any primary offender knows or has reason to gold of not less than 9 believe are liable to confiscation carats in purity in under Section 111. unfinished or semi finished form or in blocks bars etc. ii The goods in question gold was imported within the Indian Customs waters contrary to a prohibition contained under the Customs Act. iii There was a prohibition in respect of the import of gold at the material time as contemplated by Sec. 111 D of the Customs Act. 3. It is therefore evident that the ingredients required to be established in respect of the offence under the Customs Act are altogether different from the ones required to be established for an offence under the Gold Control Act. In respect of the former the prosecution has to establish that there was a prohibition against the import into Indian sea waters of goods which were found to be in the possession of the offender. On the other hand in respect of the offence under the Gold Control Act it is required to be established that the offender was in possession of primary gold meaning thereby gold of a purity of not less than 9 carats in any unfinished or semi finished form. In regard to the latter offence it is not necessary to establish that there is any prohibition against the import of gold into Indian sea waters. Mere possession of gold of purity not less than 9 carats in any unfinished or semi finished form would be an offence under the Gold Control Act. It is therefore stating the obvious to say that the ingredients of the two offences are altogether different. Such being the case the question arises whether the acquittal for the offences under the Customs Act which requires the prosecution to establish altogether different ingredients operates as bar to the prosecution of the same person in connection with the charge of having committed the offence under the Gold Control Act. 4. Reliance has been placed on Section 403 1 of the Code of Criminal Procedure 1898 Cr. P.C. in support of the plea that the prosecution under the Gold Control Act would be barred on the basis of the undermentioned facts i that the respondents had been tried by a competent Court for the offence of being in possession of gold under the Customs Act and had been acquitted. ii they are sought to be prosecuted on the same facts for an offence under the Gold Control Act. It is not in dispute that the respondents were tried and acquitted for the offence under the Customs Act in connection with the possession of a quantity of gold. Their trial would be barred by Section 403 1 provided they are sought to be prosecuted on same facts for any offence for which a different charge from the one made against them might have been made under Section 236 and for which they might have been convicted under Section 237. 5. In order to successfully establish their plea of bar under Section 403 1 the concerned respondents will therefore have to establish that i It was doubtful as to which of the several offences the facts which could be proved by the prosecution would consitute. ii And they could have been charged in the alternative with having committed one or other of the said offences. In other words what they would be required to establish would be that 1 there must have been a doubt as to whether the offence under the Customs Act could be proved or whether the offence under the Gold Control Act would be proved and 2 that in the context of this doubt an alternative charge could have been framed under Section 236. Now on a true interpretation of Section 236 it would appear that the Section WOULD BE ATTRACTED where the offence would fall either under one or the other of the two alternative charges. It WOULD NOT BE ATTRACTED if an offence could fall under both of the alternative charges. What is contemplated by Section 236 if framing of an alternative charge where on the facts of the case an offence would fall under one of the two alternative charges but the act would not constitute an offence under both the charges. This point is made clear by the illustrations to Section 236 viz a A is accused of an act which may amount to theft or receiving stolen property or criminal breach of trust of cheating. He may be charged with theft receiving stolen property criminal breach of trust and cheating or he may be charged with having committed theft or receiving stolen property or criminal breach of trust or cheating. b A states on oath before the Magistrate that he saw B hit C with a club. Before the Sessions Court A states on oath that B never hit C. A may be charged in the alternative and convicted of intentionally giving false evidence although it cannot be proved which of these contradictory statements was false. 6. Illustration a refers to framing of an alternative charge in respect of theft or receiving of stolen property or criminal breach of trust or cheating. It will be seen that a person cannot be said to have committed the offence both of theft as also of receiving of stolen property . A person who himself commits the theft cannot be guilty of the charge of receiving stolen property whereas a person who may have nothing to do with the commission of theft but who may be found in possession of the stolen property would be guilty of the offence of receiving stolen property . Now the prosecution cannot foresee whether the person from whose possession the stolen article was found was himself the thief or was merely a person who had received stolen property from the thief. A person cannot be found guilty of both theft as also for receiving stolen property . And it is in such a case that an alternative charge under Section 236 could be framed. In the present case the concerned respondents could be found guilty of both the offences in the context of the possession of gold. If it was established that there was a prohibition against the import of gold and that he was found in possession of gold which he knew of had reason to believe was liable to confiscation he would be guilty of that offence. He would also be guilty of an offence under the Gold Control Act provided the gold is of a purity of atleast 9 carats. He would have violated the provisions of both the Customs Act and the Gold Control Act if the aforesaid ingredients were established. It is not as if in case he was found guilty of an offence under the Customs Act he could not have been found guilty under the Gold Control Act or vice versa. Upon being found guilty of both the offences the Court may perhaps impose a concurrent sentence in respect of both the offences but the Court has also the power to direct that the sentence shall run consecutively. There is therefore no question of framing of an alternative charge one under the Customs Act and the other under the Gold Control Act. If the ingredients or both the offences are satisfied the same act of possession of the gold would constitute an offence both under the Gold Control Act. Such being the position it cannot be said that they could have been tried on the same facts for an alternative charge in the context of Section 236 Cr. P.C. at the time of the former proceedings.The submission urged in the context of Section 403 1 cannot therefore succeed for it cannot be said that the persons who are sought to be tried in the subsequent proceedings could have been tried on the same facts at the former trial under section 236. 7. Strong reliance has been placed on behalf of the respondents on MAQBOOL HUSSAIN VS. THE STATE OF BOMBAY ORS. ETC. ETC.in support of the submission that the second prosecution is barred. In Maqbool s case the central issue in the context of the fact that a person who had arrived at an Indian Airport from abroad on being searched was found in possession of gold in contravention of the relevant notification prohibiting the import of gold. Action was taken against him by the Customs authorities and the gold seized from his possession was confiscated. Later on a prosecution was launched against him in the criminal court a Bombay charging him with having committed the offence under Section 8 of the Foreign Exchange Regulation Act Act 7 of 1947 read with the relevant notification. In the background of these facts the plea of autrefois acquit was raised seeking protection under Article 20 2 of the Constitution of India. This Court came to the conclusion that the proceedings before the Customs authority did not constitute the prosecution of the appellant. The Court also took the view that the penalty imposed on him did not constitute a punishment by the judicial tribunal. The ratio of the decision is altogether different and has no application in so far as the plea raised by the respondents is concerned. However reliance is placed on certain observations made in the course of the discussion at p. 737. To quote The test is whether the former offence and the offence now charged have the same ingredients in the sense that the facts constituting the one are sufficient to justify a conviction of the other not that the facts relied on by the Crown are the same in the two trials. A plea of autrefois acquit is not proved unless it is shown that the verdict of acquittal of the previous charge necessarily involves an acquittal the latter. Vide Halsbury s Laws of England Hailsham Edition Vol.9 pages 152 and 153 paragraph 212 . Emphasis added We have already applied the very test indicated in this passage. But we have reached the conclusion that in the present case this test does not support the respondents submission in as much as the ingredients of the two offences are different in scope and content. The facts constituting the offence under Customs Act are different and are not sufficient to justify the conviction under the Gold Control Act. It must also be realized that what is necessary is to analyze the ingredients of the two offences and not the allegations made in the two complaints as declared by this Court in STATE OF BOMBAY VS. S.L. APTE ANOTHER. 8. We have also concluded that a separate charge could have been framed in respect of the distinct offence under Gold Control Act Under the circumstances the plea raised by the difence cannot succeed. The two conclusions reached by us squarely brings the matter squarely within the parameters of the law settled by this Court decades ago in S.L. Apte s case Supra . In that case the element of dishonesty was required to be established under section 409 of Indian Penal Code whereas it was not required to be established under Section 105 of the Indian Insurance Act. In this backdrop this Court has enunciated the law in the context of the plea based on Article 20 2 of the Constitution Section 26 of the General Clauses Act and section 403 2 of the Criminal Procedure Code in no uncertain terms If therefore the offences were distinct there is no question of the rule as to double jeopardy as embodied in Art. 20 2 of the Constitution being applicable. The next point to be considered is as regards the scope of s.26 of the General Clauses Act. Though ss.26 in its opening words refers to the act or omission constituting an offence under two or more enactments the emphasis is not on the facts alleged in the ingredients which constitute the two offences with which a person is charged. This is made clear by the concluding portion of the section which refers to shall not be liable to be punished twice for the same offece . If the offences are not the same but are distinct the ban imposed by this provision also cannot be invoked. It therefore follows that in the present case as the respondents are not being sought to be punished for the same offence twice but for two distinct offences constituted or made up of different ingredients the bar of the provision is inapplicable. In passing it may be pointed out that the construction we have placed on Art. 20 2 of the Constitution and s.26 of the General Clauses Act is precisely in line with the terms of s.403 2 of the Criminal Procedure Code which runs 403 2 A person acquitted or convicted of any offence may be afterwards tried for any distinct offence for which a separate charge might have been made against him on the former trial under section 235 sub section 1 . There is no manner of doubt that section 403 1 does not come to rescue of the respondents 1 to 3 whereas section 403 2 of the Code clearly concludes the matter against them. 9. The High Court was therefore in error in holding that subsequent trial was barred. We accept the appeal on this point and reverse the decision of the Courts below and the High Court. The appellant was understandably seriously aggrieved by the crroneous enunciation of law by the High Court as it would cause prejudice in other matters involving the same point which may have been pending or might arise in future. With the position of law being now setted in the appellant s favour the main objective of the appellant is achieved. Learned counsel for the appellant indicated at the very commencement that the main purpose of the appeal was to have the true position in law setted. That 20 years have elapsed since the date of the seizure November 15 1968 is in our opinion no ground for not proceeding further with the matter inasmuch as the offence in question is a serious economic offence which undermines the entire economy of the Nation. The delay occasioned in the working of the judicial system by the ever increasing workload cannot provide an alibi for upholding such a plea. However in the present case the sessions Court has quashed the proceedings not only on this ground but also on the basis of certain factual findings as well and the learned Counsel for the appellant himself found it difficult to assail these findings at this juncture. The operative order passed by the High Court cannot therefore be disturbed in view of the facts and circumstances peculiar to this particular case. We accordingly allow the appeal to this extent and reverse the findings of the Lower Court and High Court on the question of maintainability of the subsequent prosecution but find ourselves unable to pass any further orders under the circumstances. 0 CROSS CITATION 1972 SCC 3 885 1973 SCR 1 880 CRIMINAL APPELLATE JURISDICTION Cr.A. No. 212 of 1968. Appeals by special leave from the judgment and order dated January 19 1968 ofthe Rajasthan High Court inCrl. Revision No. 383 of 1967. S. P. Singh and Shiv Pujan Singh for the appellant. Debabroto Mookerjee P. C. Kapur and K. B. Mehta for the respondent. The Judgment of the Court was delivered by Khanna J. Ayodhya Singh appellant and Hira Singhwere convicted by Additional Munsiff MagistrateJaipur for offences under section 457 and 380 read with section 75 IndianPenal Code. Ayodhya Singh was sentenced to undergo rigorous imprisonment for a period of two years and to pay a fine of rupees two thousand for the offence under section 457 read with section 75 Indian Penal Code. In default of payment of fine Ayodhya Singh was sentenced to undergo rigorous imprisonment for a further period ofsix months. Similar sentence wasawarded to Ayodhya Singh for the offence under section 380 read with section 75 Indian Penal Code. The two sentences were ordered to run consecutively. Hira Singh was sentenced to undergo rigorousimprisonment for a period of two years and to pay a fine of rupees one thousand or in default to undergo rigorousimprisonment for afurther period of six months for the offence under section 457 read with section 75 Indian Penal Code. Similar sentence was awarded to Hira Singh for the offence under section 380 read with section 75 Indian Penal Code. The two sentences of Hira Singh were also ordered to run consecutively. Appeals filed by Ayodhya Singh andHira Singh were dismissed by Additional Sessions Judge Jaipur. Revision petitions filed by Ayodhya Singh and 7 L173Sup.C.I. 73 882 Hira Singh in Rajasthan High Court met with no better fate. Ayodhya Singh thereafter filed this appeal by special leave through jail. The prosecution case is that Kistoor Chand PW 73 deals in gold and silver. He was running a shop inJohri bazar Jaipur but sometime before the occurrence he had to vacate the shop and remove the gold and silver ornaments worth over a lakh of rupees to his house situated in Manni Ramji kaRasta in Jaipur City.The house has four storeyes and the ornaments were put in a room on the third storey of the house. Cash amount was also kept by Kistoor Chand inthat room. When Kistoor Chand got up on the morning of February 9 1964 he found that the big window of the room in which ornaments had been kept was lying open. On opening the room it was found that the boxes containing ornaments were lying empty. A number of articles were seen scattered in the room.Reportabout the occurrence was lodged at police station Manak Chowk Jaipur City by Mahindra Kumar PW74 son of Kistoor Chand at 7 30 a.m. on February 9 1964. A case was then registered by the police under sections 457 and 380 Indian Penal Code. Sub Inspector Basarat Vallabh went soon after the registration of the case to Kistoor Chand s house and found that culpritshad effected their entry into the room by breaking open the window. The Sub Inspector saw a number of articles scattered in the room. The containers for keeping gold and silver ornaments were lying empty. A police photographer was sent for. The photographer developed the fingerprints left by the culprits on a silver plate lying in an almirah of the room. The photographs of the finger impressions were compared with the specimen finger impressions of Hira Singh accused and it was found that they tallied with each other. Hira Singh accused was arrested on February 21 1964. In pursuance of disclosure statement of Hira Singh Rs. 1 790 were recovered from Saraswati Bai wife of the brother of Hira Singh. A box was also recovered in pursuance of the disclosure statement of Hira Singh and a number of stolen articles werefound in that box. Hira Singh also got recovered an instrument of house breaking. As a result of the interrogation of Hira Singh the police raided the house of Ayodhya Singh appellant at Jairi on February 21 1964 and recovered from that place 18 stolen articles. Ayodhya Singh was arrested by the police on February 25 1964 at Etawah and from his personal search 26 items of stolen property were recovered. The recovered property included cash amount of Rs. 6 485 including 28 currency notes ofthe denominationof Rs. 100 . In pursuance of information supplied by 883 Ayodhya Singh the police recovered on March 3 1964 a numberof stolen gold articles wrapped in anold baniyan which had been buried in a graveyard near milestone No. 5 on the Agra Etawah Kanpur road. Identifications of recovered ornaments were held by Shri A. C. Bafna Magistrate PW 72 on July 17 1964 and July 20 1964. The recovered ornaments were then identified by Kistoor Chand and Mahendra Kumar PWs as those which belonged to them and which had been stolen. At the trialthe two accused denied the prosecution allocations against them and stated that they hadbeen falsely involved in this case. According to them the various articles which had been recovered bythe police belonged to them. Regarding the recovery of some goldbars from him the appellant stated that he got the bars prepared for the purpose of purchasing bonds. Thetrial court accepted the prosecution case and convicted and sentenced the accused as above.The recovered articles were ordered to be restored to Mahendra Kumar complainant.Appeals and revision petitions filed by the accused as stated earlier were dismissed. We have heard Mr. Singh who has argued thecase amicus curiaeon behalf of the appellant and are ofthe opinion that there is no merit in the appeal.The fact thatsome persons had broken into the house of Kistoor Chand on the night betweenFebruary 8 and February 9 1964 and had removed valuable articles consisting of cash jewellery and silverware is proved by the testimony of Kistoor Chand and Mahindra Kumar. The prosecution has also ledevidence to show that a number of stolen articles were recovered in pursuance of the disclosure statement of Hira Singh accused after he was arrested on February 21 1964. The interrogation of Hira Singh led to the police raid on the house of Ayodhya Singh appellant wherefrom a number of stolen articles wererecovered. Ayodhya Singh wasarrested on February 25 1964 and some of the stolen articleswere recovered from his person. Ayodhya Singh thereaftermade disclosure statement which led to the recovery ofmore stolenarticles from a graveyard on March 3 1964. The appellate court and the High Court accepted the evidence adduced by the prosecution in this respect. The version of the accused that the recovered articles belonged tothem was rejected. The courts below in this content reliedupon the identification of the recovered articles by Kistoor Chand and Mahindra Kumar. Nothing has been brought to our noticeby Mr. Singh as may justify interference with the appraisement of the evidence of the trial magistrate the Additional Sessions Judge and theHigh Court. One significant circumstance which shows the falsity of the claim made by the appellant that the recovered articles belonged to him is the fact that some of those articles were recovered from a graveyard near milestone No. 5 at AgraEtawahKanpur road. The articles were found to havebeen buried there 884 and were recovered in pursuance of the disclosure statement of the appellant. If the aforesaid recovered articles consisting ofgold bars belonged to the appellant it is difficult to believe that he would have buried them in a lonelyspot in a graveyard. The fact that the appellant buriedthem in a graveyard shows hisanxiety to conceal those articles so that no one may know that he was in possession of those articles. Mr. Singh has assailed the propriety of the identification of the recovered articles. In this respect we find that the evidence of Shri A. C. Bafna Magistrate PW 72 showsthat the recoveredarticles weremixed with other similar articles and all necessary precautions were taken. Kistoor Chand and Mahindra Kumar correctly identified the recovered articles. Nothing cogent has been shown to us as to why the statement of Shri Bafna in this respect be not accepted. Mr. Singh has referred to the observations of the High Court that the judgments of thetrial magistrate and the Additional Sessions Judge were not very satisfactory.This circumstance in our opinion is not very material because the High Court considered the evidence which hadbeen adduced in the caseat some length and came to the conclusion that the case against the accused hadbeen proved. In view of the fact that the evidence on record has been discussed in detail by the High Court it cannot be said that the appellant has been prejudiced because of the fact that the judgments of the trialmagistrate and the appellate court were not as elaborate as theyshouldhave been. A faint attempt was made by Mr. Singh to show that there had been misjoinder of charges. This submission is plainly without any force because the circumstances of the case show that the accused jointly committed the offences with which they were charged and that those offences were committed in the course of the same transaction. The two accused could consequently be. charged and tried together as such a course is permitted by section 239 of the Codeof Criminal Procedure. Lastly it has been argued that the conviction of the appellant should have been under section 411 Indian Penal Code and not under sections 457 and 380 Indian Penal Code. This contention is equally untenable.The house breaking and theft in the house of Kistoor Chand took place on the night between February 8 and February 9 1964.The various stolen articles were recovered from the appellant s house on February 21 1964 and thereafter from his person on February 25 1964. The appellant was in police custody after February 25 1964 and more stolen articles were recovered on March 3 1964 from the graveyard in pursuance of his disclosure statement. The articles which were recovered on March 3 1964 can consequently be held to be in the possession of the appellant on February 25 1694. It would 885 thus follow that within 17 days of the theft the appellant was found in possession of the stolen articles. According to illustration a of section 114 of the Indian Evidence Act a man who is in possession of stolen goods soon after the theft is either the thief or hasreceived the goods knowing them to be stolen unless he can account for his possession. It would in our opinion depend upon the facts and circumstances of each case whether the court should draw the presumption that a person found in possession of stolen goods soon after the theft and who has not been able to account for his possession is the thief or whether he is the receiver of the goods knowing them to be stolen. We may state at this stage that the appellant has not been able to account for his possession of the stolen articles and the explanation furnished by him is not all worthy of credence. Looking to the facts and circumstances of the case we are of the view that the courts below were justified in drawing the presumption that the appellant was guilty of the offence under section 457 and 380 Indian Penal Code. The factthat the culprits entered the room on the third floor by opening the window and thereafter broke open a large number of boxes and almirahsand removed huge quantity of gold and silverware shows that it was not the work of a single individual. The fact that the appellant was foundsoon after the theft in possession of a very large number of stolen articles shows that he was himself the thief and not the receiver of stolen goods.The present isnot acase wherein one or two or a very few of the stolen articles were found in the possession of the appellant soon after the theft. On the contrary the bulk of stolen articleswere recovered from him. The number and the nature of the stolen articles recovered from the appellant soon after the theft coupled with the other circumstances of the case in our opinion warrant the presumption that the appellant himself committed thetheft after entering the room on the third storey of Kistoor Chand s house through the window. In the result the appeal fails and is dismissed. S.C. Appeal dismissed. 886 0 CROSS CITATION 1965 SC 585 5 1962 SCR Supl. 1 8 CRIMINAL APPELLATE JURISDICTION Criminal Appeal No. 31 of 1961. Appeal by special leave from the judgment and order dated October 7 1958 of the Andhra Pradesh High Court in Criminal Appeal No. 456 of 1957. P . Ram Reddy for the appellants. Ratna Raoand K R. Choudhri for respondent No 1. A. Ganganatham Chetty and T.M. Sen. for respondent No.2. 1961. October 5. The Judgment of the Court was delivered by HIDAYATULLAH J. The two appellants who were granted special leave by this Court appeal against the judgment of the High Court of Andhra Pradesh convicting them on appeal against acquittal of an offence under. 380 of the Indian Penal Code and sentencing them to six months rigorous imprisonment and a fine Rs. 500 each with further rigorous imprisonment for one month in default of payment of fine. The prosecution case which had a chequered career in the High Court and the two Courts below is as follows In Dusi which is a partof Bhaskararaopuram there was a Press knownas Srinivasa Printing Press at Srinivasa Ashram. This Press existed for over 17 years. Pappala Chinna Ramadasu P.W.4 was admittedly a printer and for some years the declared keeper of that Press under s. 4 of the Press and Registration of Books Act 1867. The declarations were made in 1944 Ex.P.4 and 1947 Ex.P 5 . On November 21 1955 10 Pappala ChinnaRamadasu soldthis press by a registered document Ex.P. 1 to one Boddepalli Lakshminarayana forRs 4 000 of which Rs.3 500 were shown to have been paid in advance and the balance was received by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu on January10 1956 Ex.P.2 . Two applications were then made on December 1 1955 respectively by Chinna Ramadasu andBoddepalli Lakshminarayana beforethe Collector and District Magistrate for substituting the name of Boddepalli Lakshminarayana in place of that of Pappala Chinna Ramadasu in the declaration. On December 6 1955 by Ex.P.11 they were informed that they should apply under the Pressand Registration of Books Act 25 of 1867 . Subsequently on January 11 1956 a declaration under s. 4 of that Act was made by Boddepalli Lakshminarayana and was accepted Ex.P.3 . The case of the prosecution further is that Boddepalli Lakshminarayana went to Kurnoolon March 20 1956 and in hisabsence the two appellants with two others who wereprosecuted but acquitted removed the Printing Press on the night of March 25 1956 to Korlakota where the first appellant Apparao resides. A report of the offence Ex.P 13 purporting to be writtenon March 27 1956 was handed in at the police station house on the following day at 8 P.m. The policetook no action anda complaint was therefore filed on April 4 1956 by Boddepalli Laksminarayana. The Judicial Second class Magistrate Srikakulam convicted the two appellants of an offence under 8. 380 of the Indian Penal Code and acquitted the two others with whom we are not concerned and sentenced each of theappellants to imprisonment till the rising of theCourt and a fine of Rs. 250 with simple imprisonment for one month in default. On appeal the Additional District and Sessions Judge Srikakulam set aside the conviction and acquitted them. The complainant then obtained special leave of the High Court to file 11 appeal againstthis acquittal and the High Court reversed theacquittal asalready indicated above. In support of the prosecutioncase the complainant examined four witnesses including himself. Pappala Chinna Ramadasu was examined as P.W.4 to prove that he had sold the Pressto Boddepalli Lakshminarayana and two other witnesses wereexamined to prove theremoval of the Printing Press by the appellants. The defence of the appellants was as follows According to them the Press originally belonged to oneGovindachari and on October 25 1947 he transferred it to Kuna Appala Naidu by Ex. D 2. In the registered sale deed then executed Govindachari was joined formally by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu. The sale was for Rs. 6 400 and on the same day a promissory note was executed by Kuna Appala Naidu in favour of Govindachari which was attested by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu. Subsequently Appala Naidu made payments of certain amounts and endorsements on tho promissory note showing these payments were signed by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu as a witness. Kuna Appala Naidu was examinedas D.W.1 and he stated that the name of Pappala ChinnaRamadasu was formally included in the transfer deed since the declaration stood in his name. He also stated that the deed Ex. D.2 was signed as witness by one Akkala Naidu who died years before the present controversy started. Kuna Appala Naidu later sold the Press to the second appellant and one Sri K. Sriramda and the second appellant continued in possessionas owner. Pappala ChinnaRamadas continued as the printer and his declaration as the keeper of the Press also continued. In 1953 Pappala Chinna Ramadasu left the Press for good. The Press was leased out by thesecond appellant to one Appanna and this leave continued till 1956. On March 19 1956 an agreement for leave was executed in favour of the first appellant and on March 26 1956 a registered deed was duly 12 executed. According to the appellants the Press WAS removed during the day on March 27 and the lease amount was paidon the28th. According to them the second appellant was the owner in law and infact of the Press and the first appellant was the lessee and had removed the Press in the bona fide exercise ofhis right as lessee. The appellants examined eight witnesses in support of their case. The case of the prosecution hinged upon the evidence of Pappala Chinna Ramadasu when confronted with Ex. D 2 he denied his signature and stated evasively that he could not identify the signaturesof Govindachari and Appala Naidu. He admitted however that Appanna used to look after the Press after 1953 though he said that he used to visit the Press oncein two or three months before he soldit to P.W.1 and that the correspondence used to be made in his name.He also stated that he had purchased the Press from the Madras Type Foundry Co. for RH. 9 107 but that the bills were lost and he added that they were taken away along with the Press when it was removed. The case of the appellants rested upon the proof of the signature of Pappala Chinna Ramadasu on Es. D 2 and additionally the proof of the signature of Akkala Naidu beoause if Akkala Naidu signed the document in 1947 and died some four years before the present controversy started there would be goodreasonto think that a document of this character couldnot be a fabricated one. The appellants examined a handwriting expert Sri B. R. Singh D.W.8 . He statedcategoricallythat Ex.D 2bore tho signature ofPappala Chimla Ramadasu. The signature of Akkala Naidu was proved by his son Sri Rangam. He identified the signature of his father not only on that document but also on Ex. D 3 the promissory Dote. He also stated that h father had died in 1951. From thismaterial the Additional District and Sessions Judge Srikakulam found that Ex D 2 13 was not a forged document as was suggested but was amply proved as genuine by Pappala Chandrudu D.W 4 and the combined evidence of Sri Rangam D. W.3 andSri B.R. Singh D. W. 8 .He therefore held that Pappala Chinna Ramadasu had no right to sell the Pres in 1955 to Boddepalli Lakshminarayana and that his connection with the Press had effectively ceased from. 1953 even as a mere printer. It is unnecessary to examine whether this finding or the finding given by the Judicial SecondClass Magistrate Srikakulam who held otherwise wasthe correct inferencefrom the. facts. The learned Judge of the High Court who heard the appeal against the acquittal said nothing about Ex. D 2. According to him the removal of the Pressamounted to theft even though the appellants removed it under a bona fide claim of right. In this statement of the law the learned Judge was with respect clearly in error. This is what the learned Judge observed Further to a charge of theft the plea that the property was removed under a bona fide claim of right would not avail. For example aperson who bona fide believes that the fountain pen on his neighbour s desk is his has no right in law to trespass into the neighbour s houseand snatch away the pen without the latter s content. The first of the statements is certainly not the law. It is settled law that where abona fide claim of right exists it can be a good defence to a prosecution for theft. An act does not amount to theft unless there be not only no legal right but no appearance or colour of alegal right. in 2 East .659 the law was stated a long time ago thus If there be in the prisoner any fair pretence of property of right or if it be brought into doubt at all the court will direct an acquittal. 14 And accordingto I Hale P.C. 509 the best evidence is that the goodswere taken quite openly. The law thus stated by East and Hale has not been altered inmoderntimes.There are numerous casesin which Courts in India have recognised a bone fide claim of right as a defence to the charge of theft. See Ratanlal law of Crimes 19th Ed. p. 933. We are not concerned in this case with the declaration under the Press and Registrationof Books Act. A declaredkeeper of the Press is not necessarily the owner thereof so as to be able to confertitle to thePress upon another. The ownership of the Press is a matter of the general law and must follow that law. Whether Pappala Chinna Ramadasu was not only the declared keeper of thePress but also its owner can onlybe effectively decided by theCivil Court. For purposes of Criminal law the evidence prima facie pointed to a transferof thePress by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu and Govindachari to Kuna Appala Naidu. The evidence prima facie also established that the appellants had taken possession of the Press under a bona fide claim of right and that in ouropinion. was sufficient to dispose of the present case. The Additional District and Sessions Judge Srikakulam had rightly held that the matter was for the decision of the Civil Court and that this was not a case of theft under the Indian Penal Code and had rightly directed the acquittal of the appellants. The learned Judge of the High Court considered the declarationby Pappala Chinna Ramadasu which continued Unchanged as sufficient to prove anoffence of theft. In our opinion in tho circumstances and in the light of the finding given by the District and Sessions Judgewith regard to Ex. D 2 it was necessary to go further to see what right Pappala Chinna Ramadasu had to the Press at all. If this had been considered the learned Judge would have seen that there was some doubt the rightof Pappala Chinna Ramadasu 15 to transfer the Press in 1955 toBoddepalli Lakshminarayana and further that the defence that the appellantstook possession of the Press under a bona. fide claim of right was a good defence entitling them to an acquittal. In the result this appeal must succeed. The convictions ofthe appellantsand the sentences passed on them are set aside they are acquitted and their bail bonds shall stand discharged. The fines if realised are ordered to be remitted. Appeal allowed. 0 HEADNOTE SERVICE AND LABOUR LAWS Industrial Dispute Act 1947 Section 11A Natural Justice Termination Effect of acquittal in criminal case Theft of Face Milling Cutter Respondents caught in factory premises Enquiry officer held charges proved but respondents acquitted in criminal case Labour Court while holding that departmental enquiry was legal and proper also held that initiation of enquiry before disposal of criminal case was against principles of natural justice and hence termination was not justified specially when accused is acquitted by Criminal Court. Held when Labour Court upheld the departmental enquiry as being legal and proper then it should have confined itself to deciding the legality of dismissal order as per the provisions of Section 11A. Labour Court did not consider the law laid down by Apex Court in The Workmen of M s Firestone Tyre Rubber Co. of India Pvt. Ltd. s case. It even erred in holding that since appellant failed to lead any evidence to prove the charge in Labour Court dismissal orders were liable to be set aside. HELD When we examine the legality and the correctness of the Awards of the Labour Court we are of the considered opinion that the Labour Court having held and indeed rightly that the departmental enquiry conducted by the appellant was legal and proper committed an error in holding that the departmental enquiry got vitiated due to criminal court s order which had acquitted the respondents from the charge of theft. In our opinion there was no occasion for the Labour Court to examine this issue once the departmental enquiry was held legal and proper. The Labour Court in our opinion committed yet another error in holding that since the appellant failed to lead any evidence to prove the charge in Labour Court therefore the dismissal orders of respondents are liable to be set aside. This finding in our opinion was again not legally sustainable. Para 16 In other words the Labour Court should have then confined its enquiry to examine only one limited question as to whether the punishment given to the respondents was in any way disproportionate to the gravity of the charge leveled against them and this the Labour Court should have examined by taking recourse to the provisions of Section 11 A of the Industrial Dispute Act 1947 in short the Act and the law laid down by this Court in the case of The Workmen of M s Firestone Tyre Rubber Co. of India Pvt. Ltd. v. The Management Ors. 1973 1 SCC 813 . It was however not done thereby rendering the order of Labour Court legally unsustainable. Para 18 Natural justice Whether initiation of departmental enquiry should be only after decision of Criminal Court otherwise it would be against the principle of natural justice. Held criminal proceeding and departmental proceedings are two separate proceedings in law. Standard of proof required in domestic enquiry is different from that required in criminal case. In domestic enquiry it is pre ponderance of probabilities. In this case dismissal order was not based on Criminal Court s judgement. It was based on domestic enquiry which every employer has a right to conduct independently of criminal case. Divisional Controller Karnataka State Road Transport Corporation s JT 2011 13 SC 247 case relied. HELD The Labour Court should have seen that the dismissal order of the respondents was not based on the criminal Court s judgment and it could not be so for the reason that it was a case of acquittal. It was however based on domestic enquiry which the employer had every right to conduct independently of the criminal case. Para 20 This Court has consistently held that in a case where the enquiry has been held independently of the criminal proceedings acquittal in criminal Court is of no avail. It is held that even if a person stood acquitted by the criminal Court domestic enquiry can still be held the reason being that the standard of proof required in a domestic enquiry and that in criminal case are altogether different. In a criminal case standard of proof required is beyond reasonable doubt while in a domestic enquiry it is the preponderance of probabilities. See Divisional Controller Karnataka State Road Transport Corporation v. M.G. Vittal Rao jt 2011 13 SC 247 . Para 21 In the light of this settled legal position the Labour Court was not right in holding that the departmental enquiry should have been stayed by the appellant awaiting the decision of the criminal Court and that it is rendered illegal consequent upon passing of the acquittal order by the criminal Court. This finding of the Labour Court is therefore also not legally sustainable. Para 22 Dismissal Labour court held departmental proceedings to have got vitiated due to acquittal in criminal proceeding In writ High Court held enquiry to be legal but remanded the matter without directing as to what Labour Court has to decide after remand and why Writ Court could not decide such issues. Held High Court erred in doing so. Writ Court should have examined the question itself which it had left for consideration i.e. whether order of dismissal was commensurate with the charges or interference was required under Section 11 of the Act. Shankar Chakravarti s case referred. HELD Now coming to the order of writ Court Single Judge though in our opinion the Single Judge rightly held the departmental enquiry as being legal and proper but committed an error in remanding the case to the Labour Court without precisely saying as to what the Labour Court has to decide after remand and why writ Court cannot decide such issues in the writ petition. We find that the Single Judge in concluded para of the order remanded the whole case afresh for its decision on merits. Para 23 In our considered view the Single Judge Writ Court having held the enquiry to be legal and proper instead of remanding the case to the Labour Court should have himself examined the short question which had survived for consideration in the writ petition namely whether the punishment of dismissal was commensurate with the charges or it required any interference by the Court under Section 11 A of the Act. Para 24 Dismissal order Whether justified when acquittal was recorded in criminal proceedings Departmental enquiry held to be legal and proper Respondent was found committing theft while on duty. Held act of theft by employee while on duty is a serious charge which stood proved in enquiry. Hence employer was justified in dismissing the employee from service. Plea that employee was acquitted in criminal case hence reinstatement should be ordered has no merit. Dismissal order was not passed on the basis of conviction of employee by the Criminal Court which was later set aside by Superior Court. Findings were based on preponderance of probabilities and could be recorded by the enquiry officer notwithstanding the order of acquittal by Criminal Court. Dismissal order held to be legal and proper. Division Bench High Court erred in ordering reinstatement and restoration of the order of Labour Court. HELD An act of theft committed by an employee while on duty is a serious charge. This charge once proved in enquiry the employer is justified in dismissing the employee from service. Para 29 Dismissal orders had not been passed on the basis of employees conviction by the criminal Court which later stood set aside by the superior Court. Had it been so then the situation would have been different because once the conviction order is set aside by the superior Court the dismissal order which was solely based on passing of the conviction order also stands set aside. Such was not the case here. Para 31 In the case on hand the appellant employer had conducted the departmental enquiry in accordance with law independently of the criminal case wherein the Enquiry Officer on the basis of the appreciation of evidence brought on record in the enquiry proceedings came to a conclusion that a charge of theft against the delinquent employees was proved. This finding was based on preponderance of probabilities and could be recorded by the Enquiry Officer notwithstanding the order of criminal Court acquitting the respondents. Para 32 CASES REFERRED 1. Divisional Controller Karnataka State Road Transport Corporation v. M.G. Vittal Rao JT 2011 13 SC 247 Para 21 2. Shankar Chakravarti v. Britannia Biscuits Co. Ltd. Anr. AIR 1979 SC 1652 Para 25 3. The Workmen of M s Firestone Tyre Rubber Co. of India Pvt. Ltd. v. The Management Ors. 1973 1 SCC 813 Para 18 ABHAY MANOHAR SAPRE J. 1. These appeals are filed against the common final judgment and order dated 16.04.2007 passed by the High Court of Judicature at Madras in Writ Appeal Nos.3789 of 2003 and 3790 of 2003 whereby the High Court allowed the appeals filed by the respondents and directed the appellant to reinstate the respondents with continuity of service and other attendant benefits but without payment of back wages. 2. In order to appreciate the issues involved in these two appeals it is necessary to set out the facts in detail. 3. The appellant in both the appeals is a Public Sector undertaking known as Bharat Heavy Electricals Ltd. BHEL . It has a plant at Ranipet in District Vellore Tamil Nadu. M. Mani Respondent in Civil Appeal No.10766 2013 and T.A. Mathivanan since dead and represented by his legal representatives respondent in connected Civil Appeal No.10767 2013 were the employees of BHEL at all relevant time and were working as Driver Grade II in the plant. 4. On 17.02.1991 both the respondents were on duty in the night shift in the Plant. They were supposed to remain present all the time in the Transport Department of the Plant so that on receiving the call they would attend the place of call with their respective vehicles. 5. It was however noticed by the officials concerned on duty that both the respondents were not found present on their respective seats and instead were found driving one forklift FLV in another shop floor. It was also noticed that they both had unauthorizedly removed one heavy machine called Face Milling Cutter of 500 diameter from one shop floor and kept it on forklift and loaded in company s ambulance which was being driven by T.A. Mathivanan. Both of them then managed to take the said machine in ambulance outside factory premises through South gate. 6. The officials who witnessed the incident reported the incident to the appellant Management . The appellant took up the matter with seriousness and issued charge sheet to both the respondents. They were asked to submit their explanation. Both denied the charges. The appellant therefore appointed Enquiry Officer for holding regular departmental enquiry. Both the respondents participated in the enquiry proceedings. The Enquiry Officer recorded the evidence of the witnesses and submitted his report. The Enquiry Officer on evaluation of the evidence held the charges as proved against both the respondents. He held that both the respondents were involved in committing theft of Face Milling cutter and were caught in the factory premises while on duty. The appellant accepted the report and dismissed the respondents from service on 31.08.1991. Against their dismissal order the respondents filed departmental appeals. The appeals were dismissed. 7. This event gave rise to filing of two cases. One was by the State in the Court of Magistrate seeking prosecution of the respondents under Section 379 of the Indian Penal Code 1860 in short IPC and the other was by the respondents against the appellant employer in Labour Court challenging legality of their dismissal orders ID Nos. 801 and 839 of 1993 . So far as the criminal case was concerned the Magistrate by his order dated 24.11.1992 acquitted the respondents from the charge. 8. As regards the cases before the Labour Court out of which these two appeals arise the Labour Court framed three issues first whether the enquiry conducted by the Enquiry Officer was legal and proper second whether the findings of the Enquiry Officer holding the charge as proved against the respondents are correct and third whether these two employees are entitled to claim the relief of reinstatement with back wages 9. By Award dated 06.08.2001 Annexure P 9 the Labour Court answered the reference in favour of the employees by recording the following findings Hence it can not be said that there has been denial of reasonable opportunity during the enquiry. 9.1. and then in Para 7 it was held that it can not be considered that the departmental enquiry has not been held properly. 9.2. and then in Para 8 it was held that till the disposal of the criminal case the Management ought to have stayed the departmental enquiry and they should have passed the order only after the conclusion of the criminal proceedings. 9.3. and in the same Para 8 it was held that Therefore the object of this provision is that till proceedings of criminal court the departmental enquiry should not be initiated. Therefore the respondent ought not to have appointed enquiry officer to conduct the enquiry in respect of same charge which has been pending before the Criminal Court. Such an enquiry held is contrary to principles of natural justice. On this ground I hold that departmental enquiry is held not in accordance with principle of natural justice 9.4. and in last line of Para 8 it was held that it is for this reason the removal of the employee from service is not justified. 9.5. The Labour Court then lastly in para 9 held that Having held that the departmental enquiry has not been conducted according to principle of natural justice it has to be decided whether the finding of the Enquiry Officer that the charge against the petitioner is correct. When the criminal case has been pending the finding of the Enquiry Officer that the petitioner is guilty of the charge is not correct. Further the petitioner has been acquired by the criminal court. Hence when in the criminal proceedings the petitioner has been found not guilty I hold that the findings of the Enquiry Officer that the charge against the petitioner had been proved is not correct. 10. To sum up the Labour Court held that firstly the departmental enquiry was properly held secondly the employer instead of holding an enquiry should have stayed it awaiting the outcome of the criminal case thirdly since the criminal case resulted in the acquittal of the respondents the departmental enquiry stood vitiated as violating the principle of natural justice fourthly since the employer did not lead any evidence in support of the charge the charge remained unproved and lastly the dismissal orders are bad in law in the light of the four grounds and therefore the respondents be reinstated in service with payment of full back wages by the appellant. 11. The appellant felt aggrieved filed writ petitions in the High Court. The Single Judge by order dated 31.07.2003 Annexure P 11 allowed the writ petitions set aside the award of the Labour Court and remanded the case to the Labour Court for deciding both the matters afresh. The Single Judge held that when the Labour Court held the departmental enquiry to be legal and proper then the only question that remained for the Labour Court to decide was as to whether the punishment imposed on two employees i.e. dismissal was just legal and proper or it required any interference in its quantum and if so to what extent. Having observed this the writ Court remanded the cases to Labour Court to decide the cases afresh on merits. This is what the learned Single Judge in concluding para held 10. Keeping in view of all these aspects I think interest of justice would be served by quashing the awards in both the cases and directing both the matters are to be considered afresh by the Labour Court. It goes without saying that both the matters should be taken up for hearing together and shall be disposed of. Since the matter is pretty old the Industrial Disputes are to be decided as expeditiously as possible preferably within a period of six months from the date of receipt of a copy of this order. 12. Felt aggrieved the respondents filed intra court appeals in the High Court before the Division Bench. By impugned judgment the Division Bench allowed the appeals set aside the order of writ Court and directed reinstatement of the respondents by restoring the order of the Labour Court to this extent but declined to award to them any back wages except continuity of service and other attendant benefits to the respondents. 13. Felt aggrieved by the judgment of the Division Bench the appellant employer has filed these appeals by way of special leave before this Court. 14. Heard Mr. P.S. Patwalia learned senior counsel for the appellant and Mr. M.A. Chinnasamy and Mr. M.K. Perwez learned counsel for the respondents. 15. Having heard learned counsel for the parties and on perusal of the record of the case we are constrained to allow the appeals set aside the impugned judgment and uphold the dismissal order of the respondents as legal and proper. 16. To begin with when we examine the legality and the correctness of the Awards of the Labour Court we are of the considered opinion that the Labour Court having held and indeed rightly that the departmental enquiry conducted by the appellant was legal and proper committed an error in holding that the departmental enquiry got vitiated due to criminal court s order which had acquitted the respondents from the charge of theft. In our opinion there was no occasion for the Labour Court to examine this issue once the departmental enquiry was held legal and proper. The Labour Court in our opinion committed yet another error in holding that since the appellant failed to lead any evidence to prove the charge in Labour Court therefore the dismissal orders of respondents are liable to be set aside. This finding in our opinion was again not legally sustainable. 17. In our opinion once the Labour Court upheld the departmental enquiry as being legal and proper then the only question that survived for consideration before the Labour Court was whether the punishment of dismissal imposed by the appellant to the respondents was legal and proper or it requires any interference in its quantum. 18. In other words the Labour Court should have then confined its enquiry to examine only one limited question as to whether the punishment given to the respondents was in any way disproportionate to the gravity of the charge leveled against them and this the Labour Court should have examined by taking recourse to the provisions of Section 11 A of the Industrial Dispute Act 1947 in short the Act and the law laid down by this Court in the case of The Workmen of M s Firestone Tyre Rubber Co. of India Pvt. Ltd. v. The Management Ors. 1973 1 SCC 813 . It was however not done thereby rendering the order of Labour Court legally unsustainable. 19. Similarly in our considered view the Labour Court failed to see that the criminal proceedings and departmental proceedings are two separate proceedings in law. One is initiated by the State against the delinquent employees in criminal Court and other i.e. departmental enquiry which is initiated by the employer under the Labour Service Laws Rules against the delinquent employees. 20. The Labour Court should have seen that the dismissal order of the respondents was not based on the criminal Court s judgment and it could not be so for the reason that it was a case of acquittal. It was however based on domestic enquiry which the employer had every right to conduct independently of the criminal case. 21. This Court has consistently held that in a case where the enquiry has been held independently of the criminal proceedings acquittal in criminal Court is of no avail. It is held that even if a person stood acquitted by the criminal Court domestic enquiry can still be held the reason being that the standard of proof required in a domestic enquiry and that in criminal case are altogether different. In a criminal case standard of proof required is beyond reasonable doubt while in a domestic enquiry it is the preponderance of probabilities. See Divisional Controller Karnataka State Road Transport Corporation v. M.G. Vittal Rao JT 2011 13 SC 247 . 22. In the light of this settled legal position the Labour Court was not right in holding that the departmental enquiry should have been stayed by the appellant awaiting the decision of the criminal Court and that it is rendered illegal consequent upon passing of the acquittal order by the criminal Court. This finding of the Labour Court is therefore also not legally sustainable. 23. Now coming to the order of writ Court Single Judge though in our opinion the Single Judge rightly held the departmental enquiry as being legal and proper but committed an error in remanding the case to the Labour Court without precisely saying as to what the Labour Court has to decide after remand and why writ Court cannot decide such issues in the writ petition. We find that the Single Judge in concluded para of the order remanded the whole case afresh for its decision on merits. 24. In our considered view the Single Judge Writ Court having held the enquiry to be legal and proper instead of remanding the case to the Labour Court should have himself examined the short question which had survived for consideration in the writ petition namely whether the punishment of dismissal was commensurate with the charges or it required any interference by the Court under Section 11 A of the Act. 25. In other words the remand to the Labour Court in this case by the Single Judge was not called for. It would have become necessary if the Single Judge had come to a conclusion that the departmental enquiry is illegal. In such situation the question would have arisen as to whether the employer should now be given an opportunity to prove the charge before the Labour Court on merits by adducing evidence provided such opportunity had been asked for in any form by the employer See Shankar Chakravarti v. Britannia Biscuits Co. Ltd. Anr. AIR 1979 SC 1652 . 26. However this occasion did not arise because as observed supra the enquiry was held legal and proper by the Labour Court and Single Judge. 27. Now coming to the legality of the impugned judgment in our considered opinion there was absolutely no justification on the part of the Division Bench to have allowed the appeals of the respondents and restored the order of the Labour Court by setting aside the dismissal order. The Division Bench in our view did not take note of correct legal position which we have discussed above. 28. In our opinion this is a clear case where the departmental enquiry was held legal and proper. We also on going through the record of the case hold that the departmental enquiry was properly held and was therefore legal and proper. So far as the quantum of punishment imposed on the respondents is concerned having regard to the nature of charge which stood proved in the enquiry in our view the order of dismissal from service was the appropriate punishment. It was commensurate with the charge. 29. An act of theft committed by an employee while on duty is a serious charge. This charge once proved in enquiry the employer is justified in dismissing the employee from service. 30. We are not impressed by the submission urged by the learned counsel for the respondents employees when he urged that once the respondents employees were acquitted from the charge of theft by the criminal Court the dismissal orders deserve to be set aside entitling the employees to seek reinstatement in service. Learned counsel read the entire criminal Court s order to show that it was an honorable acquittal of the employees from the charge of theft. 31. The answer to the aforementioned submission lies in the law laid down by this Court in the case of Karnataka SRTC supra . At the cost of repetition we may say that in the case on hand the dismissal orders had not been passed on the basis of employees conviction by the criminal Court which later stood set aside by the superior Court. Had it been so then the situation would have been different because once the conviction order is set aside by the superior Court the dismissal order which was solely based on passing of the conviction order also stands set aside. Such was not the case here. 32. In the case on hand the appellant employer had conducted the departmental enquiry in accordance with law independently of the criminal case wherein the Enquiry Officer on the basis of the appreciation of evidence brought on record in the enquiry proceedings came to a conclusion that a charge of theft against the delinquent employees was proved. This finding was based on preponderance of probabilities and could be recorded by the Enquiry Officer notwithstanding the order of criminal Court acquitting the respondents. 33. In view of the foregoing discussion the appeals succeed and are allowed. Impugned judgment is set aside. As a consequence thereof the dismissal orders of the respondents herein are held legal and proper and accordingly upheld. 0 CROSS CITATION 2006 AIR SC 1214 2006 2 SCC 373 APPEARANCES Mrs. D. Bharathi Reddy Advocate for the Appellants. Mrs. K. Amareswari Senior Advocate Mr. B. Ramana Murthy and Mrs. Anjani Aiyagari Advocates with for the Respondent. HEADNOTE SERVICE AND LABOUR LAWS Government service Termination of service for misconduct Judicial review of administrative decisions Scope Respondent a Police Head Constable charged with the theft of lens of closed circuit TV while on security duty during the visit of US President After Departmental Enquiry services of delinquent dispensed with by the Disciplinary Authority since the charges stood proved by evidence of witnesses Delinquent given adequate opportunity of being heard in the said proceedings Appellate Authority as well as Administrative Tribunal upholding the dismissal On a writ High Court on reappreciation of the evidence upsetting the findings and directing the reinstatement of the respondent Validity. Allowing the appeal held that the Enquiry Officer having held on the basis of evidence that the charge of theft stood proved against the respondent and the said finding having been upheld by the Appellate Authority and the Tribunal the High Court erred in reappreciating the evidence and upsetting the factual findings. High Court while exercising the power of judicial review does not act as Appellate Court and judicial review is not akin to adjudication on merits by reappreciating the evidence as an Appellate Authority. Considering the gravity of the misconduct the punishment of dismissal was not disproportionate. Writ filed by the respondent therefore dismissed. HELD From the finding recorded by the High Court it clearly appears that the High Court re appreciated the evidence as an Appellate Authority. Apart from reappreciating the evidence which is not permissible in law the High Court also fell in grave error by directing the government pleader and the learned counsel for the respondent herein to again view the cassettes. It is on record that the Inquiry Officer relied on the video cassettes displayed during the Inquiry as part of additional evidence. The finding has been clearly recorded by the Inquiry Officer on the basis of the evidence adduced by PWs. 1 2 3 and 4 during the Inquiry. Para 6 By now it is a well established principle of law that the High Court exercising power of judicial review under Article 226 of the Constitution does not act as an Appellate Authority. Its jurisdiction is circumscribed and confined to correct errors of law or procedural error if any resulting in manifest miscarriage of justice or violation of principles of natural justice. Judicial review is not akin to adjudication on merit by reappreciating the evidence as an Appellate Authority. Para 7 The gravity of the offence must necessarily be measured with the nature of the offence. The respondent was a member of the Discipline Force holding the rank of head constable. The duty assigned to him was a bandobast duty during the visit of the then President Bill Clinton who ran a security risk of the highest grade. His misconduct could have led to serious security lapse resulting into fatal consequences. But because of timely detection of the electrician PW4 the lens was recovered and immediately restored. We entirely agree with the inquiry officer that the charges are serious in nature being committed by a member of Disciplinary Force who deserved stringent punishment. To instill the confidence of the public in the establishment the only appropriate punishment in such cases is dismissal from service which has been correctly awarded. Para 11 In the premises aforestated we are clearly of the view that the High Court has committed patent error of law which has resulted in miscarriage of justice. The order of the High Court is accordingly quashed. The appeal is allowed. Consequently the writ petition filed by the respondent stands dismissed. Para 13 CASES REFERRED 1.B.C. Chaturvedi v. Union of India Ors. JT 1995 8 SC 65 Para 9 2.Union of India v. Parma Nanda JT 1989 2 SC 132 Para 8 H.K. SEMA J. 1. This appeal preferred by the State of Andhra Pradesh is directed against the judgment and order of the Division Bench of the High Court of Andhra Pradesh dated 9.12.2003 in writ petition no. 14146 of 2003 quashing the order of dismissal dated 21.9.2000 of the respondent herein and the order of the appellate authority dated 20.10.2001 confirming the order of dismissal. The Division Bench of the High Court directed that the respondent herein be reinstated into service forthwith with all back wages and all attendant benefits which he could have received had he not been dismissed from service. The High Court further directed that the respondent be reinstated into service within a period of four weeks from the date of receipt of the order. This Court on 16.7.2004 while issuing notice granted interim stay of the impugned order. Further on 18.7.2005 on the submission of the learned counsel for the respondent that the respondent has been reinstated pursuant to the High Court order but the back wages have not been paid this Court stayed the payment of back wages directed by the High Court. 2. Briefly stated the facts are as follows 2.1 The respondent Mohd. Nasrullah Khan was working as head constable at Shamshabad Police Station of Ranga Reddy District. Mr. Bill Clinton the then President of the United States of America was to visit the Hi Tech City in Hyderabad and the respondent was assigned the bandobast duty at the office of the Oracle Software India Limited on the 4th Floor of Hi Tech City Madhapur Hyderabad. It is alleged that during the bandobast duty the respondent removed the CCTV Lens No. VAT 660 DSC 56894 of Watal company from ceiling of the said office and concealed the same. It is further alleged that the said removal of the lens was observed in the close circuit TV by one G. Sridhar the electrician PW4 and he immediately went to the respondent and asked him about the removal but the respondent denied the same. The electrician thereafter informed the same to the Security Supervisor and on enquiry by him though the respondent denied of having removed the lens at the first instance later handed over the same stating that the same was lying at the toilet. 2.2 A disciplinary inquiry was initiated against the respondent by the Superintendent of Police A.R. Ranga Reddy District by appointing Deputy Superintendent of Police DSP by its order dated 19.4.2000. The substance of imputations of misconduct and misbehaviour against the respondent are as follows Shri Mohd. Nasrullah Khan High Court 380 of P.S. Shamshabad u s exhibited grave misconduct in committing theft of the C.C.T.V. lens costing about Rs.15 000 from the office of Oracle India Limited Hi Tech City Madhapur on 24.3.2000 while on bandobast duty for personal gain. 2.3 In course of the inquiry the Inquiry Officer examined as many as four witnesses and after conducting detailed inquiry by affording adequate opportunity to the respondent submitted its report dated 18.8.200 holding that the charge against the respondent of theft of C.C.T.V. lens has been proved beyond all reasonable doubt. The Inquiry Officer in its report also observed as under The charges are serious in nature. The delinquent being the member of the disciplined force and being a protector of public property ought not to have attempted to commit such a delinquency. I therefore propose that the delinquent may be awarded with a stringent punishment to meet the ends of justice. 2.4 After receipt of the Inquiry Report a show cause notice was issued to the respondent herein by the Disciplinary Authority and after considering the reply to the show cause notice the Disciplinary Authority dismissed the respondent from service with immediate effect by an order dated 21.9.2000. It was further directed that the period of suspension from 30.3.2000 till the date of dismissal be treated as not on duty . Aggrieved thereby the respondent preferred an appeal before the Deputy Inspector General of Police which was dismissed on 11.5.2001. Thereafter the respondent filed O.A.No. 3700 of 2001 before the Andhra Pradesh Administrative Tribunal. The Administrative Tribunal by its order dated 1.8.2001 remanded the matter to the Appellate Authority for reconsideration of the matter. The Appellate Authority after reconsidering the representation rejected the appeal again and confirmed the order of dismissal by its order dated 20.10.2001. Being aggrieved the respondent again filed O.A. No. 8066 of 2001 before the Tribunal contending inter alia that the theft as alleged was not proved and the Appellate Authority did not properly consider the submissions of the respondent and that the Appellate Authority dismissed the appeal without application of mind. The appellant herein filed a detailed counter repudiating the allegations made in the O.A. It is stated that the order of dismissal was passed in accordance with the rules and regulations and there was no denial of principles of natural justice to the respondent nor was there any allegations of violations of rules and regulations or procedures. It was also contended that the guilt of the respondent has been proved beyond all reasonable doubt. After considering the petition and the counter the Andhra Pradesh Appellate Tribunal by its order dated 4.4.03 dismissed the O.A. confirming the order of dismissal. Aggrieved thereby the respondent preferred writ petition no. 14146 of 2003 before the High Court which was allowed by the impugned order as stated earlier. Hence the present appeal by special leave. 3. It is contended by the learned counsel for the appellant that the finding recorded by the Inquiry Officer is a finding of fact and the High Court cannot act as an appellate authority. Its jurisdiction is circumscribed and confined to correct errors of law or procedural law if any or violation of principles of natural justice. It is further contended that the High Court fell in grave error of law by reappreciating the evidence recorded by the Inquiry Officer like an appellate authority in the instant case. 4. Per contra learned counsel for the respondent contended that the alleged theft of lens or removal of lens by the respondent is not proved and therefore the finding of the Inquiry Officer is perverse and the order of dismissal on the basis of the finding recorded by the Inquiry Officer is vitiated. At this stage we may point out that there is no allegation of violation of principles of natural justice or that the inquiry was conducted without following the procedures or rules and regulations. The only case put up before us by the respondent is that the theft or removal of lens by the respondent is not proved in the course of Inquiry. This contention need not detain us any longer because going through the report of the Inquiry the Inquiry Officer after examining PWs. 1 2 3 and 4 and after affording adequate opportunity to the respondent has come to the conclusion that the charge levelled against the respondent stands proved. 5. The High Court while upsetting the order of the Tribunal dated 4.4.03 passed in O.A. No. 8066 01 and order of dismissal dated 21.1.2000 confirmed by the Appellate Authority dated 20.10.2001 recorded its finding in paragraph 5 of its judgment as under There is no dispute that the petitioner was posted on bandobast duty on the relevant date and the entire premises was under close circuit T.V. System. The question is whether the petitioner has committed the theft of camera lens. There is no direct evidence on this aspect. It is only on presumption that when once the camera was not relaying the pictures the officials of Oracle company came to that place where the camera was positioned and found that the lens was not available with the camera. Even the witnesses examined on this aspect namely the employees of Oracle company did not state that the petitioner had committed theft of the lens and further it is on record that the electrician himself traced out the camera lens which was lying outside toilet room and the entire premises was carpeted. No other independent officer has been examined to establish that the petitioner had committed theft. However we see from the report of the Enquiry Officer that he got the cassette displayed and noticed the movements of the petitioner sitting on chair getting up and coming towards the camera and touching the lens of camera hand is clearly visible between 13 58 and 13 59 hours on 24.3.2000. But this is not the function of the Enquiry Officer. It must be established by the independent evidence. When we directed the learned government pleader and the learned counsel for the petitioner to again view the cassette they stated that the visibility is beyond recognition. In such circumstances it has to be held that the findings of the Enquiry Officer appears to be based on mere surmises and conjectures and it is finding based on no evidence. In such situation the Tribunal ought to have held that the enquiry is vitiated for lack of acceptable and permissible evidence on this aspect. It is also on record that the lens was not recovered from the person of the petitioner and admittedly the petitioner was on guard duty in the premises where the cameras were positioned. In such a situation it cannot be said that simply because the lens of one camera is missing the petitioner committed theft of it. If really the police had conducted investigation they could have sent the lens to the Forensic expert with reference to the fingerprints and that could have made the matters clear. But for the reasons best known to the police they did not take such action and tried to find fault with the police constable fastening the charge of theft. Under these circumstances we are of the considered view that the Tribunal failed to take into consideration this aspect and held that the Enquiry was conducted properly and finding was validly recorded. 6. From the finding recorded by the High Court it clearly appears that the High Court re appreciated the evidence as an Appellate Authority. Apart from reappreciating the evidence which is not permissible in law the High Court also fell in grave error by directing the government pleader and the learned counsel for the respondent herein to again view the cassettes. It is on record that the Inquiry Officer relied on the video cassettes displayed during the Inquiry as part of additional evidence. The finding has been clearly recorded by the Inquiry Officer on the basis of the evidence adduced by PWs. 1 2 3 and 4 during the Inquiry. 7. By now it is a well established principle of law that the High Court exercising power of judicial review under Article 226 of the Constitution does not act as an Appellate Authority. Its jurisdiction is circumscribed and confined to correct errors of law or procedural error if any resulting in manifest miscarriage of justice or violation of principles of natural justice. Judicial review is not akin to adjudication on merit by reappreciating the evidence as an Appellate Authority. 8. We may now notice a few decisions of this Court on this aspect avoiding multiplicity. In Union of India v. Parma Nanda1 K. Jagannatha Shetty J. speaking for the Bench observed as under We must unequivocally state that the jurisdiction of the Tribunal to interfere with the disciplinary matters or punishment cannot be equated with an appellate jurisdiction. The Tribunal cannot interfere with the findings of the Inquiry Officer or competent authority where they are not arbitrary or utterly perverse. It is appropriate to remember that the power to impose penalty on a delinquent officer is conferred on the competent authority either by an Act of legislature or rules made under the proviso to Article 309 of the Constitution. If there has been an enquiry consistent with the rules and in accordance with principles of natural justice what punishment would meet the ends of justice is a matter exclusively within the jurisdiction of the competent authority. If the penalty can lawfully be imposed and is imposed on the proved misconduct the Tribunal has no power to substitute its own discretion for that of the authority. The adequacy of penalty unless it is mala fide is certainly not a matter for the Tribunal to concern itself with. The Tribunal also cannot interfere with the penalty if the conclusion of the Inquiry Officer or the competent authority is based on evidence even if some of it is found to be irrelevant or extraneous to the matter. 9. Again the same principle has been reiterated by this Court in B.C. Chaturvedi v. Union of India Ors.2. K. Ramaswamy J. speaking for the Court under Judicial review is not an appeal from a decision but a review of the manner in which the decision is made. Power of judicial review is meant to ensure that the individual receives fair treatment and not to ensure that the conclusion which the authority reaches is necessarily correct in the eye of the court. When an inquiry is conducted on charges of misconduct by a public servant the court tribunal is concerned to determine whether the inquiry was held by a competent officer or whether rules of natural justice are complied with. Whether the findings or conclusions are based on some evidence the authority entrusted with the power to hold inquiry has jurisdiction power and authority to reach a finding of fact or conclusion. But that finding must be based on some evidence. Neither the technical rules of Evidence Act nor of proof of fact or evidence as defined therein apply to disciplinary proceeding. When the authority accepts that evidence and conclusion receives support therefrom the disciplinary authority is entitled to hold that the delinquent officer is guilty of the charge. The court tribunal in its power of judicial review does not act as appellate authority to appreciate the evidence and to arrive at its own independent findings on the evidence. The court tribunal may interfere where the authority held the proceedings against the delinquent officer in a manner inconsistent with the rules of natural justice or in violation of statutory rules prescribing the mode of inquiry or where the conclusion or finding reached by the disciplinary authority is based on no evidence. If the conclusion or finding be such as no reasonable person would have ever reached the court tribunal may interfere with the conclusion or the finding and mould the relief so as to make it appropriate to the facts of each case. 10. As already said in the present case there is no allegation of violation of principles of natural justice or the inquiry being held inconsistent with the mode of procedure prescribed by the rules or regulations. 11. This takes us to the last submission of the counsel for the respondent. Learned counsel for the respondent contended that the offence said to have been committed being minor in nature and no loss being caused to the owner of the property inasmuch as the same had been recovered on the spot lenient punishment may be awarded in place of dismissal from service. We are unable to countenance this submission. The gravity of the offence must necessarily be measured with the nature of the offence. The respondent was a member of the Discipline Force holding the rank of head constable. The duty assigned to him was a bandobast duty during the visit of the then President Bill Clinton who ran a security risk of the highest grade. His misconduct could have led to serious security lapse resulting into fatal consequences. But because of timely detection of the electrician PW4 the lens was recovered and immediately restored. We entirely agree with the Inquiry Officer that the charges are serious in nature being committed by a member of Disciplinary Force who deserved stringent punishment. To instill the confidence of the public in the establishment the only appropriate punishment in such cases is dismissal from service which has been correctly awarded. 12. It is stated that the respondent was reinstated on 19.6.04 pursuant to the order passed by the High Court and has been working since then and pay and allowances have been paid from 19.6.04. Since he has been paid for the period he has worked the salary and allowances already paid to him shall not be disturbed. The respondent however shall not get his back wags. 13. In the premises aforestated we are clearly of the view that the High Court has committed patent error of law which has resulted in miscarriage of justice. The order of the High Court is accordingly quashed. The appeal is allowed. Consequently the writ petition filed by the respondent stands dismissed. Parties are asked to bear their own costs. 0 HEADNOTE CRIMINAL LAWS Indian Penal Code 1860 Sections 390 392 Evidence Act 1872 Section 3 Robbery When can be said to have been committed Principles stated. HELD The provision defines robbery which is theft or extortion when caused with violence of death hurt or wrongful restraint. When there is no theft committed then as a natural corollary there cannot be robbery. Robbery is only an aggravated form of offence of theft or extortion. Aggravation is in the use of violence of death hurt or restraint. Violence must be in course of theft and not subsequently. It is not necessary that violence actually should be committed but even attempt to commit it is enough. Para 8 The words for that end in Section 390 clearly mean that the hurt caused must be with the object of facilitating the committing of the theft or must be caused while the offender is committing theft or is carrying away or is attempting to carry away property obtained by the theft. Para 10 Sections 390 392 395 Evidence Act 1872 Section 3 Robbery PWs going on scooter at 9 p.m. Gold chain thali ear drops scooter and cash snatched by threatening with knife Next day arrested Stolen goods recovered and identified by victims No dispute that place was highway. Held that offence was established. Conviction and sentence of 10 years RI and fine of Rs. 5000 upheld. Paras 3 12 CASES REFERRED 1.State of Karnataka v. Puttaraja JT 2003 9 SC 603 Para 13 DR. ARIJIT PASAYAT J. 1. Leave granted. 2. Challenge in this appeal is to the order of a learned Single Judge of the Karnataka High Court holding the appellants guilty of offence punishable under Section 392 of the Indian Penal Code 1860 in short the IPC and sentencing each of 10 years imprisonment. 3. Prosecution version in a nutshell is as follows 3.1. On 24.6.2001 at 9.00 p.m. on Mulbagal Punganoor road PWs 2 and 3 were going on a Bajaj Scooter. When they were near Kirumani Mitta of Buddadoru village accused persons 2 to 5 intercepted PWs 2 and 3 and robbed the gold chain golden ear drops thali and cash of Rs.400 by threatening with knife. The accused tied the legs and hands of PW 2 and PW 3 and threatened them not to escape and get out from the place for about ten minutes after their departure. The victims went to Punganoor Police Station and later on lodged First Information Report with Nangali Police Kolar Dist. on 25.6.2001. The Traffic Police while checking found A 2 A 3 and A 4 were going on the scooter M.O.6 they had robbed from PW 2 the deadly weapons like knives pistol iron rod etc. were hidden in the scooter. On interrogation the accused persons admitted the commission of offence in question. A 5 and A 8 were arrested on the information given by A 2 to A 4. At the instance of A 2 the gold jewellery M.Os.2 and 3 are recovered from PW 6 Pawn broker. The Bajaj Scooter M.O.6 was seized from A 2 A 3 and A 4. PW 13 with whom the ear studs and the chain were pledged by A 2 testified to the said fact. PWs 2 and 3 identified A 2 to A 5 as the persons who robbed them. Prosecution claimed that the identification of accused persons by PWs 2 and 3 coupled with the recovery of jewellery at the instance of A 2 and seizure of scooter from A 2 A 3 and A 4 clinchingly established the guilt of A 2 to A 5. 3.2. The investigating agency submitted charge sheet for alleged commission of offence punishable under Section 395 of IPC. The case was split up against A 1 A 6 and A 7 as they were absconding. 3.3. Learned Additional Sessions Judge Kolar referred to the evidence of PWs 1 and 2 the recovery of the scooter the recovery of stolen articles and identification thereon to conclude that accused persons are guilty and accordingly A 2 to A 5 were convicted for offence punishable under Section 395 IPC. Accused 7 and 8 were acquitted as the evidence was not sufficient to find them guilty. Considering the gravity of the offence custodial sentence of 10 years imprisonment and a fine of Rs.5 000 each was imposed. In appeal the High Court found that the offence committed was covered under Section 392 IPC but considering the gravity of the offence upheld the sentence. 4. In support of the appeal learned counsel for the appellants submitted that the evidence of PWs 2 and 3 does not show that any knife was used for robbery. On the contrary evidence of victim clearly shows that she raised hue and cry when accused persons tried to snatch the stolen articles from her. It was also submitted that the appellants have suffered custody of more than nearly 8 years and the sentence deserves to be reduced to the period already undergone. 5. Learned counsel for the respondent State on the other hand submitted that there is no minimum sentence prescribed and the maximum sentence is 10 years. It is submitted that the robbery was committed on the highway at about 9.00 p.m. That being so the sentence can be upto 14 years. Considering the gravity of the offence and the large scale highway robberies no leniency should be shown. 6. Section 392 IPC provides for punishment for robbery. The essential ingredients are as follows 1.Accused committed theft 2.Accused voluntarily caused or attempted to cause. i death hurt or wrongful restraint. ii Fear of instant death hurt or wrongful restraint. 3.He did either act for the end. i to commit theft. ii While committing theft. iii In carrying away or in the attempt to carry away property obtained by theft. 7. It is to be noted that the Section 392 provides punishment for robbery. It is punishment for the offence defined in Section 390. Punishment is higher if it is committed on a highway and between sunset and sunrise. Section 390 which defines robbery reads as follows 390. Robbery. In all robbery there is either theft or extortion. When theft is robbery. Theft is robbery if in order to the committing of the theft or in committing the theft or in carrying away or attempting to carry away property obtained by theft the offender for the end voluntarily causes or attempts to cause to any person death or hurt wrongful restraint or fear of instant death or of instant hurt or of instant wrongful restraint. When extortion is robbery. Extortion is robbery if the offender at the time of committing the extortion is in the presence of the person put in fear and commits the extortion by putting that person in fear of instant death of instant hurt or of instant wrongful restraint to that person or to some other person and by so putting in fear induces the person so put in fear then and there to deliver up the thing extorted. Explanation. The offender is said to be present if he is sufficiently near put the other person in fear of instant death of instant hurt or of instant wrongful restraint. 8. The provision defines robbery which is theft or extortion when caused with violence of death hurt or wrongful restraint. When there is no theft committed then as a natural corollary there cannot be robbery. Robbery is only an aggravated form of offence of theft or extortion. Aggravation is in the use of violence of death hurt or restraint. Violence must be in course of theft and not subsequently. It is not necessary that violence actually should be committed but even attempt to commit it is enough. 9. The authors of the Code observed as follows In one single class of cases theft and extortion are in practice confounded together so inextricably that no judge however sagacious could discriminate between them. This class of cases therefore has in all systems of jurisprudence ... been treated as a perfectly distinct class ... we have therefore made robbery a separate crime. There can be no case of robbery which does not fall within the definition either of theft or of extortion but in a practice it will perpetually be a matter of doubt whether a particular act of robbery was a theft or an extortion. A large proportion of robberies will be half theft half extortion. A seizes Z threatens to murder him unless he delivers all his property and begins to pull off Z s ornaments. Z in terror begs that A will take all he has and spare his life assists in taking off his ornaments and delivers them to A. Here such ornaments as A took without Z s consent are taken by theft. Those which Z delivered up from fear of death are acquired by extortion. It is by no means improbable that Z s right arm bracelet may have been obtained by theft and left arm bracelet by extortion that the rupees in Z s girdle may have been obtained by theft and those in his turban by extortion. Probably in nine tenths of the robberies which are committed something like this actually takes place and it is probable that a few minutes later neither the robber nor the person robbed would be able to recollect in what proportions theft and extortion were mixed in the crime nor is it at all necessary for the ends of justice that this should be ascertained. For though in general the consent of a sufferer is a circumstance which very materially modifies the character of the offence and which ought therefore to be made known to the Courts yet the consent which a person gives to the taking of this property by a ruffian who holds a pistol to his breast is a circumstance altogether immaterial . 10. The words for that end in Section 390 clearly mean that the hurt caused must be with the object of facilitating the committing of the theft or must be caused while the offender is committing theft or is carrying away or is attempting to carry away property obtained by the theft. 11. As the provision itself provides when the highway robbery is committed deterrent punishment is called for. 12. In the instant case the evidence of the victim her husband the factum of recovery of the vehicle used has clearly established the commission of offence by the appellants. The offence was committed on a public road. There is no dispute that it was not a highway. It is also not in dispute that the offence was committed during sunset and sunrise that is at about 9.00 p.m. 13. In State of Karnataka v. Puttaraja JT 2003 9 SC 603 2004 1 SCC 475 it was inter alia observed as follows Imposition of sentence without considering its effect on the social order in many cases may be in reality a futile exercise. The social impact of the crime e.g. where it relates to offences against women like the case at hand dacoity kidnapping misappropriation of public money treason and other offences involving moral turpitude or moral delinquency which have great impact and serious repercussions on social order and public interest cannot be lost sight of and per se require exemplary treatment. Any liberal attitude by imposing meager sentences or taking too sympathetic a view merely on account of lapse of time or considerations personal to the accused only in respect of such offences will be resultwise counterproductive in the long run and against societal interest which needs to be cared for and strengthened by the required string of deterrence inbuilt in the sentencing system. 14. Above being the position there is no merit in this appeal which is accordingly dismissed. 0 CROSS CITATION 1990 AIR SC 882 1990 2 SCC 659 1990 2 SCR 733 APPEARANCES Mr. K.S. Bindra Senior Advocate Mr. R.K. Maheshwari and Mr. G.S. Gujananip Advocates with him for the appellant. Mr. Prem Sunder Jha Advocate for the Respondent. HEADNOTE ELECTRICITY SUPPLY Disconnection of Service of notice on the consumer is a pre requisite for disconnection. HELD ... the service of notice is a prerequisite for disconnection and the appellant can not be allowed to go back upon its words and refuse the consumer the benefit of notice as contemplated by the agreement. The learned counsel for the appellant urged that the Delhi Electric Supply Undertaking will seriously suffer if this view is upheld. We do not understand as to what is the difficulty in the way of the appellant to serve a notice on the consumer before discontinuing the supply. It has to be appreciated that the licensee Undertaking is performing a public duty and is governed by a special statute and the law also contemplates service of a notice before disconnection of supply of electricity. The courts below have made it clear that they have not examined the case on merits. The question whether the allegations of theft are true or not has to be examined and decided in an appropriate proceeding and the appellant will not therefore be prejudiced by the present judgment in its claim. Para 4 CASES REFERRED 1. Jagarnath Singh v. B.S. Ramaswamy 1966 1 SCR 885 Distinguished. SHARMA J. 1. This appeal by special leave arises out of a suit filed by the respondent company against the appellant Municipal Corporation of Delhi for a mandatory injunction to restore the supply of electricity discontinued during the pendency of the suit. Initially the suit was filed for a prohibitory injunction from disconnecting the electric connection. The plaint was amended following stoppage of the supply of energy. 2. According to the plaintiff s case the suit had to be filed as the Delhi Electricity Supply Undertaking was threatening disconnection without disclosing any reason. Subsequently some officers of the Undertaking made an inspection of the meters and alleged theft of electricity after tampering with the seals affixed on the meters. A First Information Report was lodged with the police. 3. Admittedly no notice was served by the Delhi Electricity Supply Undertaking on the plaintiff before severing the electric connection. The learned trial court however dismissed the suit and the plaintiff appealed. The First Additional District Judge Delhi who heard the appeal decreed the suit on the sole ground of non service of notice as required under condition no. 36 in regard to supply of electricity by the appellant. The Delhi High Court dismissed the appellant s second appeal at the admission stage by a reasoned judgment. 4. The learned counsel for the appellant has contended that in view of the conduct of the plaintiff in stealing electricity the Court should in its discretion refuse to issue a direction for restoration of the electric supply. We are afraid it is not possible to agree with the appellant for more reasons than one. The plaintiff is seriously denying the allegation of theft and it is not possible to assume the accusation as correct without a full fledged trial on this issue. The case of Jagarnath Singh v. B.S. Ramaswamy 1966 1 SCR 885 relied upon on behalf of the appellant is clearly distinguishable inasmuch as the consumer in that case was convicted under the Indian Penal Code and the conviction was being maintained in appeal. Besides the service of notice is a prerequisite for disconnection and the appellant can not be allowed to go back upon its words and refuse the consumer the benefit of notice as contemplated by the agreement. The learned counsel for the appellant urged that the Delhi Electric Supply Undertaking will seriously suffer if this view is upheld. We do not understand as to what is the difficulty in the way of the appellant to serve a notice on the consumer before discontinuing the supply. It has to be appreciated that the licensee Undertaking is performing a public duty and is governed by a special statute and the law also contemplates service of a notice before disconnection of supply of electricity. The courts below have made it clear that they have not examined the case on merits. The question whether the allegations of theft are true or not has to be examined and decided in an appropriate proceeding and the appellant will not therefore be prejudiced by the present judgment in its claim. In the result the appeal is dismissed but without costs. 0 CONTRACTS INSURANCE CONSUMER DISPUTES General insurance Insurance of property Burglary and or housebreaking policy Theft If included in the risks Respondent taking out a policy against burglary and house breaking in respect of property which included the godowns used for storing food grains Theft of food grain bags from the godown Notice by the insured Respondent lodging FIR and subsequently raising a claim from the insurance company Company repudiating the claim on the ground that theft was not covered by the policy and there was no burglary Respondent raising a consumer dispute District Forum holding that burglary included theft and hence appellant insurer directed to settle the claim State Commission and National Commission too upholding the decision of the District Forum Validity. Whether burglary included theft Whether insurer liable for the loss arising from theft. Allowing the appeal of the insurer held that the terms of the contract have to be strictly read and natural meaning should be given and no outside help should be sought unless the meaning is ambiguous. When the term burglary has been defined in the policy then the cause should fall within the definition. The element of force and violence is a condition precedent for burglary or housebreaking and therefore in terms of the definition the theft should have preceded with force or violence and it is for the claimant to establish that theft or burglary took place precedent with force or violence and if it is not then the insurance company will be well within their right to repudiate the claim. Decision of the District Forum as upheld by the State and National Commissions held not sustainable. However the claim amount having been paid by the insurer on the point of equity said decision not disturbed. HELD The policy is a contract between the parties and both parties are bound by the terms of contract. As per the definition of the word burglary followed with violence makes it clear that if any theft is committed it should necessarily precede with violence i.e. entry into the premises for committing theft should involve force or violence or threat to insurer or to his employees or to the members of his family. Therefore the element of force and violence is a condition precedent for burglary and housebreaking. The term burglary as defined in the English Dictionary means an illegal entry into the building with an intent to commit crime such as theft. But in absence of violence or force the insurer cannot claim indemnification against the insurance company. The terms of the policy have to be construed as it is and we cannot add or subtract something. Howsoever liberally we may construe the policy but we cannot take liberalism to the extent of substituting the words which are not intended. It is true that in common parlance the term burglary would mean theft but it has to be preceded with force or violence. If the element of force and violence is not present then the insurer cannot claim compensation against theft from the insurance company. Para 6 It is settled law that the terms of the contract has to be strictly read and natural meaning be given to it. No outside aid should be sought unless the meaning is ambiguous. Para 14 From the above discussion we are of the opinion that theft should have preceded with force or violence as per the terms of insurance policy. In order to substantiate a claim an insurer has to establish that theft or burglary took place preceding with force or violence and if it is not then the insurance company will be well within their right to repudiate the claim of the insurer. Para 15 However all the three forums have already awarded compensation and the amount has been paid to the respondent therefore on the point of equity we would not like to disturb the payment which has already been made. However in view of legal position stated by us the orders of the District Forum State Commission and the National Commission cannot be upheld. Para 16 CASES REFERRED 1.National Insurance Company Ltd. v. Public Type College II 2001 CPJ 26 NC . Para 5 2.Oriental Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Samayanallur Primary Agricultural Co op. Bank JT 1999 9 SC 9 Para 10 3.Oriental Insurance Co.Ltd. v. Sony Cheriyan reported in JT 1999 6 SC 149 Para 12 4.General Assurance Society Ltd. v. Chandumull Jain and Anr. 1966 3 SCR 500 Para 13 Foreign Cases Referred 1.Halsbury s Laws of England Fourth Edition 203 Reissue Para 646. Para 6 2.George and the Goldsmiths and General Burglary Insurance Association Limited 1899 1 Q.B.595 Para 7 3.Dino Services Ltd. v. Prudential Assurance Co. Ltd. 1989 1 All ER 422 Para 7 A.K. MATHUR J. 1. Leave granted. 2. This appeal is directed against the order passed by the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission New Delhi in Revision Petition No.2159 of 2002 confirming the order passed by the State Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission New Delhi as well as the order passed by the Consumer Disputes Redressal Forum II District Forum II New Delhi. 3. The brief facts which are necessary for the disposal of the appeal are as follows. The respondent took out a policy by the appellant company for a sum of Rs.7 lacs against burglary and or house breaking policy with effect from September 22 1991 to September 21 1992. Necessary provisions of the policy read as under THE COMPANY HEREBY AGREES subject to the terms and conditions contained herein endorsed or otherwise expressed hereon that if a The property hereinafter described or any part thereof be LOST or DAMAGED by BURGLARY and or HOUSE BREAKING or b ANY DAMAGE be caused to the premises to be made good by the insured from BURGLARY and or HOUSE BREAKING or any attempt thereat. 4. The term Burglary and or Housebreaking has been defined in terms of the policy also which reads as under. Burglary and or Housebreaking shall mean theft involving entry to or exit from the premises stated therein by forcible and violent means or following assault or violence or threat thereof to the insured or to his employees or to the members of his family 5. There are exceptions to it with which we are not concerned. During the currency of the policy the respondent had his stock of food grains kept in godown no.48 Srinagar Colony Bharat Nagar New Delhi. Shri Ashok Kumar Bansal one of the partners of the respondent visited his godown on July 2 1992 and there he found out that 197 bags of gwar were stolen. An F.I.R. was lodged at Police Station Sarai Rohilla under Section 380 of the Indian Penal Code on July 24 1992. Therefore the respondent raised a claim against the appellant company under the aforesaid policy for incurring the aforesaid loss by theft. The appellant company repudiated the claim of the respondent on the ground that theft is not covered by the insurance policy as no burglary took place in the godown by use of force or violence. Therefore the respondent approached the Consumer Disputes Redressal Forum II District Forum and made a claim for the loss of 197 bags of gwar. The appellant company contested the claim and took the stand that the claim is not covered as per the insurance policy. However the District Forum overruled the objection and held that burglary includes theft and by its order dated June 1 1998 directed the appellant company to release the claim of the respondent within two months with interest at the rate of 15 per annum and also awarded cost quantified at Rs.1 000 . Aggrieved against the said order of the District Forum the appellant company preferred an appeal before the State Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission New Delhi which was registered as Appeal No.881 of 1998. The State Commission also by its order dated June 19 2002 upheld the claim of the respondent taking the view that notwithstanding the definition of the term burglary and or housebreaking as defined in the policy burglary includes theft also. It also relied upon a decision of the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission in the case of National Insurance Company Ltd. v. Public Type College1 . The State Commission thus dismissed the appeal filed by the appellant company. Aggrieved by the said order of the State Commission a revision was filed before the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission. The National Commission by its impugned order affirmed the claim of the respondent and dismissed revision on May 20 2003. Hence the present appeal by way of special leave. 6. The question before us is whether in terms of the policy the repudiation of the claim of the respondent by the appellant company is justified or not. We have already reproduced the terms of the policy as also the definition of burglary and or housebreaking as defined in the policy. The definition given in the policy is binding on both the parties. The policy is a contract between the parties and both parties are bound by the terms of contract. As per the definition of the word burglary followed with violence makes it clear that if any theft is committed it should necessarily precede with violence i.e. entry into the premises for committing theft should involve force or violence or threat to insurer or to his employees or to the members of his family. Therefore the element of force and violence is a condition precedent for burglary and housebreaking. The term burglary as defined in the English Dictionary means an illegal entry into the building with an intent to commit crime such as theft. But in absence of violence or force the insurer cannot claim indemnification against the insurance company. The terms of the policy have to be construed as it is and we cannot add or subtract something. Howsoever liberally we may construe the policy but we cannot take liberalism to the extent of substituting the words which are not intended. It is true that in common parlance the term burglary would mean theft but it has to be preceded with force or violence. If the element of force and violence is not present then the insurer cannot claim compensation against theft from the insurance company. This expression appearing in the insurance policy came up for interpretation before the English Court and the English Courts in no uncertain terms laid down that burglary or theft has to be preceded with force or violence in order to be indemnified by the insurance company. In this connection reference may be made to the statement of law as summarized in Halsbury s Laws of England Fourth Edition 203 Reissue Para 646. It reads as under 646. Forcible and violent entry. The terms of a burglary insurance may exclude liability in certain circumstances unless there is forcible and violent entry into the premises. If so the entry must be obtained by the use of both force and violence or the definition is not satisfied and the policy does not apply. An entry obtained by turning the handle of an outside door or by using a skeleton key though sufficient to constitute a criminal offence is not within the policy since the element of violence is absent. However an entry obtained by picking the lock or forcing back the catch by means of an instrument involves the use of violence and is therefore covered. The policy may be so framed as to apply only to violent entry from the outside or the violent entry into a room within the insured premises may be sufficient. In any case the violence must be connected with the act of entry if the entry is obtained without violence the subsequent use of violence to effect the theft as for instance where a show case is broken open does not bring the loss within the policy. 7. In this connection a reference may be made to an earlier decision Queen s Bench Division in re George and the Goldsmiths and General Burglary Insurance Association Limited1. In this case a policy was taken out for loss or damage by burglary and housebreaking. A theft took place at premises No.78 Strand in a shop where the front door was shut but not locked or bolted and access to the shop could be obtained by turning the handle of the door. In the early morning before business hours during the temporary absence of a servant of the assured some person opened the front door entered the shop and breaking open a locked up compartment or show case and certain properties were stolen. Reversing the judgment of the Divisional Court the Court of Appeal held that the loss which has occurred as above mentioned was not covered by the policy. Two propositions were advanced before the Court The first that an entry effected by the exercise of any force however slight was sufficient to constitute an entry within the meaning of policy. The contention was advanced that pushing a door open if it were ajar or turning the handle of a door if the door were shut and could be opened in that way was sufficient force to satisfy the language of the policy. The second proposition was that if that was so and therefore it could not be said that the original entry in the case was effected by force within the meaning of the policy yet nevertheless the language of the policy was satisfied by the fact that the thief after having entered the shop without force proceeded to prise off an iron plate to which a locked padlock was attached securing a show case in which valuables were placed. Their Lordships considered both the propositions and after reproducing the definition observed that as per the plain reading of the expression used in terms of the policy violence is a condition precedent. The Court of Appeal reversed the decision of Queen s Bench. This view was reiterated subsequently in the case of Dino Services Ltd. v. Prudential Assurance Co. Ltd.1. In this case also the proposition of law as enunciated in the case of George and Goldsmith and General Burglary Insurance Association Ltd. was reaffirmed. It was held as follows In the context of a policy of insurance against theft from premises by forcible and violent means of entry the word violent was to be construed according to its ordinary meaning and meant entry by the use of any force which was accentuated or accompanied by a physical act which could properly be described as violent in nature and character. In the context of such a policy the word violent accordingly referred to the physical character of the means of entry and not merely to its unlawful character. It followed that the thieves by gaining entry to the premises simply by using the proper keys to unlock the doors of the premises had not entered the premises by violent means. Accordingly the plaintiff s loss was not covered by the policy. The appeal would therefore be allowed. 8. Similarly view has been expressed by American Courts also in American Jurisprudence 2nd Vol. 44 1401 which is as follows 1401 Provisions as to visible marks or evidence or use of force or violence It is not uncommon for insurance companies to include in their theft or burglary policies provisions restricting their liability to cases where there were some visible marks or visible evidence of the use of force or violence. It is generally competent for an insurer to insert such a clause in the contract of insurance and since such a provision is unambiguous it does not justify the applicability of the general principle that the insurance policy will be construed most favourable to the insured. However the courts will not read such a requirement into a policy and do not require compliance with such clauses unless the unmistakable language of the policy so requires. Such a policy requirement has been considered either as a limitation on the liability of the insurer or as a rule characterizing the evidence upon which liability must be predicated but in either event the validity of the requirement has been recognized and rarely questioned although in at least one instance such a requirement has been held in contravention of public policy under the particular terms of the policy involved and the particular circumstances. Just as policies insuring against burglary of an insured s premises commonly require visible marks upon the insured s premises or upon the exterior of the insured s premises so also do safe burglary policies commonly require visible marks either upon the insured s safe or upon the exterior of the insured s safe or upon the exterior of the doors of the insured s safe and in some instances the requirement of visible marks or visible evidence has been imposed in policies pertaining to theft of property from an insured s automobile. The determination of what constitutes visible marks or visible evidence within the meaning of such a provision and of where such marks or evidence must be located in order to satisfy the policy requirement is to a great extent depend upon the particular facts involved in relation to the specific requirements imposed by the policy. Where for example a burglary or theft policy requires that there must be visible marks of force or violence at the place of entry into the premises this requirement has been held complied with if the visible marks are only on one of the outer doors to the insured s premises which the burglars or thieves must have used to accomplish their deed. However under such a requirement if the only visible marks are those on inside doors which are not at the entrance to the premises recovery will be denied. Similarly a policy providing against loss by burglary by felonious entry into a safe by actual force evidenced by visible marks made upon the exterior of all the doors does not cover loss sustained by felonious entry into the safe by a manipulation of the lock on the outer door with no visible marks made thereon although the inner door of the safe did contain such marks although there is contrary authority. The opening of a safe by manipulation of the combination within the period covered by a policy of burglary insurance which was made possible by force applied to the safe before such period leaving visible marks upon the safe was not within the terms of the policy insuring against loss through felonious entry into the safe by actual force and violence leaving visible marks upon the safe and occurring within the policy period with an exemption from liability from loss effected by opening the safe by manipulation of the lock. 9. It is possible that an insurer may sustain loss in technical terms of the criminal law but no relief can be given to him unless his case is covered by the terms of the policy. It is not open to interpret the expression appearing in policy in terms of common law but it has to give meaning to the expression as defined in the policy. The act that causes the loss must fall within the definition in the policy and it cannot take the cover and contents of the definition as laid down in the criminal law. Therefore when the definition of the word burglary has been defined in the policy then the cause should fall within that definition. Once a party has agreed to a particular definition he is bound by it and the definition of criminal law will be of no avail. In this connection the decision of the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission in the case of National Insurance Company Ltd. v. Public Type College which has taken the colour and content of the definition given in the criminal law does not lay down the correct proposition of law. It is settled law that terms of the policy shall govern the contract between the parties they have to abide by the definition given therein and all those expressions appearing in the policy should be interpreted with reference to the terms of policy and not with reference to the definition given in other laws. It is a matter of contract and in terms of the contract the relation of the parties shall abide and it is presumed that when the parties have entered into a contract of insurance with their eyes wide open they cannot rely on definition given in other enactment. Thus the decision of the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission in the case of National Insurance Company Ltd. v. Public Type College is not a good law and all the Tribunals i.e. National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission State Commission District Forum having applied the ratio of that case the impugned order cannot be sustained. 10. Reference in this connection may be made to the decision of this Court in the case of Oriental Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Samayanallur Primary Agricultural Co op. Bank1 . In this case question came for interpretation of the similar policy i.e. policy against burglary. The bank had two insurance policies with the Oriental Insurance Company Ltd. out of which one was cash insurance policy for Rs. 1 lac and the second was a burglary insurance policy for Rs. 25 lacs. The relevant terms of the policy were 3 a Are all valuables secured in Burglary resistance safes when Premises are locked Yes b If so state name or maker of safe and cost Tansi 11. The answer to the question 3 a was in positive. The question arose that according to the complaint burglary took place from the cashier s cash box. The surveyor s report was that the stolen jewels had not been kept in safe locker and the theft was not covered under burglary insurance policy. Though the District Forum directed the insurance company to pay a sum of Rs. 43 729.25 however the State Commission observed that what is insured is not the contents of the cash box but the jewels kept in the safe which means a safety locker made by Tansi as agreed to in the proposal form. And it was observed that jewels kept in the cashier s cash box which were not covered by the policy. The State forum overruled the order passed by the District Forum. The order passed by the State Commission in revision was reversed by the National Commission. The matter came before this Court in special leave petition by insurance company. Their Lordships observed that there was no necessity of referring to the dictionaries for understanding the meaning of the word safe which the parties in the instant case are proved to have understood while submitting the proposal and accepting the insurance policy. The cashier s box could not be equated with the safe within the meaning of the insurance policy. The alleged burglary and the removal of the jewellery from cash box the cash box was not covered by the insurance policy between the parties. The insurance policy has to be construed having reference only to the stipulations contained in it and no artificial far fetched meaning could be given to the words appearing in it. And therefore they set aside the order of the National Commission. 12. Similarly in the case of Oriental Insurance Co.Ltd. v. Sony Cheriyan2 an insurance was taken out under the Motor Vehicles Act 1988 in which their Lordships observed The insurance policy between the insurer and the insured represents a contract between the parties. Since the insurer undertakes to compensate the loss suffered by the insured on account of risks covered by the insurance policy the terms of the agreement have to be strictly construed to determine the extent of liability of the insurer. The insured cannot claim anything more than what is covered by the insurance policy. 13. Similarly in the case of General Assurance Society Ltd. v. Chandumull Jain and Anr.1 the Constitution Bench has observed that the policy document being a contract and it has to be read strictly. It was observed In interpreting documents relating to a contract of insurance the duty of the court is to interpret the words in which the contract is expressed by the parties because it is not for the court to make a new contract however reasonable if the parties have not made it themselves. Looking at the proposal the letter of acceptance and the cover notes it is clear that a contract of insurance under the standard policy for fire and extended to cover flood cyclone etc. had come into being. 14. Therefore it is settled law that the terms of the contract has to be strictly read and natural meaning be given to it. No outside aid should be sought unless the meaning is ambiguous. 15. From the above discussion we are of the opinion that theft should have preceded with force or violence as per the terms of insurance policy. In order to substantiate a claim an insurer has to establish that theft or burglary took place preceding with force or violence and if it is not then the insurance company will be well within their right to repudiate the claim of the insurer. 16. However all the three forums have already awarded compensation and the amount has been paid to the respondent therefore on the point of equity we would not like to disturb the payment which has already been made. However in view of legal position stated by us the orders of the District Forum State Commission and the National Commission cannot be upheld. 17. But before parting with the case we would like to observe that the terms of the policy as laid down by the insurance company should be suitably amended by the insurance company so as to make it more viable and facilitate the claimants to make their claim. The definition is so stringent in the present case that it gives rise to difficult situation for the common man to understand that in order to maintain their claim they will have to necessarily show evidence of violence or force. The definition of the word burglary should be given meaning which is closer to the realities of life. The common man understands that he has taken out the policy against theft. He hardly understands whether it should precede violence or force. Therefore a policy should be a meaningful policy so that a common man can understand what is the meaning of burglary in common parlance. Though we have interpreted the present policy strictly in terms of the policy but we hope that the insurance companies will amend their policies so as to make them more meaningful to the public at large. It should have the meaning which a common man can easily understand rather than become more technical so as to defeat the cause of the public at large. 18. In the result we allow this appeal set aside the order passed by the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission New Delhi confirming the order of the State Commission District Forum. But the amount of compensation which has already been paid to the respondent shall not be recovered in the facts and circumstances of the present case. No order as to costs. 0 HEADNOTE CRIMINAL LAWS Penal Code 1860 Sections 457 380 34 Theft Recovery Gold chain worn by PW2 lost on the night of 12 11 1995 while she was sleeping No complaint filed as PWs 1 and 2 were not aware FIR filed after sixteen days when police caught appellant roaming in a suspicious manner and he disclosed about the theft Discovery statement made to PW7 circle inspector regarding sale of chain to PW8 PW 8 who allegedly purchased the gold chain did not support prosecution s case Police official PW3 corroborated PW7 s version Conviction on the basis of alleged recovery at his instance Out of three two accused acquitted. Held it is difficult to believe that PW2 was not aware about the theft of chain she was wearing. Only evidence against appellant is the alleged recovery of gold chain and Trial Court erred in convicting him on that basis alone. PW8 turned hostile. It is not safe to convict appellant on the evidence of police officials. Benefit of doubt given. HELD FIR was registered after about sixteen days from the date of alleged theft. PWs 1 and 2 did not even realize that the chain was stolen. It is only when the accused were brought to their house after about sixteen days that they realized that the chain was stolen and FIR was lodged. The chain in question was being worn by PW2. It is stated to have been stolen while she was sleeping. It is inconceivable that she would not realize that she had lost her chain. The incident in our view is not unfolded truthfully. A1 and A3 have been rightly acquitted because nothing links them to the offence. But similar is the case with the appellant. The only evidence against him is the alleged recovery of gold chain at his instance. That cannot connect the appellant to the theft. The Trial Court has stated that since chain was recovered at the instance of the appellant the only inference which can be drawn is that he committed the theft. Drawing such inference in the facts of this case would be totally unjust. Pertinently PW8 from whose shop the chain is said to have been recovered has turned hostile. Thus the prosecution is relying only on police witnesses. In this case it is unsafe to do so. Grave doubt is therefore created as to whether the appellant could be involved in the offence of theft. We are therefore of the view that benefit of doubt must be given to the appellant and he must be acquitted. Para 9 Smt. RANJANA PRAKASH DESAI J. 1. Leave granted. 2. The appellant A2 Azeez along with two others i.e. A1 Khalid and A3 Babu was tried by the Judicial Magistrate First Class I Aluva for offences punishable under Sections 457 and 380 read with Section 34 of the Indian Penal Code for short the IPC . By order dated 15 12 2000 learned Magistrate convicted the appellant under Section 457 of the IPC and sentenced him to undergo rigorous imprisonment for one year. The appellant was further convicted for offence under Section 380 of the IPC and sentenced to undergo rigorous imprisonment for two years. The substantive sentences were ordered to run concurrently. A1 Khalid and A3 Babu were acquitted. 3. The appellant challenged the said order before the Additional Sessions Judge Ernakulam. Learned Sessions Judge by his order dated 28 11 2002 confirmed the conviction and sentence and dismissed the appeal. Being aggrieved by the said conviction and sentence the appellant filed a criminal revision petition in the Kerala High Court. By the impugned judgment the High Court dismissed the revision petition. Hence this appeal by special leave is filed against the said judgment. 4. According to the prosecution the appellant along with A1 Khalid and A3 Babu with an intention of committing theft entered the house of PW1 Radha at Karumalloor Village on 12 11 1995 at 4.00 a.m. through the door which was kept open. They entered the bedroom where PW2 Renuka Devi was sleeping and committed theft of a gold chain weighing 14 grams worth Rs.7 500 which PW2 was wearing while she was sleeping. A1 and A3 assisted the appellant in committing the offence. They gave the gold chain to the appellant for selling. The appellant sold the gold chain and the accused divided the sale proceeds and thereby committed the offence. 5. This case presents rather unusual facts. PW7 the Circle Inspector stated that he arrested the accused on 28 11 1995 at 1 a.m. near the parking area Municipal Buildings Aluva while they were moving in suspicious circumstances. On questioning them it was revealed that they had committed the offence involved in this case hence they proceeded to the house of PW1 at Aduvathuruthu and recorded her F.I.R. Ext.P1 . 6. PW1 in her evidence stated that her daughter PW2 was sleeping in her room on the night of 12 11 1995. PW2 was wearing Thara fashion gold chain. The gold chain was stolen but no complaint was lodged at the police station because PW2 did not realize that her gold chain was stolen. It is only on 28 11 1995 when the police came to their house along with the accused and the gold chain was shown to her that she realized that the gold chain was stolen. She identified the gold chain MO1. FIR Ext.P1 was then lodged. PW2 the daughter stated that on 12 11 1995 at about 11 p.m. she went to sleep. On the next day morning the gold chain was not seen. On 28 11 1995 when the police came to her house with the accused and showed her the chain she realized that her chain was stolen. She identified the chain. 7. Evidence of PWs 1 and 2 raise several question marks. If gold chain worn by PW2 was removed by the accused at night it is unbelievable that she would not realize it in the morning. Even PW1 the mother did not realize that the chain worn by PW2 was not around her neck. Assuming this to be true PWs 1 and 2 would at least realize the loss on the next day or a day thereafter. They did not realize that the chain was stolen till 28 11 1995 when the police came to their house with the accused and showed them the chain. At that time they realized that chain was stolen. It is on 28 11 1995 that PW1 lodged her complaint. Thus the complaint came to be lodged about sixteen days after the incident that too after the police came to PW1 s house with the chain. The sequence of events is not convincing and does not stand to reason. 8. According to the prosecution the appellant made a discovery statement to PW7 the Circle Inspector and pursuant to that statement PW7 went to the shop of PW8 Pradeep along with the appellant. The appellant is stated to have pointed out to PW8 as the man to whom he had sold the chain. However PW8 has not supported the prosecution case. The courts below have while convicting the appellant placed reliance on the evidence of PW7 the Circle Inspector and PW3 the Head Constable who sought to corroborate the version of PW7 regarding recovery of chain at the instance of the appellant from the shop of PW8. We find it difficult to do so. Trial Court has observed that offence under Section 457 of the IPC is not made out because according to PW1 the thieves entered the door which was kept open. The Trial Court therefore acquitted the appellant of the offence punishable under Section 457 of the IPC. The Trial Court also acquitted A1 and A3 of the offence punishable under Section 457 read with Section 34 of the IPC. The Trial Court however observed that from the evidence of PWs 1 and 2 it is seen that theft had taken in the room in which PW2 was sleeping the thief entered the house and committed theft of gold chain which PW2 was wearing and therefore this act will be covered by Section 451 of the IPC i.e. house trespass in order to commit offence punishable with imprisonment. The Trial Court further held that since the recovery of gold chain was effected on the basis of statement given by the appellant the only inference that can be drawn is that he committed the theft of gold chain and therefore the case is covered by Section 380 of the IPC i.e. theft in a dwelling house. After observing that there is nothing in the evidence of PWs 1 to 8 to connect A1 and A3 with the crime the Trial Court acquitted them of all the offences. This view is affirmed by the Sessions Court and the High Court. 9. We find it difficult to uphold the above view so far as it relates to the appellant. As we have already noted that FIR was registered after about sixteen days from the date of alleged theft. PWs 1 and 2 did not even realize that the chain was stolen. It is only when the accused were brought to their house after about sixteen days that they realized that the chain was stolen and FIR was lodged. The chain in question was being worn by PW2. It is stated to have been stolen while she was sleeping. It is inconceivable that she would not realize that she had lost her chain. The incident in our view is not unfolded truthfully. A1 and A3 have been rightly acquitted because nothing links them to the offence. But similar is the case with the appellant. The only evidence against him is the alleged recovery of gold chain at his instance. That cannot connect the appellant to the theft. The Trial Court has stated that since chain was recovered at the instance of the appellant the only inference which can be drawn is that he committed the theft. Drawing such inference in the facts of this case would be totally unjust. Pertinently PW8 from whose shop the chain is said to have been recovered has turned hostile. Thus the prosecution is relying only on police witnesses. In this case it is unsafe to do so. Grave doubt is therefore created as to whether the appellant could be involved in the offence of theft. We are therefore of the view that benefit of doubt must be given to the appellant and he must be acquitted. 10. We therefore allow the appeal. The impugned judgment and order is quashed and set aside. The appellant is acquitted of the offences under Sections 380 and 451 of the IPC. The appellant is in jail. He is directed to be released forthwith unless he is required in any other case. 0 HEADNOTE CRIMINAL LAW Indian Penal Code 1860 Section 395 Dacoity Ingredients No evidence of any theft or attempt to commit theft Accused exploding a bomb and also firing gun Only evidence of theft in realm of hearsay. Held that offence under section 395 IPC is not made out. Paras 5 6 Criminal Procedure Code 1973 Section 211 ii with Indian Penal Code 1860 Section 457 Scope Accused charged with offence under section 395 311 IPC Offence not proved If can be con victed under section 457 Armed accused shown to have forcibly entered the house. Held that they can be convicted under section 457 IPC even if they were not charged with said offence. Paras 7 8 ORDER 1. Out of five persons challaned before the sessions court for the offence under section 395 IPC four were convicted by the trial court and sentenced each of them to rigorous imprisonment for ten years. The four convicted persons filed appeals before the High Court. The conviction was confirmed in respect of two of them who are appellants before us while acquitting A4 Tara Kant Jha and A5 Badri Jha. However the High Court reduced the sentence to rigorous imprisonment for seven years. 2. The occurrence happened during the night of 10th January 1981 the next morning was 11th . The prosecution case is that all the five accused entered into the courtyard of the house of PW5 Ram Prasad. The male persons of the house were then sleeping in the courtyard. After the assailants entered the courtyard they trussed up three persons belonging to that house PW1 Bimal PW2 Ramchander and PW3 Mahender . They were threatened not to make any noise lest they would be killed. Thereafter the assailants pushed the door of the house open and committed mischief there including theft of some silver ornaments. When PW4 Shatrughan Prasad Yadav tried to escape one of the assailants fired a gun shot which hit him on the hand. While decamping they exploded a bomb. Hearing the commotion the neighbouring people rushed to the scene and haystacks were set fire to by them. In the light of the flames the faces of the assailants were identified by the villag ers also. 3. It is unnecessary for us in this appeal to deal with the evidence in detail. We conclude that the case alleged against the convicted persons stand proved to the following extent They entered into the house and tied up the three inmates of the house. They exploded something like a bomb though none was injured thereby. They entered into the house forcibly opening the door. The story that one of them fired a gun at PW5 is not sub stantiated. When the villagers rushed in all the assailants left the place. 4. The prosecution attempted to make out that an offence of dacoity was committed. But they can succeed only if there was either theft or at least attempt to commit theft. There is no evidence that there was any act of theft or even attempt to commit theft. Of course PW5 said that two lady inmates of the house reported to him later that their silver necklaces were snatched away by the dacoits. Unfortunately those ladies were not examined and hence the version of PW5 remained only in the realm of hearsay evidence. PW1 made an attempt to say that there was looting or that silver ornaments were stolen by the assail ants. This was not what he saw and perhaps this too would have been only reported to him. In cross examination he definitely said that he did not see any act of theft. No such ornament was recovered by the police during investigation. 5. Thus there is total lack of evidence to show that the intrud ers committed theft or made any attempt to commit theft. Theft or extortion or attempt to commit any one of the two is an inevi table ingredient for robbery. In such a situation it is extremely difficult for the prosecution to sustain the conviction for the offence under section 395 of the IPC. We therefore set aside the conviction and sentence passed on the appellants for the aforesaid offence. 6. The above is not enough to dispose of this appeal nor to exonerate the appellants completely from the charge. The acts proved by the prosecution would fall within the ambit of section 457 of the IPC. Learned counsel for the appellants made a bid to contend that the said count was not included in the charge and hence the appellants are not liable to be convicted thereunder. Section 221 ii enables the court to convict the appellants of the offence which they have shown to have committed although they were not charged with it. If any such alteration is to be made the question is whether any prejudice would be caused to the appellants. We asked learned counsel for the appellants whether they want another opportunity to cross examine the prose cution witnesses focusing on the offence under section 457 IPC. Learned counsel fairly submitted that it is not necessary. 7. We therefore convict the appellants for the offence under section 457 read with section 34 of the IPC. We are told that the first appellant has undergone RI for more than three years and the second appellant has undergone RI for more than four years. We feel that the sentence for the aforesaid offence can be limit ed to imprisonment for the period already undergone by the ap pellants We do so. 8. The appeal is disposed of accordingly. 9. We direct the jail authorities to release the appellants from jail forthwith unless they are required in any other case. 0 HEADNOTE GENERAL INSURANCE General insurance Insurance against theft Distinction between theft and criminal breach of trust Respondent a jewellery shop owner taking out a Jeweller Block Policy from the appellant Customer visiting the shop taking away some ornament Res pondent lodging a claim with the insurer besides registering criminal complaint Insurer rejecting the claim holding that entrustment of jewellery to customer did not constitute theft covered by the policy State Consumer Protection Council also finding the claim of respondent to be unsustainable High Court on appeal holding that it was not a case of entrustment but the act of removal of the goods by the customer constituted theft and therefore the insurer was liable Whether High Court correct in holding so. Upholding the decision of the High Court held the customer in the instant case being an unknown person as seen from the FIR there was no occasion for the respondent to entrust the jewellery to him and it being a case of theft the insurer was clearly liable to make good the loss in terms of the policy taken by the respondent. HELD It is not in dispute that an insurance cover against theft was granted by the appellant. The insurance policy thus covered the risk of theft also. An insurer determines the extent of its risk. It floats the policy knowing fully well the risk it seeks to cover. Having regard to the determination of the risk only he fixes the quantum of premium. The insured while entering into a contract of insurance must precisely know the extent of his cover so that he may take out additional insurance if it is so required. Para 7 Clause 8 of the contract of insurance would be attracted only where the offences specified therein are committed by any of the persons mentioned therein. For defeating the claim of the respondent it was thus obligatory on the part of the appellant to establish that the conditions prescribed therein were satisfied. Para 9 The word entrust would imply giving responsibility to a person upon whom the owner has confidence. It envisages establishment of a relationship. When a customer enters into a jewellery shop as of necessity the owner or his agent must allow him to inspect the merchandise the customer intends to purchase. For the said purpose possession in the legal sense is not handed over. The owner or his agent does not loose complete control thereover. Para 13 For the purpose of arriving at a conclusion as to whether the exclusion clause is attracted or not loss or damage must be occasioned inter alia by a customer in respect of the property entrusted to him. The word customer contained in clause 8 c of the Insurance Policy must be read ejusdem generis. A customer con templated thereunder must have to be one who would be a man of trust. If a customer is not a man of trust or the property had not been entrusted to him the exclusion clause would not apply. The customer who committed theft of jewellery was an unknown person. It was so categorically stated in the First Information Report. There was thus no occasion for the respondent to entrust the jewellery to him. Para 14 We therefore are clearly of the opinion that the view taken by the High Court was correct. The High Court s judgment is upheld. The appeal is dismissed. We in the facts and circumstances of this case also direct the appellant to pay and bear the cost of the respondent throughout. Counsel s fee in this appeal is assessed at Rs.50 000 . Para 24 CASES REFERRED 1.M s Peacock Plywood Pvt. Ltd. v. The Oriental Insurance Co. Ltd. JT 2007 1 SC 191 Para 8 2.United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Kiran Combers Spinners 2007 1 SCC 368 Para 8 3.United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Pushpalaya Printers JT 2004 4 SC 352 Para 8 4.Ram Narayan Popli etc. v. Central Bureau of Investigation etc. JT 2003 1 SC 184 Para 23 5.Superintendent and Re membrancer of Legal Affairs W.B. v. S.K. Roy AIR 1974 SC 794 Para 22 6.The State of Gujarat v. Jaswant Lal Natha Lal 1968 2 SCR 408 Para 21 S.B. SINHA J. 1. Appellant insurer is before us questioning the correctness or otherwise of a judgment and order dated 10.09.1999 passed by a Division Bench of the High Court of Jammu Kashmir in CIMA 21 of 1998 allowing the appeal preferred by the respondent herein from a judgment and order dated 16.12.1997 passed by the Jammu Kashmir Consumers Protection Com mission. 2. Respondent herein carries on business in jewellery It obtained a policy known as Jeweller Block Policy . A theft of 140 gms of jewellery worth of Rs.63 000 occurred in his business premises. A First Information Report was lodged therefor. Respondent also lodged a claim with the appellant herein. The same having not been settled for a long time an application was filed before the State Consumers Protection Commission constituted under the J K Consumers Protection Act 1987. 3. The question raised before the Commission was as to whether the loss in question was covered by the insurance policy. Appellant contended that the claim of the respondent is covered by an exclusion clause contained in the policy which reads as under 8. Loss or damage occasioned by theft or dishonesty or any attempt there at committed by or where such loss or damage has been expedited or in any way sustained or brought about by a any of the insured s family members b any servant or traveller or messenger in the exclusive employment of the insured c any customer or broker or their customer or angadias or cutters or goldsmiths in respect of the property hereby insured entrusted to them by the insured his or their servants or agents. 4. The Commission by reason of its order dated 16.12.1997 inter alia found the said claim to be not sustainable on the ground that the loss was not covered by the said policy stating ...It appears to us that while preparing the insurance agreement the insurer was aware of the fact that this could be the easiest way for any Jeweller to raise claims against the insurance companies and that is why this clause has been deliberately introduced and theft by customer if any has been put in exclusive clause of the policy... 5. The High Court as indicated hereinbefore by reason of its judgment and order dated 10.09.1999 did not agree therewith. It was held What is meant by the term entrustment and does handing over of jewellery to a customer amounts to entrustment The dictionary meaning of the word entrust would be to give to another for care protection or to commit something trustfully or plays trust upon a person . If a customer enters the premises of a shopkeeper and examines some movable property and takes away the same then there hardly arises any occasion for entrustment to such a customer. In the present case a customer entered the business premises and removed 140 gms. of Jewellery. There was no entrustment on the part of the owner to the customer. The act of removal of the goods by the customer is nothing but a plain theft. This is a dishonest taking and removing of the property by the customer with the intent of permanently depriving the owner. 6. A short question which thus arises for our consideration is as to whether clause 8 of the policy is applicable to the facts and circumstances of the present case. 7. It is not in dispute that an insurance cover against theft was granted by the appellant. The insurance policy thus covered the risk of theft also. An insurer determines the extent of its risk. It floats the policy knowing fully well the risk it seeks to cover. Having regard to the determination of the risk only he fixes the quantum of premium. The insured while entering into a contract of insurance must precisely know the extent of his cover so that he may take out additional insurance if it is so required. 8. However there may be an express clause excluding the applicability of insurance cover. Wherever such exclusionary clause is contained in a policy it would be for the insurer to show that the case falls within the purview thereof. In a case of ambiguity it is trite the contract of insurance shall be construed in favour of the insured. See United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Pushpalaya Printers1 M s Peacock Plywood Pvt. Ltd. v. The Oriental Insurance Co. Ltd.2 and United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Kiran Combers Spinners3. 9. Clause 8 of the contract of insurance would be attracted only where the offences specified therein are committed by any of the persons mentioned therein. For defeating the claim of the respondent it was thus obligatory on the part of the appellant to establish that the conditions prescribed therein were satisfied. 10. Keeping in view the aforementioned legal aspect of the matter we may advert to the meaning of the word entrust . Its ordinary meaning would mean to charge or invest with a trust to commit to another with a certain confidence regarding his care See Advanced Law Lexicon by P. Ramanatha Aiyar 3rd Edn. Book 2 page1613 . 11. It requires no elaboration that offences of breach of trust and theft contain different ingredients. Whereas theft has been defined in Section 378 of the Indian Penal Code breach of trust has been defined in Section 405 thereof which reads as under 378. Theft. Whoever intending to take dishonestly any moveable property out of the possession of any person without that person s consent moves that property in order to such taking is said to commit theft. 12. Illustration d appended thereto reads as under d A being Z s servant and entrusted by Z with the care of Z s plate dishonestly runs away with the plate without Z s consent. A has committed theft. 405. Criminal breach of trust. Whoever being in any manner entrusted with property or with any dominion over property dishonestly misappropriates or converts to his own use that property or dishonestly uses or disposes of that property in violation of any direction of law prescribing the mode in which such trust is to be discharged or of any legal contract express or implied which he has made touching the discharge of such trust or willfully suffers any other person so to do commits criminal breach of trust 13. The word entrust would imply giving responsibility to a person upon whom the owner has confidence. It envisages establishment of a relationship. When a customer enters into a jewellery shop as of necessity the owner or his agent must allow him to inspect the merchandise the customer intends to purchase. For the said purpose possession in the legal sense is not handed over. The owner or his agent does not loose complete control thereover. 14. For the purpose of arriving at a conclusion as to whether the exclusion clause is attracted or not loss or damage must be occasioned inter alia by a customer in respect of the property entrusted to him. The word customer contained in clause 8 c of the Insurance Policy must be read ejusdem generis. A customer contemplated thereunder must have to be one who would be a man of trust. If a customer is not a man of trust or the property had not been entrusted to him the exclusion clause would not apply. The customer who committed theft of jewellery was an unknown person. It was so categorically stated in the First Information Report. There was thus no occasion for the respondent to entrust the jewellery to him. 15. Mr. Vishnu Mehra the learned counsel appearing for the appellant has relied upon the meaning of the word entrust as contained in Black s Law Dictionary 8th Edn. and Webster s Universal Dictionary. 16. In Black s Law Dictionary the word entrust has been defined as under To give a person the responsibility for something after establishing a confidential relationship. 17. In Webster s Universal Dictionary meaning of the word entrust reads as under To confer as a responsibility duty etc. to place something in another s care. 18. Apart from the fact that the said meaning of the term entrustment goes against the submission of Mr. Mehra we may notice that in Black s Law Dictionary the word entrusting in commercial law has been described as The transfer of possession of goods to a merchant who deals in goods of that type and who may in turn transfer the goods and all rights to them to a purchaser in the ordinary course of business. Transfer of possession of goods therefore is a sine qua non for entrustment. The person must be handed over the possession of the property. Illustration d appended to Section 378 IPC envisages a situation of this nature. It by no stretch of imagination would have contemplated a situation where an unknown customer would have committed theft. 19. The word entrustment moreover must be read in the context in which it has been used. 20. In Colinvaux s Law of Insurance 7th Edn. by Robert Merkin at page 50 it is stated Words in context The above generality is not applicable when it is clear from the context that the words are not used in a colloquial popular sense. Thus the word flood in the phrase strom tempest or floor does not cover a case where a house holder s bathroom is affected by upward seepage of water to a depth of three inches as the context of the word requires an event violent sudden or abnormal. Similarly heavy rain is not in itself likely to constitute a storm. It has also been held that the phrase sum actually paid in a reinsurance agreement referred to a sum which the reinsured is merely liable to pay as the agreement read as a whole was against liability rather than actual payment. 21. In The State of Gujarat v. Jaswant Lal Natha Lal1 this Court held ...The expression entrustment carries with it the implication that the person handing over any property or on whose behalf that property is handed over to another continues to be its owner. Further the person handing over the property must have confidence in the person taking the property so as to create a fiduciary relationship between them. A mere transaction of sale cannot amount to an entrustment... 22. In Superintendent and Re membrancer of Legal Affairs W.B. v. S.K. Roy1 this Court held 12. To constitute an offence under Section 409 IPC it is not required that misappropriation must necessarily take place after the creation of a legally correct entrustment or dominion over property. The entrustment may arise in any manner whatsoever. That manner may or may not involve fraudulent conduct of the accused. Section 409 IPC covers dishonest misappropriation in both types of cases that is to say those where the receipt of property is itself fraudulent or improper and those where the public servant misappropriates what may have been quite properly and innocently received. All that is required is what may be described as entrustment or acquisition of dominion over property in the capacity of a public servant who as a result of it becomes charged with a duty to act in a particular way or atleast honestly. 23. Yet again in Ram Narayan Popli etc. v. Central Bureau of Investigation etc.2 it was held 361. To constitute an offence of criminal breach of trust there must be an entrustment there must be misappropriation or conversion to one s own use or use in violation of a legal direction or of any legal contract and the misappropriation or conversion or disposal must be with a dishonest intention. When a person allows others to misappropriate the money entrusted to him that amounts to a criminal breach of trust as defined by Section 405. The section is relatable to property in a positive part and a negative part. The positive part deals with criminal misappropriation or conversion of the property and the negative part consists of dishonestly using or disposing of the property in violation of any direction and of law or any contract touching the discharge of trust. 362. In Jaswantrai Manilal Akhaney v. State of Bombay it was held that if the Managing Director of the Bank entrusted with securities owned by the pledgor disposes of their securities against the stipulated terms of the contract entered into by the parties with an intent to cause wrongful loss to the pledgor and wrongful gain to the Bank there can be no question but that the Managing Director has necessary mens rea required by Section 405. 363. The term entrustment is not necessarily a term of law. It may have different implications in different contexts. In its most general signification all it imports is the handing over possession for some purpose which may not imply the conferring of any proprietary right at all. 364. When a person misappropriates to his own use the property that does not belong to him the misappropriation is dishonest even though there was an intention to restore it at some future point of time. 24. We therefore are clearly of the opinion that the view taken by the High Court was correct. The High Court s judgment is upheld. The appeal is dismissed. We in the facts and circumstances of this case also direct the appellant to pay and bear the cost of the respondent throughout. Counsel s fee in this appeal is assessed at Rs.50 000 . 0 HEADNOTE INSURANCE LAW Rule of contra proferentem Insurance Policy covered theft following an actual forcible and violent entry or exit from the premises Appellant made a case for theft without forcible entry Respondent No.1 rejected the claim as for a valid claim violent and forcible entry was necessary Appellant invoked Rule of contra proferentem alleging ambiguity in terms of policy. Held it is well settled law that there is no difference between a contract of insurance and any other contract and that it should be construed strictly without adding or deleting anything from the terms thereof. A plain reading of the policy shows that a forcible entry should precede the theft and unless that is proved claim cannot be accepted. There being no ambiguity in the relevant clause of the policy rule of contra proferentem cannot be invoked. United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures P Ltd. JT 2016 1 SC 147 General Assurance Society Ltd. cases referred. HELD We are of the opinion that there is no error committed by the MRTP Commission in rejecting the Claim of the Appellant. It is clear from the facts of the present case that the Appellant has made out a case of theft without a forcible entry. The case of the Appellant is that forcible entry is not required for a claim to be made under the policy. Following the well accepted principle that a contract of insurance which is like any other commercial contract should be interpreted strictly we are of the opinion that the policy covers loss or damage by burglary or house breaking which have been explained as theft following an actual forcible and violent entry from the premises. A plain reading of the policy would show that a forcible entry should precede the theft and unless they are proved the claim cannot be accepted. Para 7 It is well settled law that there is no difference between a contract of insurance and any other contract and that it should be construed strictly without adding or deleting anything from the terms thereof. On applying the said principle we have no doubt that a forcible entry is required for a claim to be allowed under the policy for burglary house breaking. Para 9 The Policy in this case is in a standard form. The policy for Burglary and House Breaking in United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures P Ltd. supra and the policy in this case are identical. If there is any ambiguity or doubt the clause in the Policy should be interpreted in favour of the insured. But we see no ambiguity in the relevant clause of the policy and the rule of contra proferentem is not applicable. Para 12 For the aforementioned reasons we uphold the order of the MRTP Commission and dismiss the Appeal with no order as to costs. Para 13 RULE OF CONSTRUCTION Rule of contra proferentem Verba chartarum fortius accipiuntur contra proferentem What is. Held the rule states that ambiguity in the wording of the policy is to be resolved against the party who prepared it. MacGillivray s case Colinvaux s Law of Insurance referred. Para 10 CASES REFERRED 1.United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures P Ltd. JT 2016 1 SC 147 Para 4.1 2.United India Assurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal JT 2004 8 SC 8 Para 5 3.General Assurance Society Ltd. v. Chandmull Jain and Anr. 1966 3 SCR 500 Para 11 L. NAGESWARA RAO J. 1. The Appellant is a wholly owned Public Sector Undertaking of the Government of Orissa. The Appellant finances medium and large scale industries within the State of Orissa and is also involved in setting up joint sector industries with private entrepreneurs. The Appellant extended a term loan of Rs. 40 74 000 to M s. Josna Casting Centre Orissa Pvt. Ltd. As the loan amount was not repaid the Appellant exercising its power under Section 29 of the State Finance Corporation Act 1951 took over the assets of M s. Josna Casting Centre Orissa Private Limited on 14 02 1992. On 23 01 1996 the Appellant insured the said assets with Respondent No. 1 for a sum of Rs. 46 00 000 under the Miscellaneous Accident Policy Rs. 60 40 000 under the Fire Policy and Rs. 46 00 000 under the Burglary and House Breaking Policy. 2. The seized assets were put to auction by the Appellant on 22 01 1997 at which point of time it was detected that some parts of the plant and machinery were missing from the factory premises. The Appellant registered an FIR on 25 01 1997 in the Remona Police Station Balasore regarding the theft burglary of the plant and machinery. On 07 02 1997 the Appellant informed Respondent No. 1 about the theft and requested for issuance of a claim form. A claim was lodged with Respondent No. 1 on 16 12 1997 for an amount of Rs. 34 40 650 under the Burglary and House Breaking Policy. The valuation reports given by GEC Calcutta the machines supplier and Alpha Transformer Ltd. Bhubaneswar were relied upon by the Appellant Claimant. The claim of the Appellant was repudiated by Respondent No. 1 on 31 03 1998 on the ground that the alleged loss did not come within the purview of the insurance policy. 3. The Appellant filed compensation application No. 45 of 2001 under Section 12 B read with Section 36 A of the Monopolies and Restrictive Trade Practices MRTP Act 1969 which was rejected by the MRTP Commission New Delhi by its Order dated 17 08 2005. Aggrieved by the said Order the Appellant has preferred the present Appeal. 4. Mr. Raj Kumar Mehta counsel for the Appellant took us through the proposal form for Burglary and House Breaking Insurance Business Premises. The scope of cover in the said proposal form is as follows SCOPE OF COVER This Insurance Policy provides cover against loss or damage by Burglary or House breaking i.e. theft following an actual forcible and violent entry of and or exit from the premises in respect of contents of offices warehouses shops etc. and cash in safe or strong room and also damage caused to the premises except as detailed below 4.1 It was further submitted by Mr. Mehta that the rule of contra proferentem would be applicable to the present case and he relied upon the judgment of this Court in United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures P Ltd. reported at JT 2016 1 SC 147 2016 3 SCC 49 . 5. Mr. Mehta submitted that the words theft following an actual forcible and violent entry or exit from the premises are with reference only to house breaking and not burglary. According to him forcible and violent entry is not necessary for making a valid claim under the policy. It would be sufficient that there is theft of certain goods from the factory premises which fact has been proved by the Appellant. Mr. Mehta referred to a judgment of this Court in United India Assurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal reported in JT 2004 8 SC 8 2004 8 SCC 644 which related to a claim pertaining to a theft and attempted to distinguish it. He submitted that the clause in the policy in that case is different from that involved in the present case. He urged that the Commission committed an error in relying upon the said judgment to reject the Claim Application for the Appellant. 6. Mr. Salil Paul Advocate for Respondent No.1 submitted that there is no difference in the policies involved in the case cited supra and the instant case. He also urged that an insurance policy is akin to a commercial contract and has to be construed strictly. Mr. Paul submitted that a forcible entry and or exit is compulsory for maintainability of a claim under the policy. 7. Having considered the submissions made on both sides we are of the opinion that there is no error committed by the MRTP Commission in rejecting the Claim of the Appellant. It is clear from the facts of the present case that the Appellant has made out a case of theft without a forcible entry. The case of the Appellant is that forcible entry is not required for a claim to be made under the policy. Following the well accepted principle that a contract of insurance which is like any other commercial contract should be interpreted strictly we are of the opinion that the policy covers loss or damage by burglary or house breaking which have been explained as theft following an actual forcible and violent entry from the premises. A plain reading of the policy would show that a forcible entry should precede the theft and unless they are proved the claim cannot be accepted. The provisions of the policy in United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal supra read as under THE COMPANY HEREBY AGREES subject to the terms and conditions contained herein endorsed or otherwise expressed hereon that if the property hereinafter described or any part thereof be LOST or DAMAGED by BURGLARY and or HOUSE BREAKING or ANY DAMAGE be caused to the premises to be made good by the insured from BURGLARY and or HOUSE BREAKING or any attempt thereat. 7.1 The term burglary and or house breaking has been defined in terms of the policy which are as follows Burglary and or house breaking shall mean theft involving entry to or exit from the premises stated therein by forcible and violent means or following assault or violence or threat thereof to the insured or to his employees or to the members of his family. 8. A comparison of the above terms as defined in the policy in the case of United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal supra and the scope of cover in the proposal form in the instant case are similar. This Court in the said judgment of United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal supra considered the scope of a policy involving burglary and house breaking and held as follows The policy is a contract between the parties and both parties are bound by the terms of contract. As per the definition of the word burglary followed with violence makes it clear that if any theft is committed it should necessarily be preceded with violence i.e. entry into the premises for committing theft should involve force or violence or threat to insurer or to his employees or to the members of his family. Therefore the element of force and violence is a condition precedent for burglary and housebreaking. The term burglary as defined in the English Dictionary means an illegal entry into the building with an intent to commit crime such as theft. But in absence of violence or force the insurer cannot claim indemnification against the insurance company. The terms of the policy have to be construed as it is and we cannot add or subtract something. Howsoever liberally we may construe the policy but we cannot take liberalism to the extent of substituting the words which are not intended. It is true that in common parlance the term burglary would mean theft but it has to be preceded with force or violence. If the element of force and violence is not present then the insurer cannot claim compensation against theft from the insurance company. This expression appearing in the insurance policy came up for interpretation before the English Courts and the English Courts in no uncertain terms laid down that burglary or theft has to be preceded with force or violence in order to be indemnified by the insurance company. In this connection reference may be made to the statement of law as summarized in Halsbury s Laws of England Fourth Edition 2003 Reissue Para 646. It reads as under 646. Forcible and violent entry. The terms of a burglary insurance may exclude liability in certain circumstances unless there is forcible and violent entry into the premises. If so the entry must be obtained by the use of both force and violence or the definition is not satisfied and the policy does not apply. An entry obtained by turning the handle of an outside door or by using a skeleton key though sufficient to constitute a criminal offence is not within the policy since the element of violence is absent. However an entry obtained by picking the lock or forcing back the catch by means of an instrument involves the use of violence and is therefore covered. The policy may be so framed as to apply only to violent entry from the outside or the violent entry into a room within the insured premises may be sufficient. In any case the violence must be connected with the act of entry if the entry is obtained without violence the subsequent use of violence to effect the theft as for instance where a show case is broken open does not bring the loss within the policy. 9. It is well settled law that there is no difference between a contract of insurance and any other contract and that it should be construed strictly without adding or deleting anything from the terms thereof. On applying the said principle we have no doubt that a forcible entry is required for a claim to be allowed under the policy for burglary house breaking. 10. We proceed to deal with the submission made by counsel for the Appellant regarding the rule of contra proferentem. The Common Law rule of construction verba chartarum fortius accipiuntur contra proferentem means that ambiguity in the wording of the policy is to be resolved against the party who prepared it. MacGillivray on Insurance Law 1 deals with the rule of contra proferentem as follows The contra proferentem rule of construction arises only where there is a wording employed by those drafting the clause which leaves the court unable to decide by ordinary principles of interpretation which of two meanings is the right one. One must not use the rule to create the ambiguity one must find the ambiguity first. The words should receive their ordinary and natural meaning unless that is displaced by a real ambiguity either appearing on the face of the policy or possibly by extrinsic evidence of surrounding circumstances. footnotes omitted Colinvaux s Law of Insurance 2 propounds the contra proferentem rule as under Quite apart from contradictory clauses in policies ambiguities are common in them and it is often very uncertain what the parties to them mean. In such cases the rule is that the policy being drafted in language chosen by the insurers must be taken most strongly against them. It is construed contra proferentes against those who offer it. In a doubtful case the turn of the scale ought to be given against the speaker because he has not clearly and fully expressed himself. Nothing is easier than for the insurers to express themselves in plain terms. The assured cannot put his own meaning upon a policy but where it is ambiguous it is to be construed in the sense in which he might reasonably have understood it. If the insurers wish to escape liability under given circumstances they must use words admitting of no possible doubt. But a clause is only to be contra proferentes in cases of real ambiguity. One must not use the rule to create an ambiguity. On must find the ambiguity first. Even where a clause by itself is ambiguous if by looking at the whole policy its meaning becomes clear there is no room for the application of the doctrine. So also where if one meaning is given to a clause the rest of the policy becomes clear the policy should be construed accordingly. footnotes omitted 11. This court in General Assurance Society Ltd. v. Chandmull Jain and Anr. reported in 1966 3 SCR 500 held that there is no difference between a contract of insurance and any other contract except that in a contract of insurance there is a requirement of uberima fides i.e. good faith on the part of the insured and the contract is likely to be construed contra proferentes i.e. against the company in case of ambiguity or doubt. It was further held in the said judgment that the duty of the Court is to interpret the words in which the contract is expressed by the parties and it is not for the Court to make a new contract however reasonable. 12. In United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures P Ltd. supra cited by the Counsel for the Appellant it was held that there is no ambiguity in the insurance policy and so the rule of contra proferentem was not applicable. A standard policy of insurance is different from other Contracts and in a claim under a standard policy the rule of contra proferentem is to be applied. The Policy in this case is in a standard form. The policy for Burglary and House Breaking in United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures P Ltd. supra and the policy in this case are identical. If there is any ambiguity or doubt the clause in the Policy should be interpreted in favour of the insured. But we see no ambiguity in the relevant clause of the policy and the rule of contra proferentem is not applicable. 13. For the aforementioned reasons we uphold the order of the MRTP Commission and dismiss the Appeal with no order as to costs. 0 HEADNOTE CONSTITUTION OF INDIA 1950 Article 32 Army service Petitioner dismissed from service for having abetted the commission of offence of theft Principal accused acquitted of the offence Abetment fails when substantive offence is not established against the principal offender Respondents directed to pay the entire pension and other entitlements to the petitioner. CRIMINAL LAW Abetment Abetment of offence of theft Principal accused acquitted Abetment fails when substantive offence is not established against the principal offender. SERVICE AND LABOUR LAW Army Service Reinstatement Petitioner dismissed from service for having abetted the commission of offence of theft Principal accused acquitted of the offence Abetment fails when substantive offence is not established against the principal offender Respondents directed to pay the entire pension and other entitlements to the petitioner Constitution of India 1950 Article 32. HELD Having examined the facts in the instant case we are of the view that the ratio laid down in Faguna Kanta Nath s case and later followed in Madan Raj Bhandari s case is attracted. The petitioner was charged with the offence of abetment by conspiracy of the commission of the offence of theft by Major Trilok Chand. The High Court of Allahabad has clearly held that there was no evidence that Major Trilok Chand has committed the theft therefore unless the substantive offence against the principal offender is established the question of abettor being held guilty under these circumstances does not arise. The petitioner is alleged to have entered into a conspiracy alongwith eight others and abetted the commission of the offence. All the other alleged abettors are acquitted and the principal offender Major Trilok Chand is also acquitted and the petitioner alone remains in the picture as one having abetted the offence by entering into conspiracy. It is axiomatic that there cannot be a conspiracy of one. In Topan Das v. The State of Bombay 1955 2 SCR 881 it was held that two or more persons must be parties to such an agreement and one person along can never be held guilty of criminal conspiracy for the reason that one cannot conspire with oneself. Para 9 CASES REFERRED 1. Lt. Col. TS Harbans Singh Sandhu v. Union of India and Others Judgment dated 22.1.1978. 2. Madan Raj Bhandari v. State of Rajasthan 1970 1 SCR 688 3. Jamuna Singh v. State of Bihar AIR 1967 SC 553 4. Faguna Kanta Nath v. The State of Assam 1959 Supp. 2 SCR 1 5. Topan Das v. The State of Bombay 1955 2 SCR 881 REDDY J. 1. This petition is filed under Article 32 of the Constitution of India seeking an appropriate writ directing the respondents i.e. Union of India and the Chief of the Army Staff to restore the petitioner to service with all consequential benefits and grant of pension. 2. The petitioner entered the Indian Army in 1939 and served in Burma during the Second World War and later joined Indian National Army and fought under the leadership of the Netaji Subhash Chander Bose and on India attaining independence he rejoined Indian Army in 1948 and was promoted to the rank of Hawaldar. He was released from Army service on 15.10.1964 consequent to the reduction of manpower and consequently he joined Defence Security Corps on 14.9.1967 and served till 29.7.78. While serving in Defence Security Corps in 1976 at Pathankot he alongwith Major Trilok Chand who at the relevant time was serving as their Officer and nine others was charge sheeted by the Court martial. The charge against them was that Trilok Chand committed the theft of 250 wheel drums while getting them loaded in a civil truck and that the others abetted the commission of the said offence. Major Trilok Chand was found guilty and out of the nine abetters eight abetters were acquitted. Major Trilok Chand was awarded one year imprisonment. The petitioner was dismissed from the service with an imprisonment of 90 days in civil prison. Major Trilok Chand questioned the proceedings of the Court martial before the High Court of Allahabad in Writ Petition No. 13161 of 1981. The High Court allowed the writ petition and held that there was no evidence that it was Trilok Chand who removed the wheel drums and consequently the High Court found that there was no material to support the charge of theft. The review petition filed by the Union of India was dismissed by the High Court and the S.L.P. No. 9294 of 1987 filed by the Union of India in the Supreme Court was dismissed on 5.10.87. Consequently Major Trilok Chand has been reinstated in the service. 3. In view of the fact that the main accused has been acquitted and reinstated in service the petitioner requested the authorities to review his case and give the necessary relief but his request was rejected. Hence the present petition. 4. Learned counsel for the petitioner submitted that since the principal accused Major Trilok Chand has been acquitted of the charge of theft and has also been reinstated the petitioner who was only charged of abetment of the said offence of theft can not be found guilty. 5. In support of his submissions learned counsel has relied on some of the decisions of this Court in Faguna Kanta Nath v. The State of Assam 1959 Supp. 2 SCR 1 Jamuna Singh v. State of Bihar AIR 1967 SC 553 and Madan Raj Bhandari v. State of Rajasthan 1970 1 SCR 688. 6. In Faguna Kanta Nath s case the appellant was tried for an offence under Section 165A of the Indian Penal Code for having abetted the commission of an offence by an officer. The said officer was acquitted on the ground that no offence under Section 161 was committed. Consequently the Court held that appellant s conviction for the offence of abetment was not maintainable. 7. This case is referred to in Jamuna Singh s case and it is held that it cannot be held in law that a person cannot ever be convicted of abetting a certain offence when the person alleged to have committed that offence in consequence of the abetment has been acquitted. The question of the abettor s guilt depends on the nature of the act abetted and the manner in which the abetment was made. The offence of abetment is complete when the alleged abettor has instigated another or engaged with another in a conspiracy to commit the offence. It is not necessary for the offence of abetment that the action abetted must be committed. It is only in the case of a person abetting an offence by intentionally aiding another to commit that offence that the charge of abetment against him would be expected to fail when the person alleged to have committed the offence is acquitted of that offence. 8. Madan Raj Bhandari s is a case where the appellant was charged with having abetted one Mst. Radha in causing miscarriage to a woman and that Mst. Radha was acquitted but the appellant was convicted. This Court referred to the principle laid down in Faguna Kantha Nath s case and held that the facts of the present case fell within the rule that a charge of abetment fails ordinarily when the substantive offence is not established against the principal offender. It may not be necessary to multiply the discussions on this aspect. 9. Having examined the facts in the instant case we are of the view that the ratio laid down in Faguna Kanta Nath s case and later followed in Madan Raj Bhandari s case is attracted. The petitioner was charged with the offence of abetment by conspiracy of the commission of the offence of theft by Major Trilok Chand. The High Court of Allahabad has clearly held that there was no evidence that Major Trilok Chand has committed the theft therefore unless the substantive offence against the principal offender is established the question of abettor being held guilty under these circumstances does not arise. The petitioner is alleged to have entered into a conspiracy alongwith eight others and abetted the commission of the offence. All the other alleged abettors are acquitted and the principal offender Major Trilok Chand is also acquitted and the petitioner alone remains in the picture as one having abetted the offence by entering into conspiracy. It is axiomatic that there cannot be a conspiracy of one. In Topan Das v. The State of Bombay 1955 2 SCR 881 it was held that two or more persons must be parties to such an agreement and one person along can never be held guilty of criminal conspiracy for the reason that one cannot conspire with oneself. 10. We may also mention here that under similar circumstances this Court in Writ Petition No. 553 of 1972 Lt. Col. TS Harbans Singh Sandhu v. Union of India and Others Judgment dated 22.11.78 directed the payment of pension and the gratuity as per the rules. 11. For all these reasons we direct the respondents to pay the entire pension gratuity and other entitlements to the petitioner as per the rules within four months. The Writ Petition is accordingly allowed with costs. 0 HEADNOTE ELECTRICITY LAWS Indian Electricity Act 1910 Sections 39 and 44 Electricity supply Tampering of electricity meter and theft of electricity by two industrial users a company and a partnership firm located side by side Theft detected by surprise raid during the night Managing director of the company and the partners of the firm convicted by the trial court and sentenced to three months imprisonment besides monetary fine Lower appellate court dismissing the appeals High Court also dismissing the revision Validity. Held large scale theft of electricity being an alarming problem causing enormous loss to the Electricity Suppliers should be dealt with firmly and besides disconnection of supply and conviction of the erring persons heavy monetary fine should be levied. In the instant cases theft of enormous electricity having been established no interference was called for in so far as the conviction of the appellants is concerned. However in view of peculiar facts since the appellants had already served out a part of the sentence instead of making them serve out the remainder term after a lapse of 17 years in the interest of justice monetary fine imposed by the lower court enhanced. HELD On consideration of the totality of the entire case we do not find any merit in the submissions made on behalf of the appellants. In our view no interference is called for in the impugned judgment so far as conviction of the appellants under Sections 39 and 44 of the Act is concerned and consequently we uphold the impugned judgment as far as conviction of the appellants is concerned. Para 28 We have also heard the learned counsel for the appellants on the point of sentence. It was submitted before the Trial Court and before this Court also that it is the first offence of the appellants. They have family members and minor dependents. Appellant number 2 is a lady. More than 17 years have elapsed and now sending the appellants to jail for serving out the remaining part of their sentence would be extremely harsh. The appellants have already served out a part of their sentence and sending them back to jail to serve out the remaining sentence would cause tremendous hardship to the appellants and their family members. Para 29 Large scale theft of electricity is a very alarming problem faced by all the State Electricity Boards in our country which is causing loss to the State revenue running into hundreds of crores every year. In our considered view after proper adjudication of the cases of all those who are found to be guilty of the offence of committing theft of electricity apart from the sentence of conviction the Court should invariably impose heavy fine making theft of electricity a wholly non profitable venture. The most effective step to curb this tendency perhaps could be to discontinue supply of electricity to those consumers for temporarily or permanently who have been caught abstracting electricity in a clandestine manner on more than one occasion. The legislature may consider incorporating this suggestion as a form of punishment by amending Section 39 of the Indian Electricity Act of 1910. Para 30 On consideration of the peculiar facts and circumstances of the case where the appellants have already served out a part of the sentence and instead of compelling them to serve out the remaining sentence after lapse of 17 years in the interest of justice we deem it appropriate to increase the fine from Rs.40 000 each to Rs.3 00 000 each in case of appellants number 1 and 3 Jagmodhan Mehatabsing Gujaral and Harcharanpalsing Nanda respectively and from Rs.20 000 to Rs.2 00 000 under Section 39 of the Act in case of appellant number 2 Mrs. Rupender Kaur Harcharanpalsing . The appellants are further sentenced to pay a fine of Rs.5 000 each under Section 44 of the Act. Para 31 Dalveer Bhandari J. 1. Leave granted. 2. This appeal is directed against the judgment of the High Court of Judicature at Bombay dated 23.1.2006 in Criminal Revision Application No.458 2005 and Criminal Revision Application No.11 of 2006. 3. The appellants in this appeal had been convicted by the Additional Chief Judicial Magistrate First Class Pune by the judgment dated 21.12.1996 under Sections 39 and 44 of the Indian Electricity Act 1910 hereinafter referred to as the Act and were also directed to pay a fine. These appellants were directed to suffer three months rigorous imprisonment. Appellants number 1 3 were also directed to pay a fine of Rs.40 000 each and appellant number 2 to pay a fine of Rs.20 000 under Section 39 of the Act. 4. The appellants aggrieved by the said judgment of the Additional Chief Judicial Magistrate Pune filed an appeal before the Ad hoc Additional Sessions Judge Pune being Appeal No. 12 of 1997. The learned Additional Sessions Judge again evaluated the entire evidence and examined the documents on record and reached the same finding and consequently dismissed the appeal filed by the appellants. 5. The Criminal Revision filed against the said judgment of the Additional Sessions Judge was dismissed by the High Court of Judicature at Bombay vide judgment dated 23.1.2006. Both the learned Additional Sessions Judge and the High Court upheld the decision of the Additional Chief Judicial Magistrate. 6. The brief facts which are relevant to dispose of this appeal are recapitulated as under. 7. Appellant number 1 was the Managing Director of M s. Nanda Glass Industries Pvt. Ltd. located at Gat No. 679 680 Valu Taluka Bhor and appellants number 2 and 3 are the partners of the partnership firm M s. Technoframes. Both the industries were adjacent to each other. 8. The Consumer number of M s. Nanda Glass Industries Pvt. Ltd. is 17941 900102 3 with sanctioned load CD 225 KVA for toughening of glass. The Consumer number of M s. Technoframes is 1 416 with Meter No. 9030013 TPHR 605 dated 10.7.1986. The sanctioned load of Consumer number 1 416 is 60 H.P. for toughening of glass. 9. Upon receiving information that there was theft of electric energy being committed by the appellants at these two electric connections for their industry at night the complainant V. G. Kokane the then Dy. Executive Engineer and in charge of flying squad of MSEB and Executive Engineer Kadam with their other testing staff etc. and two Panchas went to M s. Nanda Glass Industries Pvt. Ltd. and Technoframes in the intervening night of 3 4.10.1989 for the purpose of inspection and checking. 10. It was found that the power of 225 KVA was sanctioned to accused no. 1 on contract demand with H.T. metering for the purposes of recording consumption. One iron box was provided for Trivector Meter. The box was closed and duly sealed under the seal of M.S.E.B. There was CTPC unit provided at D.P. Pole from which the wires were brought into the Meter Box through a conduit pipe so that they could not be tampered. The appellants dislocated the conduit pipe at the bend and socket. They had cut and removed voltage wire of one phase and current wire of another phase so that actual consumption could not be recorded by the meter. Similarly the appellants by tampering meters ensured that actual consumption of power used for main furnaces and blower was not recorded from December 1987 so that there could not be any difficulty in putting explanation if any called upon by the M.S.E.B. The daily consumption of power was to be recorded by the consumer in prescribed G 7 form but it was found that it was written only once in every month. On 3.5.1988 while it was inspected by the Testing Division abruptly abnormal difference was found between the entries noted by the consumer in G 7 form and the reading recorded by the officers of the M.S.E.B. The copies of these forms were attached to the complaint. 11. In the intervening night of 3 4 10 1989 when the complainant and his companions went to the premises they found one watchman on the gate who was called Bapu Bhagwan Alder. He was said to be a Shift Operator cum Supervisor and he showed the actual condition of the connections to them. Bapu Bhagwan Alder had put his signatures on the Inspection Reports drawn on the spot being exhibit Nos.90 and 91. He also voluntarily gave one statement in writing marked as exhibit No. 80 stating that the industry was actually working at the time of the visit. The factory was normally working in three shifts. It was found at the place of L.T. Connection supplied for Technoframes that though the said company was bearing a different name the electric power was being used for toughening of glass in M s. Nanda Glass Industries. The members of the raid team along with complainant found drastic changes and tampering done by the accused in the said connection wherein three incoming wires and other three outgoing wires of the meter were joined together at their respective ends by taking them out from outgoing phase of the terminal box of the meter. Therefore the meter was totally by passed and it was not recording the electricity which was consumed. The meter terminal cover and the seals of the M.S.E.B. were not available and there was 100 theft of energy of 60 H.P. The complainant V.G. Kokane had taken photographs to show the tampering of the electric connection and taking of such photographs was indicated in the seizure panchanama. 12. The appellants did not pay any amount more than the minimum charges to the Board whereas the actual consumption of the electricity was much more. It was assessed by the complainant as an Expert in the field that there was consumption of 10 00 000 units and 16075 VA power worth of Rs.12 00 000 from H.T. connection whereas 5 00 000 units worth of Rs.4 50 000 from L.T. connection and the theft of energy of Rs.16 50 000 committed by them. The photographs of the actual position seen by the raiding party were taken on the spot and that they were produced in the police station during investigation. Similarly the original seals of H.T. Meter Box were cut and seized in a closed packet duly sealed under the signatures of the Panchas which were also produced by them in the police station. As it was likely that there will be rejoining or change in the position of the L.T. Connection I 416 the room in which it was installed was duly locked and the lock was sealed with paper bearing signatures of the Panchas was pasted on it. Both the keys of the lock were also given by the complainant in the police station along with the complaint. The complaint was registered at the Bhor Police Station at about 7.30 p.m. on 4.10.1989. The original panchnama drawn by the M.S.E.B. officials and the Panchas at the time of actual raid were also produced by the complainant with true statement of consumption of M s. Nanda Glass Industries for the purposes of evidence in support of the allegations. 13. After proper investigation of the entire case the charges against the appellants were framed under Sections 39 and 44 of the Electricity Act to which the appellants pleaded not guilty. It may be pertinent to mention that the presence of accused Ravindra Birbal Khadake could not be secured in spite of issuing warrants and the Chief Judicial Magistrate was pleased to order for separation of trial against him. We are not concerned with the said accused in this appeal. 14. In the trial of the instant case the prosecution had examined seven witnesses Ramchandra Paigude PW1 attested the panchanama of exhibit 74. It was drawn during the surprise visit by the raiding party in the night. He also proved exhibit 78 a sealed packet that was opened in the court containing three seats which were removed from the meter in the premises of the glass industry. Shankar Anpat PW2 Executive Engineer Lokhote PW3 Junior Engineer Security Officer complainant Vijay Kokane PW4 Dy. Executive Engineer and in charge of flying squad and Pathan PW5 Junior Vigilance Officer were employees of the MSEB. These officials of the board described how they had visited the factory and detected existence of fraudulent means of abstraction of electricity without recording consumption in the meter. PW6 is one of the panch witnesses who had attested exhibit 101. In his presence another panch had climbed atop the meter room located in the premises of Technoframes. It was found that planks in the roof were newly fitted with fresh nailing. Vishnu Mane PW7 had investigated the offence and sent charge sheet to the court. 15. Ramchandra Paigude PW1 an independent witness fully supported the prosecution version. He was under no obligation to favour the Board officials. He had also stated that the watchman Wadkar had called Bapu Aldar and he was introduced as shift supervisor and had taken the raiding party to the electric installations. 16. The defence of the appellants is that of denial of abstraction and dishonest consumption or use of electric energy by them directly or by any artificial means or the means not authorized by the licensee. 17. The appellants were found guilty of the offences punishable under Sections 39 and 44 of the Electricity Act. According to the Trial Court the prosecution had succeeded in establishing the commission of theft of the electric energy worth about Rs.16 50 000 . 18. The appellants aggrieved by the judgment of the Trial Court preferred an appeal before the learned Sessions Court Pune. The first Appellate Court again examined in detail the entire evidence and the arguments advanced by the parties. The first Appellate Court also examined the relevant decided cases of this Court and other courts. The appeal filed by the appellants was dismissed by a detailed and comprehensive judgment dated 27.12.2005. 19. The appellants preferred a revision petition before the High Court of Judicature at Bombay which was dismissed vide order dated 23.1.2006. The appellants aggrieved by the said judgment of the High Court have preferred this appeal. 20. It was submitted by the appellants that the complainant was not authorized to file FIR. The Trial Court had considered this argument of the appellants. The Trial Court has correctly mentioned in its judgment that by the amendment in the provisions of Section 50 the word Government or a State Electricity Board or an Electric Inspector or a person aggrieved by same has been amended and the officers of the State Electricity Board or a person aggrieved by the theft are authorized by the notification to lodge a complaint. The complainant was fully justified in filing the complaint. We do not find any merit in this argument of the appellants. 21. The appellants submitted that there is manifest error in the judgment of the Trial Court which was affirmed by the first appellate court and the High Court by which the appellants were convicted and sentenced to three months rigorous imprisonment on the ground that the theft of electricity to the extent of an amount of Rs.17 35 453.52 was extracted by the appellants whereas the Civil Court had come to the conclusion and passed the decree in favour of the respondent Maharashtra State Electricity Board in Civil Suit No.156 92 for only Rs.3 07 999.74. 22. On evaluation of the entire evidence and documents on record when the case of theft has been fully proved then whether the theft of energy was to the extent of Rs.17 35 453.52 or Rs.3 07 999.74 really makes no difference as there was theft of energy on a large scale for a long time. The appellants cannot take advantage of the fact that the respondents had not appealed against the judgment of the Joint Civil Judge Senior Division Pune who had passed the decree for Rs.3 07 999.74. 23. The appellants had also alleged that 48 hours notice was not given to the appellants before conducting the raid. 24. The Trial Court had dealt with the aspect of giving 48 hours notice before conducting the raid. In a case of a surprise raid 48 hours notice to the appellants is not envisaged by the Legislature and otherwise also it would have been counter productive because there was a strong possibility of obliterating and or destroying the entire evidence to connect the appellants with the crime. Moreover even if it is so accepted it is on record that the Watchman and Bapu Bhagwan Alder were found present in the premises on behalf of the appellants and that they did assist the raiding team to carry on their work. It is reported by the police in reply to summons that Bapu Bhagwan Alder was serving in some Glass Factory in Pune but he could not be traced out for the purpose of tendering the evidence before the Court. In fact it was possible for the appellants to bring him in the box at least as defence witness to state that he had no concern with the industry of the accused. Moreover the employment record or muster roll of the Industry of the accused was not brought for inspection by this Court. Suppression of this clearly gives rise to considerable substance in the allegations of the prosecution. By and large this negatives the arguments on behalf of the appellants that the raid is illegal or otherwise defective. Therefore we do not find any substance in this submission made by the appellants. 25. The appellants further submitted that the courts in the impugned judgment ought to have appreciated the circumstance that more than 17 years have elapsed that one of the accused appellants is a lady partner in the firm and that in fact the public prosecutor had consented and argued for reducing the sentence. 26. The appellants further submitted that the courts below have not properly considered the entire case in the proper perspective because there was no evidence about the tampering with the meter. 27. In the Panchnama it is categorically mentioned that exhibit no. 91 is the Inspection Sheet pertaining to M s. Technoframes Consumer No. I 416 and the observations made are as under Meter Terminal Box Seal and cover missing. All the coming and outgoing wires are connected together in the incoming hole resulting total buy passing of meter and no consumption is recorded in the meter. Therefore we find no substance in this submission that there was no evidence of tampering of electricity meters by the appellants. 28. On consideration of the totality of the entire case we do not find any merit in the submissions made on behalf of the appellants. In our view no interference is called for in the impugned judgment so far as conviction of the appellants under Sections 39 and 44 of the Act is concerned and consequently we uphold the impugned judgment as far as conviction of the appellants is concerned. 29. We have also heard the learned counsel for the appellants on the point of sentence. It was submitted before the Trial Court and before this Court also that it is the first offence of the appellants. They have family members and minor dependents. Appellant number 2 is a lady. More than 17 years have elapsed and now sending the appellants to jail for serving out the remaining part of their sentence would be extremely harsh. The appellants have already served out a part of their sentence and sending them back to jail to serve out the remaining sentence would cause tremendous hardship to the appellants and their family members. 30. Large scale theft of electricity is a very alarming problem faced by all the State Electricity Boards in our country which is causing loss to the State revenue running into hundreds of crores every year. In our considered view after proper adjudication of the cases of all those who are found to be guilty of the offence of committing theft of electricity apart from the sentence of conviction the Court should invariably impose heavy fine making theft of electricity a wholly non profitable venture. The most effective step to curb this tendency perhaps could be to discontinue supply of electricity to those consumers for temporarily or permanently who have been caught abstracting electricity in a clandestine manner on more than one occasion. The legislature may consider incorporating this suggestion as a form of punishment by amending Section 39 of the Indian Electricity Act of 1910. 31. On consideration of the peculiar facts and circumstances of the case where the appellants have already served out a part of the sentence and instead of compelling them to serve out the remaining sentence after lapse of 17 years in the interest of justice we deem it appropriate to increase the fine from Rs.40 000 each to Rs.3 00 000 each in case of appellants number 1 and 3 Jagmodhan Mehatabsing Gujaral and Harcharanpalsing Nanda respectively and from Rs.20 000 to Rs.2 00 000 under Section 39 of the Act in case of appellant number 2 Mrs. Rupender Kaur Harcharanpalsing . The appellants are further sentenced to pay a fine of Rs.5 000 each under Section 44 of the Act. 32. The appellants in case have already paid fine imposed by the Trial Court under Section 39 of the Act then the appellants are directed to deposit only the remaining amount of fine within a period of eight weeks from the date of this judgment. In case the amount of fine as directed by this Court under Sections 39 and 44 of the Act is not deposited within the stipulated time then the appellants shall be taken into custody to serve out the remaining part of their sentence as imposed by the Trial Court and upheld in the impugned judgment by the High Court. 33. This appeal is accordingly disposed of in terms of the aforesaid observations. 0 HEADNOTE SERVICE AND LABOUR LAWS Industrial Disputes Act 1947 Section 11A Workman Dismissal for misconduct Proportionality of punishment Employee of State Road Transport Corporation committing thefts of automobile parts from Depot Management instituting an enquiry proceedings and also initiating criminal proceedings Court absolving the employee in the criminal proceedings Enquiry proceedings establishing the theft Corporation dismissing the employee from service Before the Labour Court delinquent employee admitting the theft and pleading to be excused as being the first offence Labour Court upholding the dismissal Single Judge of High Court on a writ filed by the delinquent holding that the dismissal was disproportionate and therefore directing his reinstatement with continuity in service but without back wages Division Bench dismissing the appeal Validity Whether dismissal was disproportionate to the act of misconduct. Allowing the appeal of the Corporation held that the employee having committed a serious misconduct of theft and admitted the same before the Labour Court and thus having lost the confidence of the employer the High Court erred in considering the punishment of dismissal to be disproportionate to the act of misconduct. Order of Labour Court upholding the dismissal accordingly restored. HELD In our view the theft committed by the respondent amounts to misconduct and therefore we have no hesitation to set aside the orders passed by the learned Single Judge and also of the Division Bench and restore the order of removal of the respondent from service. When the Labour Court has proved the charges no interference by the learned Single Judge or by the Division Bench of the High Court was called for. In the instant case the jurisdiction vested with the Labour Court has been exercised judiciously and fairly. In our opinion the conclusion arrived at by the High Court in ordering reinstatement continuity of service was shockingly disproportionate to the nature of charges already proved which is in the nature of theft. Para 22 It is also not open to the Tribunal and Courts to substitute their subjective opinion in place of the one arrived at the domestic Tribunal. In the instant case the opinion arrived at by the Corporation was rightly accepted by the Tribunal but not by the Court. We therefore hold that the order of reinstatement passed by the Single Judge and the Division Bench of the High Court is contrary to the law on the basis of a catena of decisions of this Court. In such cases there is no place for generosity or sympathy on the part of the judicial forums for interfering with the quantum of punishment of removal which cannot be justified. Similarly the High Court can modify the punishment in exercise of its jurisdiction under Article 226 of the Constitution only when it finds that the punishment imposed is shockingly disproportionate to the charges proved. Para 23 Interfering therefore with the quantum of punishment of the respondent herein is not called for. In our opinion the respondent has no legal right to continue in the Corporation. As held by this Court in a catena of judgments that the loss of confidence occupies the primary factor and not the amount of money and that sympathy and generosity cannot be a factor which is permissible in law in such matters. When the employee is found guilty of theft there is nothing wrong in the Corporation losing confidence or faith in such an employee and awarding punishment of removal. In such cases there is no place of generosity or place of sympathy on the part of the judicial forums and interfering with the quantum of the punishment. Para 24 For the aforementioned reasons we hold that the orders passed by learned Single Judge and as modified and affirmed by the learned Judges of the Division Bench in Writ Appeal No. 108 of 2005 dated 29.06.2005 deserves to be set aside. Accordingly we do so. Para 25 Dr. AR. Lakshmanan J. 1. Leave granted. 2. The Department Manager A.P.S.R.T.C. is the appellant in this appeal. The respondent joined as cleaner in the A.P.S.R.T.C. in short the Corporation on 02.10.1976. While working as mechanic he was involved in a serious case of theft. On 23 24.08.1986 while working in the night shift he committed a theft of Fuel Injection Pump. This apart he was also involved in stealing an alternator bearing while working in the night shift on 11.09.1986. 3. He also unauthorisedly entered into the tyre section of the depot and stole a new tube of 900 x 20 size on 23 24.09.1986. A sponge sheet was also stolen from the garage of Gajuwaka Depot where he was working. A charge sheet was issued to the respondent framing four charges. 4. The charges are as under 1.For having stolen the Corporation property of fuel injection pump bearing No. AVD 2305 which was fitted to the engine No. 170207 during the night shift on 23 24.08.86 in the garage which constitutes misconduct under Reg. No. 28 x of APSRTC Employees conduct Reg.1963. 2. For having stolen the Corporation property of an alternator bearing No. 3440 during the night shift of 11.09.86 when it was fitted to the parked vehicle in the garage which constitutes misconduct under Reg. No. 28 x of APSRTC Employees Conduct Regulations 1963. 3. For having unauthorisedly entered into the tyres section and stolen the new tube of 900 x 20 size on 23 24.09.86 which constitutes misconduct under Reg. No. 28 x of APSRTC Employees Conduct Regulations 1963. 4. For having stolen the sponge sheets SR from the garage of Gajuwaka depot which constitutes misconduct under Reg. No. 28 x of APSRTC Employees Conduct Regulations 1963. 5. An Enquiry Officer was appointed to enquire into the charges and submit a report. In the domestic enquiry conducted on the charges levelled against the respondent full and fair opportunity was given to him to defend himself. The Enquiry Officer on completion of the domestic enquiry had submitted a report holding the respondent guilty of all the charges that were levelled against him. 6. A criminal case was also initiated against the respondent in C.C. No. 751 1987. The Criminal Court by its judgment and order dated 16.05.1987 acquitted the respondent of the charges that were levelled against him. 7. Basing on the Enquiry Officer s report the Depot Manager on independently examining the matter came to a conclusion that orders of removal would be an appropriate punishment for the proved charges of theft. Accordingly the Depot Manager issued proceedings for removing the respondent from the services of the Corporation. 8. Aggrieved by the order of his removal the respondent raised an Industrial Dispute. In I.D. No. 139 1992 the Labour Court came to the conclusion that the charges holding that the respondent was involved in a case of theft of the property belonging to the Corporation were correctly proved and the punishment of removal was justified under the factual circumstances of the case. 9. Aggrieved by the award of the Labour Court the respondent preferred a writ petition before the High Court of Andhra Pradesh at Hyderabad. 10. The learned Single Judge of the High Court came to a conclusion that the charges of theft were correctly proved against the respondent. But however came to a conclusion that punishment of removal was not in consonance with the gravity of the charges proved against the respondent. Accordingly the High Court held that the Labour Court ought to have exercised its power under Section 11A of the Industrial Disputes Act. Accordingly the Single Judge held that the respondent had put in 12 years of unblemished service and deserved a lenient view in the matter. Hence by his judgment and order dated 31.12.2004 the learned Single Judge passed a judgment by setting aside the order of removal and directed reinstatement of the respondent with continuity of service but without back wages. 11. The appellant Corporation preferred a writ appeal before the Division Bench of the High Court under Clause 15 of Letters Patent. 12. By its impugned order dated 29.06.2005 the Division Bench of the High Court dismissed the writ appeal filed by the appellant herein. Aggrieved against the order passed by the Division Bench the above civil appeal has been filed in this Court. 13. We heard Mr. Mahesh Babu learned counsel for the appellant and Mr. Vijaya Bhaskar learned counsel for the respondent. Learned counsel for the appellant submitted that the High Court has failed to appreciate that the misconduct of theft involved in by the respondent was a serious misconduct warranting no less a punishment than removal from services of the Corporation and that the High Court has also failed to appreciate that the delinquent employee gave a statement in which he admitted that he had stolen the property of the Corporation but handed over the same to his friend for sale and that the Labour Court on the basis of the said evidence rightly removed the respondent from the services of the Corporation. Arguing further learned counsel for the appellant submitted that the Division Bench of the High Court has also failed to appreciate that once the Labour Court in its award passed orders of removal by taking into consideration the entire factual circumstances of the case it does not deserve interference. The High Court in its extraordinary jurisdiction under Article 226 of the Constitution could not interfere with the said order of removal. 14. Mr. Vijaya Bhaskar learned counsel for the respondent strenuously contended that the order passed by learned Single Judge and by the Division Bench of the High Court does not call for any interference and that the Division Bench of the High Court has ordered only reinstatement of the respondent without back wages and therefore the Corporation is not prejudiced in any manner. He further submitted that the respondent had put in 12 years of service and deserves a lenient view in the matter. 15. Learned counsel for the respondent further submitted that the respondent had an unblemished career in the past and therefore a lenient view should have been taken as rightly taken by the learned Single Judge and as modified by the Division Bench of the High Court in ordering only reinstatement. 16. We have carefully considered the rival submissions and perused the orders passed by the Labour Court and of the High Court and other annexures. In our opinion the High Court has failed to appreciate that the delinquent employee categorically admitted that he had stolen the property of the Corporation. The Labour Court on a careful perusal of the evidence rightly ordered removal of the respondent from service. When the delinquent employee admitted his guilt before the Enquiry Officer that he had handed over the alternator from pan shop to the police authorities and further deposed that he had handed over the stolen property and requested the Labour Court to excuse him since it was his first offence. The Tribunal rightly set aside the request by taking into consideration the entire factual circumstances on record and after careful examination of the same and held that the delinquent employee does not deserve any sympathy and therefore he ordered removal from service. 17. Learned Single Judge of the High Court likewise also failed to appreciate the statement given by the delinquent employee admitting the guilt and however ordered reinstatement continuity of service but without back wages. 18. Likewise the learned Judges of the Division Bench also failed to appreciate that once the Labour Court in its award held removal from service by taking into consideration the entire facts and circumstances of the case it does not deserve interference and that the High Court in its extraordinary jurisdiction under Article 226 of the Constitution could not have interfered with the said orders of the removal. 19. The enquiry reports also clearly reveal that the departmental enquiry was conducted after giving fair and reasonable opportunity to the delinquent official after following the procedure and as per the regulations. 20. The learned Single Judge considered the past conduct of the delinquent employee as one of the ground in taking a lenient view. In our view past conduct of workman is not relevant in departmental proceedings. Likewise the learned Single Judge has erred in holding that the workman did not involve in any misconduct of theft during his past services and on that ground granted reinstatement with continuity of service. 21. Learned Judges of the High Court have also failed to appreciate that once an employee lost the confidence of employer it would not be safe and in the interest of the Corporation to continue the employee in the service. The punishment imposed by the management in the facts and circumstances of the case is not disproportionate and that the punishment of removal from service is the just and reasonable and proportionate to the proved misconduct. 22. In our view the theft committed by the respondent amounts to misconduct and therefore we have no hesitation to set aside the orders passed by the learned Single Judge and also of the Division Bench and restore the order of removal of the respondent from service. When the Labour Court has proved the charges no interference by the learned Single Judge or by the Division Bench of the High Court was called for. In the instant case the jurisdiction vested with the Labour Court has been exercised judiciously and fairly. In our opinion the conclusion arrived at by the High Court in ordering reinstatement continuity of service was shockingly disproportionate to the nature of charges already proved which is in the nature of theft. 23. It is also not open to the Tribunal and Courts to substitute their subjective opinion in place of the one arrived at the domestic Tribunal. In the instant case the opinion arrived at by the Corporation was rightly accepted by the Tribunal but not by the Court. We therefore hold that the order of reinstatement passed by the Single Judge and the Division Bench of the High Court is contrary to the law on the basis of a catena of decisions of this Court. In such cases there is no place for generosity or sympathy on the part of the judicial forums for interfering with the quantum of punishment of removal which cannot be justified. Similarly the High Court can modify the punishment in exercise of its jurisdiction under Article 226 of the Constitution only when it finds that the punishment imposed is shockingly disproportionate to the charges proved. 24. Interfering therefore with the quantum of punishment of the respondent herein is not called for. In our opinion the respondent has no legal right to continue in the Corporation. As held by this Court in a catena of judgments that the loss of confidence occupies the primary factor and not the amount of money and that sympathy and generosity cannot be a factor which is permissible in law in such matters. When the employee is found guilty of theft there is nothing wrong in the Corporation losing confidence or faith in such an employee and awarding punishment of removal. In such cases there is no place of generosity or place of sympathy on the part of the judicial forums and interfering with the quantum of the punishment. 25. For the aforementioned reasons we hold that the orders passed by learned Single Judge and as modified and affirmed by the learned Judges of the Division Bench in Writ Appeal No. 108 of 2005 dated 29.06.2005 deserves to be set aside. Accordingly we do so. 26. In the result the appeal filed by the appellant Corporation stands allowed and order of removal passed by the Labour Court is confirmed. However there shall be no order as to costs. 0 HEADNOTE CRIMINAL LAW Criminal Procedure Code 1973 Section 31 Conviction under Section 381 IPC and Section 52 Post Office Act 1898 Theft of a registered insured parcel containing Gold Chain Chief Judicial magistrate while awarding sentences under the two Acts not mentioning whether they were to run concurrently or consecutively Revision dismissed by High Court Plea that court should invoke the power under Section 31 CrPC and allow sentences to run concurrently as both the offences were tried in one trial and arose out of one act theft Appellant 61 years old suffering from heart ailment Lost job Incident of year 1993 Gold chain recovered and handed out to owner. Held on facts sentences to run concurrently. Sawal Das s case relied upon. HELD This is a fit case where we can direct the sentences awarded to the appellant to run concurrently for the reasons that firstly the case out of which this appeal arises relates to the year 1993 and is pending for a long period of 21 years secondly the two sentences which were imposed on the appellant arose out of one offence of theft punishable under Section 381 IPC tried in one trial thirdly the provisions of Section 52 of the IPO Act were required to be invoked against the appellant because he was the postal employee fourthly the Gold Chain was long recovered and also handed over to the person concerned fifthly the appellant has already been dismissed from services due to impugned conviction and lastly the appellant has been suffering from heart ailment since long as is proved by documents filed along with the appellant s affidavit 03.11.2014. Para 21 CASES REFERRED 1.Manoj Panu v. State of Haryana JT 2013 15 SC 384 Para 19 2.State of Punjab v. Madan Lal JT 2009 3 SC 326 Para 19 3.Chatar Singh v. State of M.P. 2006 12 SCC 37 Para 19 4.State of Maharashtra Anr. v. Najakat Alia Mubarak Ali JT 2001 Suppl.1 SC 279 Para 18 5.Mohd. Akhtar Hussain Ibrahim Ahmed Bhatti v. Assistant Collector of Customs Prevention Ahmedabad Anr. JT 1988 3 SC 586 Para 17 ABHAY MANOHAR SAPRE J. 1. Leave granted. 2. This appeal is filed by the accused against the judgment and final order dated 25.04.2014 passed by the High Court of Karnataka at Bangalore in Criminal Revision Petition No. 924 of 2009 whereby the learned single Judge of the High Court dismissed the revision petition and upheld the order dated 23.09.2008 01.10.2008 passed by the XVII Additional Chief Metropolitan Magistrate Bangalore in CC No. 2408 of 1995 convicting and sentencing the appellant accused for the offences punishable under Section 381 of the Indian Penal 3. Facts of the case lie in a narrow compass. 4. The appellant accused at the relevant time 1.3.1992 to 11.3.1993 was working as Sorting Assistant in Bangalore Packet Sorting Office Head Record Office Main Unit at Bangalore. On the intervening night between 05.03.1993 and 06.03.1993 the appellant accused while on duty committed theft of a registered insured parcel bearing receipt No. 0127 dated 03.03.1993 containing Gold Chain V shape weighing 173.650 Grams worth Rs. 70 410 which was sent by its owner from Ramavadi Post Office Bombay for being delivered to the consignee Gulab Jewellery Shop at K.H.B. Road Post Office Bangalore. The parcel thus could not be delivered to the party concerned though reached to Bangalore post office. 5. Mr. M.N. Narasimha Murthy Assistant Superintendent of Bags PW 1 in the office of Chief Post Master General of Karnataka on coming to know of the missing of parcel and commission of the theft of the parcel immediately lodged a complaint Ex P 1 in the High Grounds Police Station. The complaint was accordingly investigated which revealed complicity of the appellant in commission of its theft which led to registration of Crime Case No. 115 1993 against the appellant for the offences punishable under Sections 381 and 419 of IPC read with Section 52 of the IPO Act. The case was then handed over to the CBI. The CBI registered the case being RC No. 14 S 93 BLR which eventually led to filing of the charge sheet against the appellant in the Court of XVII Additional Chief Metropolitan Magistrate Bangalore for appellant s prosecution for commission of aforementioned offences. 6. The appellant abjured the guilt and claimed the trial. The Chief Metropolitan Magistrate by his order dated 23.09.2008 01.10.2008 passed in CC No 2408 of 1995 convicted the appellant for the offences punishable under Section 381 IPC and Section 52 of the IPO Act and sentenced him to undergo simple imprisonment for 6 months and to pay a fine of Rs. 2000 under Section 381 IPC and in default of payment of fine amount to undergo further simple imprisonment for 3 months. Similarly the appellant was also sentenced to undergo simple imprisonment for 6 months and to pay a fine of Rs. 2000 for the offence punishable under Section 52 of the IPO Act and in default of payment of fine amount to undergo further simple imprisonment of 3 months. So far as the offence punishable under Section 419 IPC was concerned the appellant was acquitted of the charge. 7. It may be pertinent to mention that the Chief Judicial Magistrate while awarding the punishment for commission of two offences as mentioned above did not mention as to whether both the punishments will run concurrently or consecutively . In other words the order of the Chief Judicial Magistrate in so far as it relates to the award of punishment was concerned it was silent on this issue. 8. Feeling aggrieved by the order of conviction and sentence the appellant filed an appeal being Criminal Appeal No. 845 of 2008 before the XXI Additional City Civil and Sessions Judge and Special Judge for CBI Cases Bangalore. The appellate Judge by his order dated 08.10.2009 confirmed the conviction and sentences awarded to the appellant and dismissed his appeal. Against the said order the appellant preferred a revision being Criminal Revision Petition No. 924 of 2009 in the High Court. The High Court by impugned order dismissed the revision and in consequence upheld the conviction and sentences awarded to the appellant. It is against this order the appellant accused has filed this appeal by way of special leave. 9. While assailing the legality and correctness of the impugned order learned Counsel for the appellant urged only one point. Learned Counsel however did not question the legality and correctness of the conviction on its merit and confined his challenge only to the sentences awarded to the appellant. According to him the Courts below erred in not directing both the sentences awarded to the appellant i.e. the one awarded under Section 381 IPC and the other awarded under Section 52 of the IPO Act to run concurrently . It was his submission that since both the offences which resulted in appellant s conviction under two different Acts IPC and IPO Act were tried in one trial and arose out of one act namely theft this was a fit case where the Courts below should have directed both the sentences to run concurrently . Learned Counsel pointed out that in every case of this nature it is the duty of the Court to specifically mention in the order of conviction as to whether the sentences awarded for the offences under the different sections would run concurrently or consecutively by taking recourse to the provisions of Section 31 of the Code of Criminal Procedure 1973 hereinafter referred to as the Code . Learned Counsel contended that in any event having regard to the nature of offence committed by the appellant his advanced age 61 years the serious heart ailment suffered by him while undergoing the sentence duly proved by documents and the fact that he has already been dismissed from service due to his conviction this Court should invoke the power under Section 31 of the Code and direct both the sentences i.e. the one awarded under IPC and other awarded under IPO Act to run concurrently instead of to run consecutively . 10. In contra learned counsel for the respondent State supported the impugned judgment and submitted that no interference is called for in the impugned judgment. 11. Having heard the learned counsel for the parties and on perusal of the record of the case we find force in the submissions made by the learned counsel for the appellant. 12. The question which arises for consideration in this appeal is whether the sentences awarded to the appellant under IPC and the IPO Act should run concurrently or consecutively 13. The expressions concurrently and consecutively mentioned in the Code are of immense significance while awarding punishment to the accused once he is found guilty of any offence punishable under IPC or and of an offence punishable under any other Special Act arising out of one trial or more. It is for the reason that award of former enure to the benefit of accused whereas award of latter is detrimental to the accused s interest. It is therefore legally obligatory upon the Court of first instance while awarding sentence to specify in clear terms in the order of conviction as to whether sentence awarded to the accused would run concurrently or they would run consecutively 14. Section 31 of the Code deals with power of the Court to award sentence in cases where the accused is convicted of several offences at one trial. It reads as under 31. Sentence in cases of conviction of several offences at one trial. 1 When a person is convicted at one trial of two or more offences the Court may subject to the provisions of section 71 of the Indian Penal Code 45 of 1860 sentence him for such offences to the several punishments prescribed therefor which such Court is competent to inflict such punishments when consisting of imprisonment to commence the one after the expiration of the other in such order as the Court may direct unless the Court directs that such punishments shall run concurrently. 2 In the case of consecutive sentences it shall not be necessary for the Court by reason only of the aggregate punishment for the several offences being in excess of the punishment which it is competent to inflict on conviction of a single offence to send the offender for trial before a higher Court Provided that a in no case shall such person be sentenced to imprisonment for a longer period than fourteen years b the aggregate punishment shall not exceed twice the amount of punishment which the Court is competent to inflict for a single offence. 3 For the purpose of appeal by a convicted person the aggregate of the consecutive sentences passed against him under this section shall be deemed to be a single sentence. 15. The issue as to in which circumstances the Court should direct the sentences to run concurrently or consecutively after the accused is convicted of more than one offence in one trial or more has been the subject matter of several cases in this Court and thus remains no more res integra. This issue was considered by this Court while considering the scope of Sections 31 427 and 428 of the Code and Section 71 of IPC. 16. We consider it apposite to refer to some of the decisions. 17. In Mohd. Akhtar Hussain Ibrahim Ahmed Bhatti v. Assistant Collector of Customs Prevention Ahmedabad Anr. JT 1988 3 SC 586 1988 4 SCC 183 the accused was sentenced to undergo 7 years imprisonment and a fine of Rs. 10 lakhs was imposed for having found to be in possession of primary gold worth Rs.1.4 crores which was in violation of the Gold Control Act. He was subsequently indicted for infringing the provisions of Customs Act by smuggling gold valued at Rs. 12.5 Crores and exporting silver worth Rs. 11.5 Crores. The accused pleading guilty in commission of the offences was awarded 4 years imprisonment and also a fine. Both the sentences were directed to run consecutively . However the State contended that the offence under the Customs Act merited the maximum sentence while the accused contended that sentences should run concurrently . The High Court however enhanced the sentence as contended by the State and rejected the plea of the accused in regard to the award of sentences. This Court in an appeal filed by the accused accepted the plea raised by him and while allowing his appeal directed both the sentences to run concurrently by referring to Section 427 of the Code. The following observations made by this Court in paras 9 and 10 are apposite 9. The section relates to administration of criminal justice and provides procedure for sentencing. The sentencing court is therefore required to consider and make an appropriate order as to how the sentence passed in the subsequent case is to run. Whether it should be concurrent or consecutive 10. The basic rule of thumb over the years has been the so called single transaction rule for concurrent sentences. If a given transaction constitutes two offences under two enactments generally it is wrong to have consecutive sentences. It is proper and legitimate to have concurrent sentences. But this rule has no application if the transaction relating to offences is not the same or the facts constituting the two offences are quite different. 18. Likewise a question arose before the three judge Bench in State of Maharashtra Anr. v. Najakat Alia Mubarak Ali JT 2001 Suppl 1 SC 279 2001 6 SCC 311 as to whether the accused convicted in two cases one after another was entitled to claim set off the period of detention during investigation inquiry or trial from the sentence imposed on conviction in both the cases. While interpreting Section 428 of the Code the majority of the judges answered the question in affirmative. While answering the question Justice Thomas speaking for majority of the Judges made the following observations which are pertinent. 17. In the above context it is apposite to point out that very often it happens when an accused is convicted in one case under different counts of offences and sentenced to different terms of imprisonment under each such count all such sentences are directed to run concurrently. The idea behind it is that the imprisonment to be suffered by him for one count of offence will in fact and in effect be imprisonment for other counts as well. 19. The aforesaid principle of law was relied upon by this Court in Chatar Singh v. State of M.P. 2006 12 SCC 37 and State of Punjab v. Madan Lal JT 2009 3 SC 326 2009 5 SCC 238 and lastly recently in Manoj Panu v. State of Haryana JT 2013 15 SC 384 2014 2 SCC 153 wherein this Court taking recourse to Section 31 of the Code directed in somewhat similar facts that the sentences awarded to the accused to run concurrently in place of consecutively . 20. Keeping the aforesaid principle of law in mind and applying the same to the facts of this case in the light of powers available under Section 31 of the Code we are of the considered opinion that both the sentences awarded to the appellant in the case at hand should run concurrently and this we do by invoking Section 31 which enables the Court to so direct. 21. In our considered opinion this is a fit case where we can direct the sentences awarded to the appellant to run concurrently for the reasons that firstly the case out of which this appeal arises relates to the year 1993 and is pending for a long period of 21 years secondly the two sentences which were imposed on the appellant arose out of one offence of theft punishable under Section 381 IPC tried in one trial thirdly the provisions of Section 52 of the IPO Act were required to be invoked against the appellant because he was the postal employee fourthly the Gold Chain was long recovered and also handed over to the person concerned fifthly the appellant has already been dismissed from services due to impugned conviction and lastly the appellant has been suffering from heart ailment since long as is proved by documents filed along with the appellant s affidavit 03.11.2014. 22. It is for all these reasons in our considered opinion the interest of justice would be sub served by directing both the sentences awarded to the appellant to run concurrently . Since we have upheld the conviction which was not challenged by the appellant in this appeal the directions to run both the sentences concurrently can always be passed by the appellate Court because such directions are in the nature of consequential on and incidental to the affirmance of the conviction as held by this Court in the case reported in Sawal Das v. State of Bihar 1975 3 SCC 156 . 23. In the light of foregoing discussion the appeal succeeds and is allowed in part. The conviction and sentences awarded to the appellant by the courts below for the offences punishable under Section 381 of IPC and Section 52 of the IPO Act are upheld. However it is directed that both the sentences awarded to the appellant under IPC and IPO Act would run concurrently . 24. As a consequence if the appellant has already undergone the period of sentence imposed on him he shall be released forthwith if not required in connection with any other case. 0 CROSS CITATION 1965 SCR 1 293 CRIMINAL APPELLATE JURISDICTION Criminal Appeal No. 29 of 1963. Appealby special leave from the judgment andorder dated December 13 1962 of the Patna High Court in Government Appeal No. 24 of 1960. Nuruddin Ahmed B. P. Singh and U. P. Singh for the appellants. B. P. Jha for respondent No. 1. The Judgment of the Court was delivered by Raghubar Dayal J. This appeal by special leave raises the question whether a person who seizes cattle illegally purporting to act under S. 10 of the Cattle TrespassAct 1871 hereinafter the Act commits the offence of theft or robbery or not. The question arises in this way. On the morning of November 28 1957 a number of cattle belonging to several persons including Shamnarain Singh were observed by a number of persons including Ramnandan Singh and Ram Rattan alias Ratan Ahir grazing in a kurthi fieldabout which there was a dispute between the authorities of the Basic School and Shamnarain Singh each of them claiming the field. Ramnandan Singh and others seized those cattle and proceeded to take them to the pound at village Tilauthu. These persons were armed with sharp edged weapons and lathis. The report of the seizure of the cattle reached Shamnarain Singh and other people in the village.A number of people variously armed started from the village to rescue the cattle. They were joined by others on the way. This party including Sukhari Mahto Deocharan Sheodutt Hari Mahto and Ramdeo caught up with the other party a short distance from the cattle pound and asked that party to release the cattle. Altercation took place between the parties and thenthey fought together. According to the prosecution case members of the appellants 295 party attacked Shamnarain Singh and his companions. According to the appellants it was the other party which attacked them. As a result of the fight five persons got injured on the side of Shamnarain Singh. Of them Ramdeo got one gaping punctured wound in the right thigh with a spear. He died as a result of the injury received. Sukhari Mahto received 16 injuries including 4 incised wounds. The other three injured persons received ordinary injuries. Deocharan had an abrasion Sheodutt Singh got a lacerated wound a swelling and an abrasion and Hari Mahto hada lacerated wound. On the side of the appellants fourpersons got injured. Ramnandan Singh received 12 injuries including 4 incised wounds and 3 punctured wounds.Ratan Ahir got three injuries including 2 punctured wounds. Sheorattan got 5 injuries including 2 punctured wounds.Rajkumar Singh got 2 injuries including one punctured wound. Reports were made at the police station on behalf of the two parties. Hari Mahto lodged a report on behalf of the complainantparty against 20 persons. Ratan Ahir lodged a reportagainst 26 persons. The police as a result of investigation sent up 28 persons for trial. The Additional Sessions Judge Arrah acquitted all of them. He found that 1 Shamnarain Singh was in lawful possession of the kurthi field in question on the date of occurrence and that the supposed claim thereto raised on behalf of the defence was not in good faith 2 the cattle were seized in the presence of the charwahas in spite of their protest 3 even though the seizure of the cattle from the kurthi field by the accused party in these circumstances was an unlawful act the conduct of the complainant party who were fully armed in following them in order to release the cattle was not justified as it showed a determination on their part to get their cattle released by use of force and that therefore there did not exist any right on the part of the owners of the cattle to the extent of securing the release of their cattlefrom the hands of those who had seized them earlier by use of force 4 there was strong Probability in favour of the view that it was the prosecution party which created the crisis and took the aggression to initiate the assault and that the prosecution narration as to the manner in which the assault commenced at the scene of occurrence where the assault took place did not commend itself to him andthat part of the prosecution story appeared tosufferfrom material Suppression and that in these circumstances the accused party had the reasonable apprehension of suffering grievous hurt or death at the hands of the prosecution party and they were justified in the exercise of their right of private defence of their bodies in 296 causing such injuries to the men on the prosecution side as might cause death the death so caused being justifiable homicide. The State of Bihar appealed against the acquittal of the 28 accused. The High Court allowed the appeal against 13 respondents and convicted Ratan Ahir under S. 302 I.P.C. and the others under s. 326 read with s. 149 I.P.C. and ofsome other offences. It may be mentioned thatone of the respondents had died and 14 others were acquitted. The High Court agreed with the Sessions Judge that the plot insuit was in the possession of Shamnarain Singh and that the seizure of the cattle by the accused party was illegal. The learned Judges however were of opinion that the Sessions Judge had taken a wrong view of the law in thinking that the members of the prosecution party were not entitled to rescue the cattle by gleans of force only because the respondents had succeeded in taking away the cattle for some distance. They held that once the seizure of cattle was found to be illegal members of the accused party were in the position of thieves rather dacoits when they had seized the cattle by show of force to the cowherd boys and that therefore the members of the prosecution party had the right of private defence of property and could recover their cattle by use of force subject to the limitation that force in excess of what was necessary be not used. It also found that the prosecution party in their attempt to rescuethe cattle. had been violently attacked by the party of the accused. The learned Judges probably did not agree with the view of the Sessions Judge that the attackwas opened by the prosecution party as there was no material in support of the view on the record but held that even the opening of the attack by the prosecution party would not give any justification to thedefence party for it was bound to defend itself in the act of rescuing the cattle. To consider the question of law raised in this appeal we accept the findings of the High Court to the effect that the plot in suit was in the possession of Shamnarain Singh that the appellants and others seized the cattle grazing inthat plot alleging that they were damaging their crops andthat they would take them to the pound that Shamnarain Singh and othersarmed went to rescue the cattle and on meeting the accused partyasked them to release the cattle andthat after some altercation the accused party opened the attack. It is not disputed and it has been alleged from thevery beginning in the reports lodged by both the parties that the appellants and others had seized the cattle allegingthat they 297 were damaging their crops. It follows that they purported to seize the cattle in pursuance of the provisions of s. 10 of the Act. In view of the finding that the plot was in possession of Shamnarain Singh and that he had raised the crop such seizure was illegal. It is thus that the question arises whether by so seizing the cattle the appellants committed the offence of theft. It is necessary to determine this point as it is only when the appellants and others had committed the offence of theft in so seizing the cattle that any right of private defenceof property arises in favour of Shamnarain Singh and his party whowent to rescue the cattle. If the act ofthe appellants and othersdid not amount to theft they committed no offence and therefore no right of private defence of property arose in favour of Shamnarain Singh and others as such a right arises against the commission of an offence as defined in s. 40I.P.C. i.e. an act which amounts to a thingmade punishable by the Code. It may be mentioned that no other offence is alleged to have been committed by the appellants and others which would have given the right of private defence of property to Shamnarain Singh and others. To determine the question raised it is desirable to refer to the provisions of the Act in order to findwhat actions of the appellants would be in accordance with its provisions what would be against them and to whatthey would be liable if they acted against such provisions. Section 10 authorizes certain persons having interest in the crops grown on any land to seize or cause to be seized cattle trespassing on it and doing damage thereto or to any crop or produce thereon. It requires them to send the cattle so seized within 24 hours to the pound established for the village in which the land is situate. It further provides that all officers of police shall when required aid in preventing resistance to such seizuresand rescues from persons making such seizures. Section 11authorises certain persons to seize cattle which damage public roads canals embankments and other thingsmentioned in that section. Section 12 provides for the levy of fine for every head of cattle impounded. Chapter V deals with complaints of illegal seizure or detention and has four sections ss. 20 to 23. Section 20 reads Power to make complaints. Any person whose cattle have been seized under this Act or having been so 298 seized have been detained in contravention of this Act may at any time within tendays from the date of the seizure make a complaint to the Magistrate of the District or any Magistrate authorized to receive and try charges without reference by the Magistrate of the district. Section 21 deals with the procedure onsuch complaint and S. 22 reads Compensation for illegal seizure or detention. If the seizure or detention be adjudgedillegal the Magistrate shall award to the complainant for the loss caused by the seizure or detention reasonable compensation not exceeding one hundred rupees to be paid by the person who made the seizure or detained the cattle together with all fines paid and expenses incurred by the complai nant in procuring the release of the cattle. Release of cattle. And if thecattlehave not been released the Magistrate shall besides awarding such compensation order their release and direct that the fines and expenses leviable under this Act shall be paid by the person who made the seizure or detained the cattle. Section 23 provides that the compensation and expensesmentionedin s.22 maybe recovered as if they were fines imposed by the Magistrate. Section 24 provides penaltyfor forcibly opposing the seizure of cattle liable to be seized under the Act or for rescuing such cattle after seizure either from a pound or from any person taking or about to take them to a pound. The punishment on conviction is not to exceedsix months imprisonment or a fine of five hundred rupees. TheAct does not make the illegal seizure of cattle punishable asan offence. The person seizing cattle illegally is made liable to pay compensation for theloss caused to the owner of the cattle on account of the illegal seizure of cattle or of detaining the cattle in contravention of the Act. He is also liableto pay the fine and expenses paid in procuring release of the cattle. The expression under this Act in S. 20 does not mean in accordance with the provisions of the Act but means purporting to be in accordance with the provisions of the Act as seizure under the Act i.e. seizure in accordance with the provisions of the 299 Act could never be illegal and S. 20 deals with complaints of illegal seizure or detention. The expression used in S. 24 isdifferent and makes the forcible opposition of the seizure of cattle punishable when the cattleseizedwere liableto be seized under the Act. If the cattle were not liableto be seized forcible opposition to their seizure would not be punishable under s. 24. Section 25 of the Act provides a mode for the recovery of penalty for mischief committed bycausing cattle to trespass. Itthus takes notice of the offence under the Penal Code committed by the person who causes cattle to trespass on other s land and provides that any fine imposed for the commission of that offence can be recovered bysale of all or any of the cattle by which trespass was committed whether those cattle were seized in the act of trespassing or not and whether they were the property of the person convicted of the offence or were only in his charge when the trespass was committed. Section 26 inter alia provides for penalty for damage causedby pigs through neglect or otherwise to crops etc. or public roads or damage by cattle generally if the State Government so notifies. Section 29 expressly provides that nothingin the Act prohibits any person whose crops or other produce ofland have been damaged by trespass of cattle from suing for compensation in any competent Court and S. 30 provides that any compensation paid to such person under the Act by order of the convicting Magistrate shall be set off and deducted from any sum claimed by or awarded to him as compensation in such suit. There is no provision in the Act for the award of compensation to the person whose crops or other produce of land had been damaged by trespass of cattle. Section 30 therefore appears to refer to the award of compensation to such person under S. 545 Cr. P.C. by the Magistrate convicting the person whose cattle had caused damage of the offence of mischief under the Penal Code or of the offences under ss. 24 and 26 of the Act. TheAct has not any provision comparable to the provisions ofss. 29 and 30 stating that a person whose cattlehad been illegally seized or detained may sue for compensation in a competent Court and thatcompensation awarded by the Magistrate under s. 22 of the Act be deducted from any sum awarded to him in such proceedings. The Act does not make the illegal seizure or detention of cattle an offence. It appearsthat the legislatureintended that the provisions of Chapter V of the Actwoulddeal comprehensively with the 300 case of illegal seizures or detentions of cattle andthat the remedy available to a person whose cattle had been so seized or detained would be the one provided by S. 22 of the Act and no other and that illegal seizure or detention of cattlewould amount to no offence under thePenal Code. There appears to be good reason for this as the object of the Act was the protection of crops and other produce of land from the damage by cattle trespassing on the land and of the cultivators and occupiers of land from consequent loss and injury. The Cattle Trespass Act of 1871 was enacted to consolidate and amend the law relating to trespass by cattle. The first CattleTrespass Act was Act ITT of 1857 and its preamble reads Whereasloss and injury aresuffered by cultivators and occupiers of land from damage done to crops and other produce of land by the trespass of cattle and whereas damage is done to the sides and slopes of public roads and embankments by cattle trespassing thereon and whereas it is expedient to authorize the seizure and detention of cattle doing damage as aforesaid and also to make provision for the disposal of cattle found straying in any public place It is enacted as follows Section II of the 1857 Act empowered the cultivator or occupier of any land to seize or cause to be seized any cattle trespassing on his land and doing damage to anycrop or produce thereon. Section 10 of the Act gave such right to other persons is well. It did not however give the right to seize cattle damaging the crops to everyone who might noticethe cattle damaging the crops.Though the power to seize cattle trespassing on a person s land was givenonly when the cattle were damaging the land or the crop the eon it should have been considered a difficult matter for the person authorized to seize cattle to determine first whether the cattle had caused damage to his land or crop and thereafter to seize them. The person so authorized would instinctively first seize the cattle on his land presuming that they must have damaged the crop or the land andthat any further presence of the cattle in the field without their being seized would lead to further damage. Further s. 10of the Act directs all officers of police when required to do so to aid in preventing resistance tosuch seizures and rescues from persons making such seizures. The personseizing the cattle is thus given police protection. Me police officers required to aidwould not in the circumstances be 301 determining before rendering aid whether the seizure of cattle Was legal Or not. They haveto prevent resistance to seizures and rescue of cattle from persons making seizures if they are called upon by the persons seizing the cattle to prevent resistance to the seizure or the rescue. This emphasizes the view that seizures of cattle whether legal or illegal are protected from interference. The remedy of the person whose cattle are illegally seized is contained in the provisions of Chapter V. In view of these realisticconsiderations the person happening to seize the cattle which had not actually caused damagewas considered to be acting underthe Act as expressed in S. 20 so that no action not authorized by the Act be taken against him for conduct which be not strictly legal. At the same time the interest of the person whose cattleare seized even when they had not caused damage to the crop had to be protected.It was also bound to happen at times that persons not authorized to seize cattle in the exercise of their larger duty to the people whose crops were being damaged may be inclined to take action against the cattlethey might notice damaging the crops. Such persons would be actuated by good intentions. but actuallythey would not be acting in accordance with the provisions of the Act and might be liable for damages in civil courts or possibly alsocriminally if the seizure of cattle could amountto an offence under the Penal. Code or any other law. It was on a balancing of the interest of the persons purporting toseize the cattle to protect crops and the interest of the owners of the cattle that these provisions of Chapter V seem to have been made. In view of these considerations we are of opinion that the provisions of Chapter V comprehensively deal with the cases of such seizure of cattle which had been seized in the exercise of the power conferred by the Act or in furtherance of its objects though not in full accordance with the provisions ofthe Act. In view of these considerations based on the provisions of the Act it does not appearthat illegal seizure of cattle by persons. purporting to act in accordance with the provisions of the Act could be an offence of theft under the Penal Code. We arrive at the same conclusion by a scrutiny of the provisions of the Penal Code. We may now consider what acts constitute the offence of theft under the Penal Code. Theft is defined in s. 378 thus Whoever intending to take dishonestly any movable property out of the possession of any person 302 without that person s consent movesthat property in.. order to such taking is said to commit theft. This Court had occasion to consider at lengthwhat commission of theft consists of in K. N. Mehra v. The State of Rajasthan 1 . It said at p. 630 Commission of theft therefore consists in 1 moving a movable property of a person out of his possession without his consent 2 the moving being in order to the taking of the propertywith a dishonest intention. Thus I the absence of the person s consent at the time ofmoving and 2 thepresence of dishonest intention in so taking and at the time are the essential ingredients of the offence of theft. At p. 631 it said It is rightly pointed out that since the definition of theft requires that the moving of the property is to be in order tosuch taking such meaning intending totake dishonestly the very moving out must bewith the dishonest intention. After stating the provisions of ss. 23 and 24 of the Indian Penal Code this Court said Taking these two definitionstogether a person can be said to have dishonest intention if in taking the property it is his intention to cause gain by unlawful means of the property to which the person so gaining is not legally entitled or to cause loss by wrongful means of property to which the person so losing is legally entitled. It is further clear from the definition that the gain or loss contemplated need not be a total acquisition or a total deprivation but it is enough if it is a temporary retention of property by the person wrongfully gaining or a temporary keeping out of property from the person legally entitled. This is clearly brought out in illustration 1 to s. 378 of the Indian Penal Code.... The Court did not express an opinion with respect to the submission that the Penal Code makes a distinction between intention to cause a particular result and knowledge or likelihood of causing a particular result and that the maxim that every person must be taken tointendthe natural consequence of his act is a 1 1957 S.C.R. 623. 303 legal fiction which is not recognized for penal consequences in the Indian Penal Code. Till the property is moved no offence of theft can becommittedeven if the alleged offender had intended totake dishonestly the property out of the possession of any other personwithout his consent. Mere seizure of cattle found trespassing on land does not amount to movingthe cattle. The act Of moving the cattle would be subsequent to seizing them.It follows therefore that theseizure of cattle though illegal cannot amount to the offence of theft. It is after the seizure of cattle that the person seizing them moves them in order to take them to the pound.This act of taking them to the pound is what he is directed to do by the Act Section 10 specifically directs so. Of course the direction is in regard to the cattle seized for damaging the land or crop but the same direction will be deemed to be operative when the cattle are seized in the purported exercise of the right to seize them under s. 10 of theAct specially when s. 20 speaks of such seizure as being under the Act. An act done in accordance with the provisions of the Act cannot be considered prima facie to be a dishonest act and would not justify the conclusion that the taking of the cattle to the pound amounted to the offence of theft. A person is said to do a thing dishonestly when hedoes anything with the intention of causing wrongful gain to one personor wrongful loss to another person. In the case of illegal seizures andimpounding ofcattle the person seizing the cattle does not gain anything. He simply takes the cattle to the pound. He does not use them for his purpose. He in fact exercises no greater dominionover those cattle than that of being in their custody on their journey to the pound.It is said that it causes wrongful loss to the owner of the cattle inasmuch as he keeps the owner out of possession of the cattle as he was wrongfully deprived of the property for the time being it being not necessary that the deprivation of property be of a permanent character. We do not think that in such circumstances the owner of thecattle can be said to be deprived of his property. The person seizing the cattle can act in either of these three ways. He can keep them himself. Thismay in certain circumstances make him guilty of theft. He can let them loose after taking them out of the field.This action will not remove the danger of the cattle trespassing again on the land. He can take them to the pound.. 304 In so doing he not only acts as directed by the Act but also in the interests of both himself and the owner of the cattle. He avoids the risk of further harm to himself and protects the interest of the owner by having the cattle in safe custody and keeping them from doing any further damage to anyone s land or crop. The owner can get back the cattle from the pound on payment of the fine andexpenses in accordance with the provisions of S. 15 of theAct. Whatever he would have to pay forgetting the cattle released he can reimburse himself by suitable action under S. 20of the Act as the Magistrate dealing with his complaint is empowered under S. 22 to order the payment of finesand expenses paid by him in addition to the compensation for any loss that he suffers. The owner of the cattle illegally seized is thus not only reimbursed for the fine and expenses which he paid but also for any lossthat he has suffered on account of illegal seizure. This means that in the ultimate analysis the owner ofthe cattle seized illegally suffers no loss and that therefore the act of illegal seizure of cattle does not cause any wrongful loss to the owner of the cattle. It follows that the person seizing cattle purporting to act under the provisions of the Act does not cause any wrongful loss to the owner of the cattle. Even if it be assumed that some sort of loss which is wrongful in nature is caused to the owner of the cattle by illegal seizure and impounding them the question arises whether the person seizing the cattle illegally from a field with the avowed object of taking them to the pound on the groundthat it was damaging the field or the crop can be imputed the intention to take the cattle dishonestly. The effect of his seizing the cattle illegally may be assumed to cause wrongful loss to the owner of the cattle but did he so intend We are of opinion that he did not so intend. His intention at the time though based on his wrong notions that he was entitled to seize the cattle was to takethem to the poundas required by the Act so that no further damagebe done to the land or property. It is truethat intention is mostly gathered from the consequences of the act committed by the accused but that is so because it is not often that the intention with which an act is committed can be definitely known from any previous fact. When a person does a certain act by openly expressing his intention in committingthe act there seemsno reason why his intention should be gathered by the consequences of his act exceptin those cases where it is found that the avowed intention was a mere cloak for some other real 305 intention which is then to be determined in the same way as it is determined in cases of non expressed intention. In view of the various considerations mentioned above we are of opinion that when a person seizes cattle on the groundthat they were trespassing on his landand causing damageto his crop or produce and gives out that he was takingthem to the pound he commits no offence of theft however mistaken he may be about his right to that land or crop. The remedy of the owner of the cattle so seized is to take action under S. 20 of the Act. He has no right to use force to rescue the cattle so seized. We may now briefly consider the cases referred to in support of the contention that illegal seizure of cattle amounts to theft. These cases were not of the seizure and impounding of cattle in the purported exercise of the powers under s. 10 ofthe Act. They are Queen v. PreonathBanerjee 1 Wazuddi v. Rahimuddi 2 Abdul Khaliq v. Emperor 3 ParyagRai v. Arju Mian 4 Queen Empress v. Sri Churn Chungo 5 . In these cases seizure of cattle was notmade even ostensibly on account of their causing damage to any land or crop. They were seized and taken away by persons in order to get their claims against the owners satisfied or in order to cause them loss otherwise. Suchseizures of cattle was rightly held to amount to theft. On the other hand there are cases which held that no offence is committed by a person seizing cattle illegally. In Empress v. Ramjiawan 6 it was held that illegal seizure of cattleunder the Act was not an offence of mischief under the Penal Code and that the remedy of the owner of the cattlewas to be found in the provisions of ss. 20 21 and 22. In Dayal v. Emperor 7 persons who had seized cattle from a pound and impounded them in retaliation of the action of the owners of the cattle in justifiably impounding their cattle a day earlier were held not to have committed the offence of mischief under s. 425 T.P.C. inasmuch asdriving the cattleto the pounddid not in any way lead to the diminution in the utility or value of the cattle and not to have committed the offence of theft as no wrongful loss was causedto the owners of cattle even though they wouldhave had to incur expenses in order to get them released. 1 5 W.R. 68 criminal . 3 A.I.R. 1941 Lah. 221. 5 I.L.R. 22 Cal. 1017. 2 1917 18 Crl. L.J. 849. 4 I.L.R. 22 Cal. 139. 6 1881 1 All. W.N. 158. 7 A.I.R. 1943 Oudh. 280. 306 We therefore hold that in the circumstances of this case Rattan and others appellants who had seized the cattle from the .disputed field committed no offence of thefteven if they had no right to that fieldand that therefore Shamnarain Singh and others who went armed with sharp edged weapons and lathis to rescue the cattle had no right of defence of their property against Rattan and others. The learned Sessions Judge was inclined to the viewthat Shamnarain Singh s party was the aggressor. The view cannot be said to be unreasonable even though the prosecution witnesses did not actually state so. The circumstances of the case however indicate that normally Shamnarain Singh s party would have been the aggressors.It is they whowere aggrieved atthe conduct of Rattan andothers and deliberately followed those persons in order to rescue their cattleand therefore would have in that state of temper. started the attack. The fact that four persons in Rattan s party receivedmore injuries thanfive persons in Shamnarain s party and the numberof serious injuries was also larger on theirside support this view. These four persons received 8 punctured wounds and 4 incised wounds out of the total of 26 injuries on them all. The five persons on Shamnarain s side received 22 injuries which included only one punctured wound the only one on Ramdeo deceased and 4 incised wounds on Sukhari Mahto. Even if Shamnarain Singh s party were not the aggressors and the attack was started by the party of Rattan as appears to be the view of the High Court that would not give any right of private defence of person to Shamnarain s party as Rattan and others could have apprehended in the circumstances that Shamnarain s party was not peacefully inclined and would use force against them in order to rescue the cattle and that the force likely to be used could cause grievous hurt. We are of opinion that Rattan and others appellants committed no offencein causing injuries to persons in Shamnarain s party and in causing the death of Ramdeo who was in that party. We accordingly allow theappeal set aside the conviction of Rattan Ahir under s. 302 I.P.C. and of others under s. 326 I.P.C. and also their conviction of the other offences they were convicted of. They will be released forthwith from custody. Appeal allowed. 307 0 HEADNOTE CRIMINAL LAWS Penal Code 1860 Sections 302 380 read with Section 34 Murder of land lady Recovery of her husband s PW1 s wrist watch pursuant to appellant s disclosure statement Appellant was the only inmate with deceased present when the incident took place Both accused convicted under Section 302 380 34 by trial court Whether appellant s conviction was justified in view of first accused s acquittal by High Court when said first accused had allegedly strangulated deceased No appeal by State against his acquittal. Held merely because both accused were seen with deceased by PWs 3 4 in the morning of the date of incident and were not seen for two days thereafter does not show that appellant authored the crime. As per prosecution first accused had strangulated deceased. First accused had left for village after receiving information about his mother s illness and appellant too had gone to his home from where he was arrested later. Thus they were not absconders as alleged. Sunil Kundu s case referred. HELD None of the circumstances by itself would lead to the irresistible conclusion that the appellant herein is the author of the crimes under Sections 302 and 380 IPC. It is in evidence of PWs 3 and 4 the key witnesses that apart from the appellant one Ranjit Roy was also seen in the house of the deceased and according to prosecution also as noted in their report it was Ranjit Roy accused no.1 who quietly put a strip of cloth round the neck of the deceased and strangulated her . It is in evidence that both the accused belonged to New Jalpaiguri. It is the case of the prosecution itself that the first accused had received a message on the evening of 5.7.2001 that his mother was seriously ill and she was at home. PW 13 Kakulay does not support the case of the prosecution that she had seen the accused in the afternoon of 4th July 2001 as proceeding to Siliguri. She is specific and categoric of that date because it was the first death anniversary of her father in law. The accused were in fact not absconding. They had gone to their native place New Jalpaiguri and they were arrested from their respective homes only. Para 9 On the only ground that the accused was seen with the deceased in the morning of the date of incident and that they were not seen in that place for another two days cannot by themselves lead to the conclusion that it is the appellant who authored the crime. Para 13 To abscond means go away secretly or illegally and hurriedly to escape from custody or avoid arrest. Accused had told others that they were from their place of work at Gangtok to their home at New Jalpaiguri. They were admittedly taken into custody from their respective houses only at New Jalpaiguri on the third day of the incident. Therefore it is difficult to hold that the accused had been absconding. Para 14 Evidence Act 1872 Sections 8 27 Murder Motive Recovery of deceased s husband s PW1 s wrist watch pursuant to appellant s disclosure statement Whether could be a basis of conviction Whether theft was the motive behind murder Delay of 10 days in effecting recovery Neither disclosure nor seizure supported by witnesses As per recovery memo wrist watch handed over to police by appellant s mother whereas as per disclosure statement appellant had concealed the same in his house How mother was in possession of the watch and why it was recovered through her when appellant was available not explained His mother also not examined Neither PW1 nor deceased s sons PWs 2 3 ever stated about theft of watch and cash Jewelry worn by deceased was also not stolen. Held recovery on the basis of which conviction was recorded by High Court was doubtful and hence conviction cannot be sustained. Motive also could not be proved. Madhu v. State of Kerala referred. HELD The conviction of the appellant is by placing reliance solely on the recovery of the wrist watch. It is faulty in procedure and apart from that the same does not infuse any confidence in the mind of the Court in the given circumstances when pitted against the rest of the evidence that the appellant committed the murder with the motive of theft. There is no explanation for the delay of about ten days in effecting recovery. The owner of the wrist watch PW1 does not have a case that his wrist watch had been stolen by the appellant. That version is not also supported by the children of the deceased. They have no case of theft of wrist watch or cash. Para 20 Exhibit P5 recovery memo says that the wrist watch had been handed over to the investigating officer by the mother of the appellant. However Exhibit P6 disclosure statement recorded on 12.07.2001 which has already been extracted above though not admissible as such states that the appellant had kept the wrist watch in his house at New Jalpaiguri and that he could handover the same to the police. The investigating officer examined as PW16 states that the wrist watch was recovered from the house of the appellant. It is not explained as to how the mother of the appellant came into custody of the wrist watch which had been allegedly kept in concealment by the appellant in his house. She was not examined. Yet another significant aspect is that the disclosure statement Exhibit P6 is made only on 12.07.2001 after five days of the incident and yet the recovery is effected only on 17.07.2001. The witnesses to the disclosure statement as well as seizure memo PWs 11 and 12 have very clearly stated in their evidence that their signatures were obtained on some papers which had already been filled up by the police and that no statement had been given by the appellant in their presence. Para 11 If the motive for the accused in committing the murder of Manorama Devi was theft it is again difficult to understand why the accused did not remove any ornaments worn by the deceased. Para 15 . Section 302 380 read with section 34 Conviction under Acquittal of one of the accused who allegedly strangulated deceased Whether is a ground to acquit the other as ground of common intention disappears. Held if there is independent evidence against other accused he cannot be acquitted. Krishna Govind Patil s case referred. Para 17 CASES REFERRED 1.Raja v. State JT 2013 11 SC 439 Para 19 2.Sunil Kundu v. State of Jharkhand JT 2013 6 SC 599 Para 14 3.Madhu v. State of Kerala JT 2012 1 SC 181 Para 15 4.Amrita alias Amritlal v. State of M.P. JT 2004 2 SC 295 Para 18 5.Krishna Govind Patil v. State of Maharashtra AIR 1963 SC 1413 Para 17 KURIAN J. 1. Appellant is the second accused in Criminal Case No. 31 of 2001 on the file of the Sessions Judge Sikkim at Gangtok. He was charged along with one Ranjit Roy under Sections 302 380 read with Section 34 of the Indian Penal Code 45 of 1860 hereinafter referred to as IPC . According to the prosecution These two accused persons were already in need of money for their expenses as Durga Roy Burman had already borrowed much cash from his master Sujit Basak before completing his works and he had nothing to get from his master for few days. The money problem became more serious when on 5.7.2001 the accused person received telephonic call from the father of Ranjit Roy stating that his mother is seriously ill at home and he should return home immediately. That night both the accused persons slept late discussing about their monetary problems. Next day i.e. 6.7.2001 in the morning Ranjit Roy went to the rented room. Shibu Barman had already left for his job. After some time Durga Roy Barman also arrived in the room. Both of them were under the strong impression that Lalan Prasad had enough money in his house as he was engaged in lottery business and both his sons were also working. Therefore the two accused persons made a plan to steal money from Lalan Prasad s house as he was already left for job. The accused persons had hot discussion with Raju Kumar elder son of deceased in connection with use of bathing soap for toilet purposes. By 0900 hrs both the sons also left for their daily works. Then only the deceased Manorama Devi remained in the house besides the two accused persons. The two accused persons decided to kill the deceased Manorama Devi in order to steal money from her house as she was the only person present in the house. Deceased Manorama Devi was inside the room of her sons when accused Durga Roy Barman pretended to talk to her thereby diverting her mind. At that moment the other accused Ranjit Roy came from his room bringing a strip sic of cloth and quietly went behind the deceased Manorama Devi and on getting the opportunity the accd. Ranjit Roy quietly put the strip round the neck of the deceased and strangulated her. As the victim became unconscious he encircled the ligature twice on her neck and tightly made a knot on the back of the neck sic as a result she died on the spot due to strangulation by ligature. Then leaving the dead body on the floor the accused persons searched the house and took away one wrist watch SITCO and cash Rs.2300 and fled away from P.O. At about 1200 hrs the accused persons were seen by one Mrs. Kakulay Biswas w o. Parusotham Biswas at Tenzing and Tenzing Gangtok going towards Deorali side. Accused Durga Roy who was known to her told her that they were going home. Then they never came back to Gangtok. Emphasis supplied 2. It is thus further case of the prosecution that the appellant herein made Exhibit P6 disclosure statement while in custody on 12.07.2001 My true statement is that on 6 7 01 Friday that the Watch which I had stolen after murdering the Lottery Seller s wife I have kept the same in NJP. I can hand over the said Watch to Police. I have kept the said Watch in homes at NJP. Sd illegible Accused Durga Roy Witness 1 BRIJ KISHORE PRASAD S o. Ram Janam Prasad Basantpur Near Police Station Dist. Sewan Bihar A P. R.N. Chamling Building Sd Brij Kishore Prasad M.G. Marg gangtok Ext.P 6 a Occupation Lottery Agent. 2 TASHI TSHERING BHUTIA S o. Tensang Bhutia Sd Dalep Busty Kewzing SJ E N South Sikkim Gangtok A P Rajya Sainik Board Palger Stadium Road Sd Gangtok Tashi Occupation Lottery Seller Ext.P6 b Sd SJ E N Recorded by Sd Ex.P6 c P.M. Rai Sd Police Inspector SJ E N Sadar P.S. Gangtok 3. On the basis of above disclosure made on 12.7.2001 recovery of the watch was made on 17.07.2001 as per Annexure P5 memo. The two witnesses in Exhibit P6 are witnesses to the seizure also. The Sessions Court as per judgment dated 31.12.2002 convicted both the accused under Section 302 380 34 IPC. 4. In appeal the High Court of Sikkim by judgment dated 15.12.2003 acquitted the first accused Ranjit Roy for the following reasons 12. At this stage it is relevant to state that the appellants were charged under section 302 34 IPC and have been found guilty thereunder. To invoke the aid of section 34 IPC it is necessary that the criminal act complained against was done in furtherance of the common intention of all the accused persons. The common intention implies prior meeting of mind. It can also be formed suddenly at the spot. The prosecution has not laid any evidence on this score. So far as appellant no.1 Ranjit Roy is concerned there is no evidence against him except that in the morning on the date of occurrence he was present in the house of the deceased and remain absconded till he was arrested on 8th July 2001 at New Jalpaiguri. An act of absconding is no doubt a relevant piece of evidence but the said act does not by itself lead to a conclusion that he is guilty. There is no other incriminating material against him to connect with the offence. The suspicion however strong be cannot take the place of proof. For reasons aforesaid we are inclined to hold that the prosecution has not been able to prove its case against appellant no.1 Ranjit Roy beyond reasonable doubt. He is therefore entitled to be acquitted on the benefit of doubt. Emphasis supplied 5. However in the case of second accused appellant herein it was held by the court as follows 13. In the present case the charge against both the appellants is specific in the sense that in furtherance of their common intention they committed the murder of the deceased. With the acquittal of appellant no.1 Ranjit Roy the charge of sharing common intention fails. It does not however mean that appellant no. 2 Durga Roy can also secure acquittal. There is no legal bar to convict him under the substantive provision if on the basis of evidence it could be held that he was the author of the crime. Let us therefore examine his case separately. As already stated he was found in the house of deceased in the morning on the date of occurrence. In the said house no other inmate was present except the deceased. He was a co tenant along with Shibu PW4 in respect of one room belonging to the deceased. Shibu PW4 deposed that he had gone to the house of the deceased at 2.30 p.m. to 2.45 p.m. to find out if he was present in his room but he did not find him and his room was locked. He had not returned to his room since then and remained absconded till he was arrested on 8th July 2001. He gave recovery to the Sitco wrist which was found missing on the date of occurrence. Having regard to the above circumstances we have no hesitation to hold that he appellant no.2 Durga Roy after committing murder of the deceased also committed the theft of the wrist watch exhibit IX. He is therefore clearly guilty of offences punishable under sections 302 and 380 IPC. The conviction recorded by the Sessions Judge under sections 302 380 34 IPC is hereby converted to one under sections 302 and 380 IPC. Emphasis supplied 6. Heard learned counsel appearing for the appellant and learned counsel appearing for the State of Sikkim. 7. The basis of maintaining the conviction against the appellant herein who is the second accused is i. He was in the house of the deceased in the morning on the date of occurrence. ii. No other inmate was present except thedeceased. iii. The co tenant had deposed that when he went to the house of the deceased between 2.30 2.45 p.m. on the same day he could not find the appellant and room was locked. iv. He had not returned to his room and remained absconded till he was arrested on 8th July 2001. v. He gave recovery of the wrist watch belonging to husband of the deceased which was allegedly found missing on the date of occurrence. 8. On these grounds it was concluded that the appellant accused after committing the murder of the deceased also committed theft of the wrist watch and hence he was guilty of offence punishable under Sections 302 and 380 IPC. 9. We are afraid none of the circumstances by itself would lead to the irresistible conclusion that the appellant herein is the author of the crimes under Sections 302 and 380 IPC. It is in evidence of PWs 3 and 4 the key witnesses that apart from the appellant one Ranjit Roy was also seen in the house of the deceased and according to prosecution also as noted in their report it was Ranjit Roy accused no.1 who quietly put a strip of cloth round the neck of the deceased and strangulated her . It is in evidence that both the accused belonged to New Jalpaiguri. It is the case of the prosecution itself that the first accused had received a message on the evening of 5.7.2001 that his mother was seriously ill and she was at home. PW 13 Kakulay does not support the case of the prosecution that she had seen the accused in the afternoon of 4th July 2001 as proceeding to Siliguri. She is specific and categoric of that date because it was the first death anniversary of her father in law. The accused were in fact not absconding. They had gone to their native place New Jalpaiguri and they were arrested from their respective homes only. 10. The only other ground is that of recovery under Section 27 of the Indian Evidence Act 1872 hereinafter referred to as Evidence Act recovery of the wrist watch which was alleged to have been stolen by the appellant. From the evidence available on record we find it extremely difficult to place reliance on that recovery for many reasons. The wrist watch belongs to PW1 the husband of the deceased. PWs 2 and 3 are the sons of the deceased and were staying with PW1 and the deceased. PWs 1 2 and 3 do not have a case that the wrist watch belonging to PW1 had been stolen by the appellant. They do not also have a case about the money that has been allegedly taken by the accused after committing murder. There is not even a whisper in the evidence of PWs 1 2 and 3 regarding the theft of either the wrist watch or the cash except for the identification of the wrist watch by PW1 as belonging to him. There is not even a reference to the alleged missing of the wrist watch since 06.07.2001 or the loss of cash. It is only in the evidence of PW16 the investigating officer that the accused had a motive of committing theft after murdering Smt. Manorama Devi and that an amount of Rs.2 300 and wrist watch belonging to PW1 had been taken by the accused. 11. Exhibit P5 recovery memo says that the wrist watch had been handed over to the investigating officer by the mother of the appellant. However Exhibit P6 disclosure statement recorded on 12.07.2001 which has already been extracted above though not admissible as such states that the appellant had kept the wrist watch in his house at New Jalpaiguri and that he could handover the same to the police. The investigating officer examined as PW16 states that the wrist watch was recovered from the house of the appellant. It is not explained as to how the mother of the appellant came into custody of the wrist watch which had been allegedly kept in concealment by the appellant in his house. She was not examined. Yet another significant aspect is that the disclosure statement Exhibit P6 is made only on 12.07.2001 after five days of the incident and yet the recovery is effected only on 17.07.2001. The witnesses to the disclosure statement as well as seizure memo PWs 11 and 12 have very clearly stated in their evidence that their signatures were obtained on some papers which had already been filled up by the police and that no statement had been given by the appellant in their presence. 12. Another significant aspect in the case is that all ornaments worn by the deceased were on the body and nothing had been removed. If the accused had a motive to commit theft it is only normal that they would lay their hands on the jewelry as well. 13. On the basis of the evidence we have discussed above we find it extremely difficult to hold that the prosecution has laid a foundation for an effective prosecution and has proved beyond doubt that it is the appellant who committed the murder of Manorama Devi. It has to be noted that this case is set up only on circumstantial evidence. All the circumstances should lead to without breaking the chain the involvement of the accused and the accused only. On the only ground that the accused was seen with the deceased in the morning of the date of incident and that they were not seen in that place for another two days cannot by themselves lead to the conclusion that it is the appellant who authored the crime. 14. To abscond means go away secretly or illegally and hurriedly to escape from custody or avoid arrest. It has come in evidence that the accused had told others that they were from their place of work at Gangtok to their home at New Jalpaiguri. They were admittedly taken into custody from their respective houses only at New Jalpaiguri on the third day of the incident. Therefore it is difficult to hold that the accused had been absconding. Even assuming for argument sake that they were not seen at their work place after the alleged incident it cannot be held that by itself an adverse inference is to be drawn against them as held by this Court in Sunil Kundu v. State of Jharkhand JT 2013 6 SC 599 . To quote paragraph 28 28. It was argued that the accused were absconding and therefore adverse inference needs to be drawn against them. It is well settled that absconding by itself does not prove the guilt of a person. A person may run away due to fear of false implication or arrest. See SK. Yusuf v. State of W.B. JT 2011 6 SC 640 It is also true that the plea of alibi taken by the accused has failed. The defence witnesses examined by them have been disbelieved. It was urged that adverse inference should be drawn from this. We reject this submission. When the prosecution is not able to prove its case beyond reasonable doubt it pic cannot take advantage of the fact that the accused have not been able to probabilise their defence. It is well settled that the prosecution must stand or fall on its own feet. It cannot draw support from the weakness of the case of the accused if it has not proved its case beyond reasonable doubt. 15. If the motive for the accused in committing the murder of Manorama Devi was theft it is again difficult to understand why the accused did not remove any ornaments worn by the deceased. Hence the prosecution version regarding the motive also is shaken. Please see the decision of this Court in Madhu v. State of Kerala JT 2012 1 SC 181 . 16. The evidence available on record would on the contrary give an indication that theft is a story of the investigation officer only. Neither PW1 whose wrist watch is said to be stolen nor the sons of the deceased PWs 2 and 3 have any case of the alleged theft of wrist watch or cash. The recovery is also doubtful. There is no consistent version of the recovery. The person from whom the recovery has been effected viz. the mother of the appellant has not been examined. Despite the availability of the appellant the recovery is through his mother. There is no explanation as to how she got to watch. This could also be the reason why the trial court in the judgment dated 31.12.2012 held that Technically speaking there is no compliance of Section 27 Evidence Act. Though the wrist watch Ext. IX was recovered from the house of accused Durga Roy but the record reveals that the said wrist watch was handed over to the Police by the mother of the accused Durga Roy . It has to be noted that recovery of the wrist watch from the house of the appellant is the only ground on which the High Court has maintained the conviction of the appellant. 17. It has been argued by the learned counsel for the appellant that the accused no.1 Ranjit Roy on whom the overt act of strangulation is alleged having been acquitted by the High Court the conviction of the appellant cannot be maintained. It is further contended that by the acquittal of the main accused the whole theory of common intention has been shattered and that the appellant is entitled to succeed on that ground. We are afraid the contention cannot be appreciated. No doubt there are only two accused and they have been charged under Sections 302 380 34 IPC and one of them has been acquitted. That by itself is not a ground to acquit the co accused in case there is independent evidence. Of course in the absence of such independent evidence the accused could succeed on that ground as held by this Court in Krishna Govind Patil v. State of Maharashtra AIR 1963 SC 1413 which is a case of Section 302 read with Section 34 IPC. To quote 8. ... While it acquitted Accused 1 3 and 4 under Section 302 read with Section 34 of the Indian Penal Code it convicted Accused 2 under Section 302 read with Section 34 of the said Code for having committed the offence jointly with the acquitted persons. That is a legally impossible position. When accused were acquitted either on the ground that the evidence was not acceptable or by giving benefit of doubt to them the result in law would be the same it would mean that they did not take part in the offence. The effect of the acquittal of Accused 1 3 and 4 is that they did not conjointly act with Accused 2 in committing the murder. If they did not act conjointly with Accused 2 Accused 2 could not have acted conjointly with them. ... 18. In the case before us the allegation is that after committing the murder the accused committed theft also. As held by this Court in Amrita alias Amritlal v. State of M.P. JT 2004 2 SC 295 at paragraph 8 that 8. ... Mere acquittal of some of the accused on the same evidence by itself does not lead to a conclusion that all deserve to be acquitted in case appropriate reasons have been given on appreciation of evidence both in regard to acquittal and conviction of the accused. ... 19. The same view was followed by this Court in Raja v. State JT 2013 11 SC 439 . To quote paragraph 12 12. ... It is also relevant to point out that the High Court took note of the general principle that if the prosecution case is the same against all the accused or with regard to some of the accused on the same set of evidence available on record with reference to any of the accused then the Court would not be committing any mistake in acquitting all the accused and conversely if it is possible to do so namely to remove the chaff from the grain the Court would not be committing any mistake in sustaining the prosecution case against whom the evidence is shown to be intact. 20. Thus there should be independent evidence. The conviction of the appellant is by placing reliance solely on the recovery of the wrist watch. We have already held above that it is faulty in procedure and apart from that the same does not infuse any confidence in the mind of the Court in the given circumstances when pitted against the rest of the evidence that the appellant committed the murder with the motive of theft. It is not enough that the circumstances lead to possibility or probability of the involvement of the accused the circumstances should point all the fingers to the accused and the accused only. That is not the situation in this case. The circumstances can lead to many other inferences. The chain is also not complete. The first accused who according to the prosecution is the perpetrator of the offence under Section 302 IPC has been acquitted. The State has not filed an appeal against the acquittal. It is a case of Sections 302 380 read with Section 34 IPC. The whole theory of the prosecution is that it is the first accused who has been acquitted by the High Court who tied the piece of cloth on the neck of the deceased and strangulated her. The only piece of shaky evidence against the appellant is of recovery of the wrist watch of PW1 from and through the mother of the appellant. She was not examined. There is no explanation as to how despite the availability of the appellant the recovery is effected through his mother. There is no explanation for the delay of about ten days in effecting recovery. The witnesses have not supported the disclosure statement or the seizure. The owner of the wrist watch PW1 does not have a case that his wrist watch had been stolen by the appellant. That version is not also supported by the children of the deceased. They have no case of theft of wrist watch or cash. 21. In such circumstances we have no hesitation in holding that the prosecution has miserably failed in proving the case against the appellant and the appellant is entitled to succeed. The appeal is allowed. The conviction of the appellant under Section 302 380 IPC is set aside. He shall be released forthwith in case he is not required to be detained in connection with any other case. 0 CROSS CITATION 1967 SC 349 11 1963 SCR Supl. 1 689 CRIMINAL APPELLATE JURISDICTION Criminal Appeal No. 2 of 1962. Appealby special leave from the judgment andorder dated April 25 1953 of the Rajasthan High Court Jaipur Bench Jaipur in Criminal Revision No. 237 of 1956. S. P. Varma for the appellant. S. K. Kapur and P. D. Menon for the respondent. 1962. October 22. The judgment of the Court was delivered by SUBBA RAO J. This appeal by specialleave is directed against the decisionof the High Court of Rajasthan in Criminal Revision No. 237 of 1956 confirming that of the Sessions judge Alwar convicting the appellant under s. 379 of the Indian Penal Code and sentencing him to a fine of Rs. 200 . To appreciatethe questions raised in this appeal the following facts either admitted or found by the High Court may be stated. On November 24 1945 one Ram Kumar Ram obtained permission Ex. PB from the Government oftile former Alwar State to supply electricity at Rajgarh Khertal and Kherli. Thereafter he entered into partnership with 4 otherswith an understanding that the licence would be transferred to a company that would be floated by thesaid partnership. After the company was formed it put in an application to the Government through 691 its managing agents for the issue of a licence in its favour. Ex. P. W. 15 B is that application. On the advice given by the Government Advocate theGovernment required Ram Kumar Ram to file a declaration attested by a Magistrate with regard to the transfer of his rights and the licence to the company.On April 8 1948 RamKumar Ram filed a declaration to that effect. The case of the prosecution is that Ram Kumar Ram was a friend of the appellant. Pyarelal Bhargava who was a Superintendent in the Chief Engineer s Office Alwar. At the instance of Ram Kumar Ram Pyarelal Bhargava got the file Ex. PA 1 from the Secretariat through Bishan Swarup a clerk before December 16 1948 took the file to his house sometime between December 15 and 16 1948 made it available to Ram Kumar Ram for removing the affidavitfiled by him on April 9 1948 and the application Ex. P. W. 15 B from the file andsubstituting in their place another letter Ex. PC and another application Ex. PB. After replacing the said documents Ram Kumar Ram made an application to the Chief Engineer on December 24 1948 that the licence should not be issued in the name of the company. After the discovery of the tampering of the said documents Pyarelal and Ram Kumar were prosecuted before the Sub Divisional Magistrate Alwar the former for an offence under s. 379 and s. 465 read with s. 109 of the. Indian Penal Code and the latter for an offence underss. 465 and 379 read with s.109 of the Indian Penal Code. The Sub Divisional Magistrate convicted both the accused under the said sections and sentencedthem on both the counts. On appeal the Sessions judge set aside the Conviction under s. 465 but maintained the conviction and sentence of Pyarelal Bhargava under s. 379 and Ram Kumar Ram under s. 379 read with s. 109 of the Indian Penal Code. Ram Kumar Ram was sentenced to pay a fine of Rs. 500 and Pyarelal Bhargava to pay a fine of Rs. 200 . Against these convictions both the accused 692 filed revisions to the High Court and the High Court set aside the convictionand sentence of Ram Kumar Ram but confirmed those of Pyarelal Bhargava. Pyarelal Bhargava has preferred the present appeal. Learned counsel for the appellant raised before us three points namely 1 the High Court has wrongly reliedupon the confession made by the accusedbeforeShri P. N. Singhal Officiating ChiefSecretary tothe Matsya Government atthat time as that confession was notmade voluntarily and therefore irrelevant under s. 24 of the Evidence Act 2 the said confession having been retracted by the appellant the High Court should not have relied upon it as it was not corroborated in material particulars and 3 on the facts found the offence of theft has not been made out within the meaning of s. 379 of the Indian Penal Code. Another argument namely that the statement made by Pyarelal Bhargava before the Chief Secretary was not a confession inlaw was suggested but not pursuedand therefore nothing need be said about it. The first question turns upon the interpretation of the provisions of s. 24 of the Evidence Act and its application to the facts found in this case. Section 24 of the Evidence Act lays down that a confession caused by inducement threat or promise is irrelevant incriminal proceedings under certain circumstances. Under that section a confession would be irrelevant if thefollowing conditionswere satisfied 1 it should appear to the court to havebeen causedby any inducement threat or promise 2 thesaid threat inducement or promise must have reference to the charge against the accused person 3 it shall proceed from a personal authority and 4 the court shall be of the opinion that the said inducement threat or promise is sufficient to give the accused per son grounds which would appear to him reasonable in supposing that he would gain an advantage or avoid any 693 evil of a temporal nature in reference to the proceedings against him. The crucial word in the first ingredient is the expression appears . The appropriate meaning of the word appears is seems . It imports a lesser degree of probability than proof. Section 3 of the Evidence Act says A factis said to be proved when after considering the matters before it the Court either believes it to exist or considers its existence so probable that aprudent man ought under the circumstances of the particular case to act upon the supposition that it exists. Therefore the test of proof is that there is such ahigh degreeof probability that a prudent man would act on the assumption that the thing is true. But under s. 24 of the Evidence Act such a stringent rule is waived but a lesser degreeof assurance is laid down as the criterion. The standard of a prudent man is not completely displaced but the stringent rule of proof is relaxed. Even so the laxity of proof permitted does not warrant a court s opinion based on pure surmise. A prima facie opinion basedon evidence and circumstances may be adopted as the standard laid down. To put it in otherwords on the evidence and the circumstances in a particular case it may appear to the court that there was a threat inducement or promise though the said fact is not strictly proved.This deviationfrom the strict standards of proof has been designedly accepted by the Legislature with a. view to exclude forced or induced confessions which sometimes are extorted and put inwhen there is a lack of direct evidence. It is not possible or advisable to lay down an inflexible standard for guidance of courts for in the ultimate analysis it is the court which is called upon to exclude a confession by holding in the circumstances of a particular case that the confession was not made voluntarily. The threat inducement or promise must proceed from a person in authority and it is a question 694 of fact in each case whether the person concerned is a man of authority or not.What is more important is that the mere existence of the threat inducement or promise is not enough but in the opinion of the court the said threat inducement orpromise shallbe sufficientto cause a reasonable belief in the mind of accused that by confessing he would get an advantage or avoid any evil of a temporal naturein reference to the proceedings against him while the opinion is that of the court the criterion is the reasonable belief of the accused. The section therefore makes it clear that it is the duty of the court to place itself in the position of the accused and to form an opinion as to the state of his mind in the circumstances of a case. In the present case it was found that certain documents in the Chief Enginecr s Office were tampered with and certain papers weresubstituted.The appellant was the Superintendent in the Chief Engineer s Office.On April 11 1949 Shri P. N. Singhal Officiating Chief Secretary to the MatsyaGovernment was making a departmental inquiry in respect of the missing documents. The appellant among others was questioned about the said documents. The appellant first madea statement Ex. PL in which he stated that he neither asked Bishan Swarup to bring file No. 127 nor did he recollect any cause for calling forthat file on or about that date. As Shri Singhal was not able to find out the culprit he expresser his opinion that if the whole truth did not come out he would hand over the inquiry to the police.Thereafter the appellant made a statement Ex. P.L. 1 wherein in clear terms he admitted that about the middle of December 1948 Ram Kumar Ram took file No. 127P. W. 48 regardingissue of licence tothe Bharat Electrical and Industrial Corporation Ltd. Alwar from his residence to show it to his lawyers and that he took the file more than once for that purpose.He also addedthat this was 695 a voluntary statement. Learned counsel for the appellant argued that the Chief Secretary gave the threat that if the appellant didnot disclose the truth he would place the matterin the hands of the police and that the threat induced the appellant to make the disclosure in thehope that he would be excused by the authority concerned. There is no doubt that the Chief Secretary is an authority within the meaning of s. 24 of the Evidence Act but the simple question is whether the alleged statement by thesaid authority reappears to the court to be athreatwith reference to the charge against the accused.As wehave said under particular circumstances whethera statement appears to the court to be a threat or not is a question of fact. In this case the three lower courts concurrently held that in the circumstances of the case the statement did not appearto be a threat within the meaning of s. 24 of The Evidence Act. but that was only a general statement which any person who lost his property and was not able tofind out the culprit would make. It may be that such a statement under different circumstances may amount to a threat or it may also be that another court may take a differentview even in the present circumstances of the case but in exercising the powers under Art. 136 of the Constitution we are not prepared to differ from the concurrent finding given by the three courts that in the circumstances of the present case that the said statement did not appear to them to be a threat. The second argument also has no merits.A retracted confession may form the legal basis of a conviction if the court is satisfied that it was true and was voluntarily made But it has been held that a court shallnot base a conviction on such a confession without corroboration. It is not a rule of law but is only rule of prudence. It cannoteven be laid down as an inflexible rule of practice or prudence that under no circumstances such a conviction can be 696 made without corroboration for a court may in a particular case be convinced of the absolute truth of a confession and prepared to act upon it without corroboration but it may be laid down as a general rule of practice that it is unsafe to rely upon a confession much less on a retracted confession unless the court is satisfied that the retracted confession is true and voluntarily made and has been corroborated in material particulars. The High Court having regard to the said principles looked for corroboration and found it in the evidence of Bishan Swaroop P.W 7 and the entry in the Dak Book Ex. PA. 4 and accepted the confession in view of the said pieces of corroboration.The finding is one offact and there is no permissible ground for disturbing it in this appeal. The last point is that on the facts found no case of theft has been made out. The facts found were that the appellant got the filebetween December 15 and 16 1948 to his house made it available to Ram Kumar Ram andon December 16 1948 returned it to the office. On these facts it is contended that the prosecution has not made out that the appellant dishonestly took any movable property within the meaning of s. 378 of the Indian Penal Code. Thesaid section reads Whoever intending to take dishonestly any movable property out of the possession of any person without that person s consent moves that property in order to such taking is said to commit theft. The section may be dissected into its component parts thus a person will be guilty of the offence of theft 1 if he.intends to cause a wrongful gain or a wrongful loss by unlawful means of Property to which the person gaming is not legally entitled or to which the person losing is legally entitled as the case may be 697 see ss.23 and 24 of the Indian Penal Code 2 thesaid intention to act dishonestly is inrespect of movable property 3 the said property shall be taken out of the possession of another person without his consent and 4 he shall move that property in order to such taking. In the present case the record was in the possession of the Engineering Department underthe control of the Chief Engineer. The appellant was the Superintendent inthat office he took the file out of the session of thesaid engineer. removed the file from office and handed it over to Ram Kumar Ram. But it is contended that the said facts do not constitute the offence of theft for three reasons namely i the Superintendent was in possession of the file and therefore he could not have taken the file from himself ii there was no intention to take it dishonestly as he had taken it only for the purpose of showing the documents to Ram Kumar Ram and returned it the next day to the office and therefore he had not taken the said fileout of the possession ofany person and iii he did not intend to take it dishonestly as he did not receive any wrongful gain or cause any wrongful loss to any other per son. We cannot agree that the appellant was in session of the file. The file was in the Secretariat of the Department concerned which was in charge of the Chief Engineer. The appellant was only one of the officers working in that department and it cannot therefore be said that he was in legal possession of the file. Nor can we accept the argument that on the assumption that the Chief Engineer was in possession of the said file the accused had not taken itout of his possession. To commit theft one need not take movable property permanently out of the possession of anotherwith the intention not to return it to him.It would satisfy the definition ifhe took any movable propertyout of the possession of another person though he intended to return it later on. We cannot also agree with learned counselthat there is no wrongful loss in the present case. 698 Wrongful loss is loss by unlawful means of property to which the person losing it is legally entitled. It cannot be disputed thatthe appellant unauthorisedly took thefile from the office and handed it over to Ram Kumar Ram. He had therefore unlawfully taken the file from the department and for a short time he deprived the Engineering Department ofthe possession of the said file. Theloss need not be caused by a permanent deprivationof property but may be caused even by temporary dispossession though the per son taking it intended to restore it sooner or later. A temporary period of deprivation or dispossession of the property of another causes loss to the other. That a person will act dishonestly if he temporarilydispossesses another of his property is made clear by illustrations b and 1 of s.378 of the Indian penal code. They are b A puts a bait for dogs inhis pocket and thus induces z s dog to follow it. Here if A s intention be dishonestly to take the dog out of Z s possession without Z s consent A has committed theft as soon as Z s dog has begun to follow A. 1 . A takes an article belonging to Z out of Z s possession without Z s consent with the intention of keeping it until he obtains money from Z as a reward for its restoration.Here A takes dishonestly A has therefore committed theft. It will be seen from the said illustrations that a temporary removal of a dog which might ultimately be returned to the owner or the temporary taking of an article with a view to returnit after receiving some reward constitutes theft indicating thereby that temporary deprivation of another personof his property causes wrongful loss to him. We therefore hold that the facts found in this case clearly bring them within the four comers of s. 378 of the Indian 699 Penal Code and therefore the courts have rightly held that the appellant had committed the offence of theft. No other Point was pressed before us. In the result the appeal fails and is dismissed. Appeal dismissed. 0 HEADNOTE ELECTRICITY LAWS Indian Electricity Act 1910 Section 26 6 Scope Dispute regarding fraud in tampering with meter or breaking body seal. Held to be outside the ambit of the provision. Para 10 Bihar State Electricity Tariff Clause 16.9 Applicability Assessment made on the basis of theft for 180 days Justification. Held that the Board has rightly applied Clause 16.9 and there is no infirmity in the bill raised. HELD In the cases of theft of electricity or dishonest abstraction of electrical energy the assessment for compensation has to be done on the basis of a formula wherein D stands for number of days for which the pilferage took place and where there is no possible evidence to establish the period this factor can be taken to be equivalent to 180 days. Similarly in case where connected load is more than the sanctioned load the assessment charge has to be done on the basis of a formula where C stands for six months or the number of months or part thereof elapsed from the date of connection installation whichever is less. Therefore under the tariff in both the cases the period can be taken as 180 days or six months. It is on the basis of this formula that the assessment for consumption of units has been done for 180 days. The electricity board rightly applied Clause 16.9 of the Tariff and there is no infirmity in the assessment made and the bill prepared in pursuance thereof. Para 12 Clause 16.9 with Electricity Act Section 39 44 Assessment as per tariff Case of dishonest abstraction or theft Trial of accused in criminal court. Held that it has no bearing on assessment made according to tariff. Para 13 Clause 16.9 and 16.10.3 Fuel surcharge Method of calculation Dishonest abstraction Assessment thereof Fuel surcharge at thrice the rate per unit Legality. Held that Clause 16.10.3 is separate from Clause 16.9 and it does not lay the fuel surcharge at thrice the rate of per unit. Para 17 CASES REFERRED 1.Apparel Export Promotion Council v. A.K. Chopra JT 1999 1 SC 61 Para 15 2.Hyderabad Vanaspathi Ltd. v. A.P. State Electricity Board Ors. JT 1998 3 SC 84 Para 12 3.State of U.P. Ors. v. Maharaja Dharmander Prasad Singh JT 1989 1 SC 118 Para 14 4.Madhya Pradesh Electricity Board Ors. v. Basantibai JT 1987 4 SC 294 Para 10 FOREIGN CASES REFERRED 1.North Wales Police v. Evans 1982 1 W.L.R. 1155 Para 14 G.P. MATHUR J. 1. These appeals are directed against the judgment and order dated 18.4.2000 of a Division Bench of Patna High Court by which the writ petition preferred by M s J.M.D. Alloys Ltd. was partly allowed and the Bihar State Electricity Board was directed to serve a fresh bill as per the observations made in the judgment and to restore the electricity connection within two days of the payment of the said bill. 2. M s J.M.D. Alloys Ltd. hereinafter referred to as the petitioner has a high tension industrial connection of electricity for running induction furnaces for manufacturing steel ingots. The officials of the Bihar State Electricity Board hereinafter referred to as the electricity board inspected the petitioner s factory premises on 26th and 27th August 1999 and found that the seal fixed on CT PT box was tampered. An FIR was lodged at the concerned police station on 27.8.1999 alleging that the petitioner had committed theft of 6.96 lakh units and had thereby caused a loss of Rs. 2.58 crores to the electricity Board. The electricity board thereafter issued a bill dated 31.8.1999 for Rs. 8 85 77 131 . This bill was challenged by the petitioner by filing CWJC no. 8939 of 1999 before the High Court. The learned single judge who heard the writ petition vide his judgment order dated 27.9.1999 directed that a show cause notice in the light of the observations made in the judgment be given to the petitioner within a week and it will be open to the petitioner to raise all its defences against the charge of committing theft of electrical energy and or drawing electrical energy at a load higher than its contracted demand. It was further directed that the show notice shall be given by the general manager cum chief engineer Central Bihar Area Electricity Board Patna or by any other officer of the electricity board of equal or higher rank and he shall pass final order after giving an opportunity of hearing to the petitioner. The liability of the petitioner was to be determined afresh on the basis of the final order passed by the chief engineer. 3. The chief engineer Transmission Bihar State Electricity Board thereafter issued a notice dated 13.10.1999 to which a reply was given by the petitioner on 20.10.1999. After affording an opportunity of personal hearing and considering the reply the chief engineer passed an order on 27.10.1999 holding that clause 16.9 b and c of Tariff is attracted and the consumer M s J.M.D. Alloys Ltd. is liable to pay compensatory bill in terms of the aforesaid clauses of the Tariff. In accordance with the decision of the Chief Engineer a fresh bill dated 29.10.1999 for Rs. 8 85 77 131 was issued. This bill was again challenged by the petitioner by fling a writ petition which was dismissed by a learned single judge on 13.12.1999. Against the said decision the petitioner preferred a letters patent appeal which was partly allowed by the Division Bench by the impugned judgment and order dated 18.4.2000. The Division Bench held that the petitioner is liable to pay electricity charges in accordance with Clause 16.9 of the Tariff. However with regard to fuel surcharge it was held that the same cannot be levied at thrice the rate in accordance with Clause 16.9 of the Tariff which permits consumption of electricity to be assessed at thrice the rate per unit. Feeling aggrieved by the aforesaid decision M s J.M.D. Alloys Ltd. have preferred civil appeal no. 8394 of 2002 and the Bihar State Electricity Board has preferred civil appeal no. 8395 of 2002. 4. As stated earlier the chief engineer transmission Bihar State Electricity Board issued a notice dated 13.10.1999 to the petitioner. The notice was issued on the grounds inter alia that the inspection of the business premises of the petitioner was conducted from 14.15 hours to 20.30 hours on 26.8.1999 and thereafter on the following day that on examination of CT PT unit and its terminal box the seal bearing no. 04566OP which was put on CT PT terminal box on 14.5.1999 was found to be tampered with and the signature of the authority was also not found on the same that a seizure memo of the tampered seal was prepared on the same day that on account of the fact that the seal on the terminal box had been removed it had become easily accessible to the consumer and by fiddling with the terminals namely by removing the wires or putting wires of higher resistance the flow of energy to the metering unit was manipulated to show a very low recording of both KVA and unit consumption that the total capacity of induction furnaces on operation was 12 M.T. for which energy requirement was 7200 KVA but the petitioner had entered into a contract demand of 4850 KVA and therefore the consumer was engaged in theft of electricity and was consuming energy at a much higher load than the contracted demand that the supplier of the furnaces to the petitioner namely Megatherm Electronic Pvt. Ltd. had reported to the director general of police vigilance Bihar State Electricity Board consumption equivalent to approximately 3000 KVA for running the furnaces exclusive of auxiliary load like water supply cooling systems cranes etc that the feasibility report given to the electricity board by the petitioner showed that the minimum required energy for each MT furnace was 500 KVA for the furnace alone besides 100 KVA for auxiliary load and thus 600 KVA was required for each MT furnace that the electronic meter showed that the power had been consumed by the factory on an average basis of 21.25 hours per day which runs into two shifts of 12 hours each having 40 workers in each shift and the load and the capacity of two furnaces showed production of 3000 MT ingots every month and therefore the minimum consumption of power was 16.20 lakh units per month whereas bills had been paid on an average of 9.24 lakh units per month that the theft of power was further substantiated from the meter reading of J.D. Feeder at 3311 KV Air Force Sub station Bihta and also the claim filed by the petitioner under Clause 13 of the agreement and on the basis of the aforesaid facts and material it was obvious that the petitioner had been committing theft of electricity on a massive scale by tampering with the seal of the CT PT terminal cover. The petitioner was accordingly directed to show cause as to why a bill in terms of Clause 16.9 of the tariff notification be not raised. The petitioner give a reply to the show cause notice raising various pleas and denying that it had committed any theft of electricity. It was pleaded that the meter had been regularly inspected by different teams of the electricity board but no tampering of the seal of the CT PT terminal cover had been found that the furnaces can operate only to the extent of 80 of its rated capacity that the electricity board itself had assessed the capacity of the connected load at 5100 KVA which was very near to the contracted demand that the meter installed in the factory premises never recorded a maximum demand of more than the contracted demand that the assumption that 100 KVA per ton is required for auxiliary load was not based on facts and that in the case of a high tension industrial consumer the connected load is of no relevance because to constantly monitor the load availed of by a high tension consumer a trivector meter containing the maximum demand indicator is compulsorily installed. It was further submitted that the seal in CT PT unit had not been tampered with an the allegation regarding tampering of the seal was being investigated by the investigating officer of the criminal case registered against the petitioner and his report shall be considered by the court of law at the appropriate time. 5. The chief engineer after consideration of the material and the submissions made held that the theft of electricity cannot be found physically and this has to be worked out from evidences parameters and various circumstances under which the consumer is availing power. He passed a detailed order on 27.10.1999 and the relevant part of the findings recorded by him are being reproduced below It appears from annexure 1 of show cause notice that two nos. of induction furnaces of six M.T. capacity each totalling 12 MT were in operation. This is supported by the facts with the inspection report that the total capacity of transformer was 7230 KVA. The CTPT cover terminal seal which was found tampered was unsigned. There were large number officials of the board including executive magistrates and therefore there is no reason to disbelieve that seal of terminal cover of CTPT was tampered. The capacity of the furnaces being 12 MT it is evidently clear that the power was used unauthorised by the consumer because the consumption recorded in the meter was much less than what it ought to have been on actual load i.e. 7200 KVA 600 x 12 T . In this connection the annexure 3 4 the vouchers of the purchase of induction furnace from Megatherm show the capacity of induction furnace 6 MT as 2500 KW i.e. equivalent to 3000 KVA therefore the load of 12 M.T. Furnace besides KVA MT as auxiliary load totalling to 7200 KVA as the actual load. It is not out of place to mention here that the induction furnace association of Bihar has proposed and agreed that the load of induction furnace could be 600 KVA per M.T. This is also brought to my notice that on average basis the power was consumed at the average period of 21.25 hrs. per day. The factory runs into two shifts with 40 workers in each shift. So far as the nos of days of pilferage is concerned it has been rightly interpreted and assessed the maximum period of six months for the assessment of compensatory amount under clause 16.9 of Tariff. The variant factors of the consumption as per formula i.e. LEFXIIED have been thoroughly taken care of in the formula provided in the Tariff. From the facts and circumstances as set forth above it is absolutely clear that clause 16.9 b and c of Tariff is attracted and the consumer M s JMD Alloys is liable to pay the compensatory bill in terms of Clause 16.9 of Tariff. 6. In accordance with the order of the chief engineer a fresh electricity bill was prepared on 29.10.1999 for Rs. 4 09 32 925 towards the cost of units of electricity and Rs. 3 90 73 217 towards fuel surcharge. After adding the electricity duty and charges for rental of transformer and fuse replacement etc. a bill was issued for Rs. 8 85 77 131 . 7. Shri Gopal Subramanium learned senior counsel for the petitioner has submitted that the factory premises of the petitioner had been inspected on 14.5.1999 and then again on 20.7.1999 and no irregularity of any kind had been found on the said dates and therefore the allegation that the petitioner had tampered with the seal of CT PT unit is wholly incorrect. There was no material or evidence to show that any effort had been made by the petitioner to interfere with the metering unit which may have the effect of showing lesser consumption of energy. learned counsel has also submitted that in absence of any evidence relating to presence of artificial means which would have rendered abstraction of electrical energy possible the provisions of Clause 16.9 of the tariff could not be made applicable and the electricity bill issued to the petitioner is incorrect It has also been urged that the last inspection of the petitioner s premises having been done on 20.7.1999 there is no justification for counting the period of dishonest abstraction of energy as 180 days six months and therefore the bill issued to the petitioner is for much longer period which was not permissible in law. The learned counsel has further submitted that the findings recorded by the chief engineer are wholly incorrect as instead of basing his order on the actual production of steel he has gone by the capacity of the furnaces. Shri Subramanium has also urged that the faulty recording of the meter has to be judged from the standpoint of section 26 6 of the Indian Electricity Act 1910 and the matter should have been referred to electrical inspector. 8. Shri V.R. Reddy learned senior counsel for the Electricity Board has submitted that section 26 6 of the Indian Electricity Act has no application to a case where the seal fixed on CT PT terminal box had been tampered with and the recording of consumption by the meter had been effected by recourse to artificial means. Learned counsel has laid stress on the fact that the chief engineer after considering all the relevant material and circumstances has recorded a categorical finding that the seal of the CT PT terminal box had been tampered with and the petitioner had exceeded the contracted load and had also dishonestly abstracted electrical energy to a very large extent. According to the learned counsel the findings recorded by the Chief Engineer being based upon relevant material are not open to challenge in proceedings under Article 226 of the Constitution of India. In support of the appeal preferred by the Electricity Board Shri Reddy has submitted that the surcharge being part of the electricity bill the Division Bench of the High Court had erred in holding that the same was chargeable on per unit basis and not at thrice the value thereof. According to the learned counsel in view of Clause 16.9 of the Tariff the fuel surcharge has also to be levied at three times the units assessed. 9. It may be stated at the very outset that a detailed show cause notice dated 13.10.1999 mentioning all the relevant facts was served upon the petitioner to which the petitioner gave a reply on 20.10.1999. The order of the chief engineer mentions that the petitioner was afforded an opportunity of personal hearing and its counsel appeared before him and argued the matter on 25.10.1999 and 26.10.99. The chief engineer has recorded a clear finding that the seal on CT PT terminal box was found to be tampered with. A seal bearing No. 045660P had been put on the CT PT terminal box on 14.5.1999 and the authority fixing the seal had put his signatures thereon. At the time of the inspection on 27.8.1999 the seal was found to be tampered with which was seized by the inspecting team. The seal did not contain the signature of the authority who had put the seal. The record shows that the inspection had been done by a high level team consisting of as many as 8 responsible officers some of whom had come from the headquarters of the electricity board at Patna. An executive magistrate was also a member of the team. The manager of the petitioner himself lodged a report on 28.8.1999 with the deputy superintendent of police Danapur Patna alleging that 8 officers of the Bihar State Electricity Board with armed force visited and tested the installation and the members of the team with the help of screw and plier themselves tampered with the cover of the LT terminal box of CT PT and the plastic seal was removed and brought down by one of the executive engineers. However in reply to the show cause notice filed by the petitioner tampering of the seal was denied and it was pleaded that the matter was being investigated by the investigating officer of the criminal case registered against the petitioner and his report shall be considered by the court at the appropriate time. The chief engineer after considering the entire material and taking into consideration the fact that there were large number of officers of the board at the time of the inspection has recorded a finding that the seal had been tampered with. It is an admitted position that in the factory of the petitioner there were two furnaces each of 6 MT and thus the total capacity was 12 MT. The manufacturer of the induction furnaces namely Megatherm Electronic Pvt. Ltd. had given in writing that the load of 6 MT induction furnace was 2500 KV which is equivalent to 3000 KVA and therefore the actual load of the furnaces installed at the petitioner s factory after taking into consideration the auxiliary load came to 7200 KVA. The Induction Furnaces Association of Bihar of which the petitioner is also a member had agreed and proposed that the load of an induction furnace could be taken to be 600 KVA per MT. On consideration of these factors the chief engineer came to a conclusion that the actual load of the petitioner s factory was 7200 KVA. The other material which has been considered by the chief engineer is that on an average the power was consumed for 21.25 hours per day as the factory was running in two shifts with 40 workers in each shift and therefore the number of units being actually consumed were much higher than that recorded in the meter. On the basis of these findings the assessment has been made of the compensatory amount under clause 16.9 of the tariff. 10. The contention that the dispute regarding tampering of the seal of CT PT terminal unit should have been referred to the electrical inspector has hardly any merit. In Madhya Pradesh Electricity Board Ors. v. Basantibai1 it has been held that a dispute regarding the commission of fraud in tampering with the meter and breaking the body seal is one outside the ambit of section 26 6 of the Indian Electricity Act and the electrical inspector has no jurisdiction to decide such cases of fraud. It was further held that under section 26 6 the only dispute which can be decided by the electrical inspector is as to whether the meter is correct and is accurately recording the reading or there is some fault in the same. Since in the present case it has been found that the seal on the CT PT terminal box had been tampered with and the natural working of the meter had been affected by taking recourse to external devices a dispute of this kind cannot be referred to an electrical inspector. 11. The next contention raised is that the period of 180 days for which theft of electricity has been assessed is absolutely wrong and has no rational basis. The electricity board has proceeded on the footing that Clause 16.9 of the Tariff framed by the Bihar State Electricity Board with the approval of the State government is applicable. Clause 16.9 of the Tariff reads as under 16.9 A Detection of unauthorised load If at any time the consumer is found exceeding the contracted load without specific permission of the board the board may without prejudice to its other rights under the agreement or under the provisions of the Electricity Act estimate the value of the electrical energy so extracted consumed or used shall be calculated as below and may also disconnect the supply without notice I. Necessary assessment for compensation in the following malpractice and theft of energy cases shall be made as below a ................ b In case of using energy by creating obstruction in running of meters or interfering with the system of supply or wires etc. c .................... Unit assessed L x F x H x D Where L ..................... H ..................... D is the no. of days for which the pilferage took place which can be established from production of satisfactory evidence by the consumer. In case there is no possible evidence to establish the period this factor be taken equivalent to 180 or the no. of days elapsed from the date of connection installation of meter till the date of detection of the pilferage whichever is less. F ................................ II. .................. III Method of charging the assessed units as indicated in para I II above. a The consumption so assessed shall be charged at thrice the rate per unit of the tariff applicable to the consumer excluding the consumption recorded by the meter and the latter shall be charged at the appropriate tariff rates. The amount billed at this thrice the tariff rate shall not be taken into consideration for the purpose of computing consumer s liability to pay monthly minimum guarantee. b ................ IV When connected load is more than the sanctioned load in case of all categories LT connection except domestic service. Assessment charge Rs. C x M LD LS x3 Where M Minimum consumption guarantee charge pet BHP per month as applicable in the tariff schedule. LD is the load detected in BHP at the time of inspection. LS is the load sanctioned to the consumer in BHP C This factor be taken equivalent to six months or no. of months or part thereof elapsed from the date of connection installation whichever is less. 12. The relevant part of the tariff quoted above shows that in the cases of theft of electricity or dishonest abstraction of electrical energy the assessment for compensation has to be done on the basis of a formula wherein D stands for number of days for which the pilferage took place and where there is no possible evidence to establish the period this factor can be taken to be equivalent to 180 days. Similarly in case where connected load is more than the sanctioned load the assessment charge has to be done on the basis of a formula where C stands for six months or the number of months or part thereof elapsed from the date of connection installation whichever is less. Therefore under the tariff in both the cases the period can be taken as 180 days or six months. It is on the basis of this formula that the assessment for consumption of units has been done for 180 days. In Hyderabad Vanaspathi Ltd. v. A.P. State Electricity Board Ors.1 it has been held that the terms of conditions for supply of electricity to consumers notified by the board in exercise of power under section 49 of Electricity Supply Act 1948 and made applicable to all consumers availing supply of electricity are statutory in character. This being the legal position the electricity board in our opinion rightly applied Clause 16.9 of the Tariff and there is no infirmity in the assessment made and the bill prepared in pursuance thereof. 13. Shri Gopal Subramanium has also submitted that after the inspection had been done on 27.8.1999 an FIR had been lodged against the petitioner on the same day by Shri Om Prakash Assistant Executive Engineer at the police station and a criminal case was registered under section 39 44 of Indian Electricity Act. This case was investigated and thereafter a final repot was submitted which was accepted by the concerned magistrate and as a result of this order the petitioner stands exonerated from the charge of theft of electricity and no compensatory bill could be issued by taking recourse to Clause 16.9 of the tariff. Shri V.R. Reddy learned senior counsel for the electricity board has submitted that before accepting the final report the learned magistrate had issued notice to Shri Om Prakash assistant executive engineer but the said notice was not served upon him as he was transferred from Patna on account of his allocation to Jharkhand State and as such no representation could be made on behalf of the electricity board against the final report. Subsequently an application has been moved on behalf of the electricity board before the concerned magistrate for recall of the order by which final report was accepted. In our opinion the mere acceptance of final report by the magistrate cannot amount to a finding by the criminal court that theft of electricity was not committed. The accused was not even summoned no charge was framed nor any evidence was recorded. In such a situation it cannot be held that the criminal court has recorded any finding to the effect that the petitioner has not committed theft of electricity. That apart the purpose of a trial under section 39 44 of the Indian Electricity Act is entirely different and the object is to punish and sentence the person who is alleged to have committed the offence. The trial of an accused in a criminal case can have no bearing in the matter of assessment made in accordance with the tariff of the value of electricity dishonestly abstracted or consumed. Therefore the contention raised on the basis of alleged acceptance of the final report in the criminal case has absolutely no merit. 14. It is to be noted that in pursuance of the order passed on 27.9.1999 by the High Court in CWJC no 8939 of 1999 the chief engineer decided the matter holding that the petitioner had exceeded the contracted load and had also committed theft of electricity and consequently assessment of compensatory amount had to be done in accordance with clause 16.9 of the tariff. In terms of the order of the chief engineer the bill dated 29.10.1999 was prepared which was challenged by the petitioner by filing the writ petition before the High Court under Article 226 of the Constitution. The High Court was not hearing an appeal against the decision of the chief engineer. The scope of inquiry in such a matter is a limited one. We would like to quote here what was said by Venkatachaliah J. in State of U.P. Ors. v. Maharaja Dharmander Prasad Singh1 which reads as under However Judicial review under Article 226 cannot be converted into appeal. Judicial review is directed not against the decision but is confined to the examination of the decision making process. In Chief Constable of the North Wales Police v. Evans 1982 1 W.L.R. 1155 refers to the merits legality distinction in judicial review. Lord Hailsham said The purpose of judicial review is to ensure that the individual receives fair treatment and not to ensure that the authority after according fair treatment reaches on a matter which it is authorised by law to decide for itself a conclusion which is correct in the eyes of the Court. Lord Brightman observed ..........Judicial review as the words imply is not an appeal from a decision but a review of the manner in which the decision was made..... And held that it would be an error to think ..........that the Court sits in judgment not only on the correctness of the decision making process but also on the correctness of the decision itself . When the issue raised in judicial review is whether a decision is vitiated by taking into account irrelevant or neglecting to take into account of relevant factors or is so manifestly unreasonable that no reasonable authority entrusted with the power in question could reasonably have made such a decision the judicial review of the decision making process includes examination as a matter of law of the relevance of the factors............ 15. In Apparel Export Promotion Council v. A.K. Chopra1 Chief Justice Anand held as under Judicial Review not being an appeal from a decision but a review of the manner in which the decision was arrived at the court while exercising the power of judicial review must remain conscious of the fact that if the decision has been arrived at by the administrative authority after following the principles established by law and the rules of natural justice and the individual has received a fair treatment to meet the case against him the court cannot substitute its judgment for that of the administrative authority on a matter which fell squarely within the sphere of jurisdiction of that authority. 16. There is not dispute that the chief engineer issued notice to the petitioner mentioning all the relevant facts to which the petitioner gave a reply. The petitioner was also afforded an opportunity of hearing and it appeared through a counsel who made submissions on two days and thereafter the chief engineer passed the order. As discussed earlier the chief engineer has taken into consideration relevant factors and the findings recorded by him are clearly borne out from the material available before him. It cannot be said that the order passed by him is unreasonable or perverse in any manner. The High Court therefore rightly took the view that the order passed by the chief engineer that the compensatory bill is to be prepared in accordance with Clause 16.9 of the tariff could not be interfered with in a writ petition under Article 226 of the Constitution. 17. The Bihar State Electricity Board feels aggrieved by that part of the judgment and order of the Division Bench of the High Court by which it has been held that the surcharge cannot be levied at thrice the rate per unit and has accordingly filed civil appeal no. 8395 of 2002. Shri V.R. Reddy learned senior counsel for the electricity board has submitted that the cost of a unit of electricity is not fixed and on the contrary it is dependent upon the fuel surcharge. The formula for calculating the fuel surcharge is a long and complicated one and is given in Clause 16.10.3 of the tariff. A host of factors have to be taken into consideration in calculating the fuel surcharge and they depend upon many variables. Shri Reddy has submitted that since the surcharge has necessarily to be taken into consideration and has to be added in the cost of electricity and therefore in accordance with part III of clause 16.9 of the tariff it should also be assessed at three times the rate per unit. We are unable to accept the contention raised. Clauses 16.9 and 16.10.3 are separate and distinct clauses in the tariff. Clause 16.9 lays down the formula for calculating the value of the electrical energy abstracted or consumed by a consumer by exceeding the contracted load or by creating obstruction in running of meter. Part III of this Clause deals with method of charging the assessed units and sub para a thereof lays down that the consumption so assessed shall be charged at thrice the rate per unit of the tariff applicable to the consumer excluding the consumption recorded by the meter and the latter shall be charged at the appropriate tariff rates. Clause 16.10.3 is a separate clause which deals with fuel surcharge and it nowhere lays down that this additional surcharge will also be levied at thrice the rate per unit of the tariff. The two clauses namely 16.9 and 16.10.3 have to be read separately and there being no specific provision for assessing the fuel surcharge at thrice the rate per unit it is not possible to hold that in such a case the fuel surcharge should also be charged at thrice the rate per unit. 18. We are therefore of the opinion that the view taken by the High Court is perfectly correct and called for no interference. In the result both the appeals lack merit and are hereby dismissed. No costs. 0 HEADNOTE CRIMINAL LAW Criminal Procedure Code 1898 Sections 236 237 and 403 1 The Customs Act 1968 Sections 111 and 135 Gold Control Act 1968 Section 85 Whether the acquittal for the offences under the Customs Act operates as a bar to the prosecution of the same person in connection with the charge of having committed the offence under the Gold C2ontrol Act Tests to be applied Ingredients of the two offences are different in scope and content What is necessary is to analyze the ingredients of the two offences and not the allegations made in the two complaints Framing of alternative charge Held that if the ingredients of both the offences are satisfied the same act of possession of the gold would constitute an offence both under the Customs Act as also under the Gold Control Act 0 there is therefore no question of framing an alternative charge Judgment of the High Court holding that subsequent trial was barred set aside. Appeal allowed. Held i In order to successfully establish their plea of bar under Section 403 1 the concerned respondents will therefore have to establish that...... 1 there must have been a doubt as to whether the offence under the Customs Act could be proved or whether the offence under the Gold Control Act would be proved and 2 that in the context of this doubt an alternative charge could have been framed under Section 236. Now on a true interpretation of Section 236 it would appear that the Section WOULD BE ATTRACTED where the offence would fall either under one or the other of the two alternative charges. It WOULD NOT BE ATTRACTED if an offence could all under both of the alternative charges. What is contemplated by Section 236 if framing of an alternative charge where on the facts of the case an offence would fall under one of the two alternative charges but the act would not constitute an offence under both the charges. This point is made clear by the illustrations to Section 236. Para5 ii IIIustration a refers to framing of an alternative charge in respect of theft or receiving of stolen property or criminal breach of trust or cheating. It will be seen that a person cannot be said to have committed the offence both of theft as also of receiving of stolen property . A person who himself commits the theft cannot be guilty of the charge of receiving stolen property whereas a person who may have nothing to do with the commission of theft but who may be found in possession of the stolen property would be guilty of the offence of receiving stolen property . Now the prosecution cannot foresee whether the person from whose possession the stolen article was found was himself the thief or was merely a person who had received stolen property from the thief. A person cannot be found guilty of both theft as also for receiving stolen property . And it is in such a case that an alternative charge under Section 236 could be framed. In the present case the concerned respondents could be found guilty of both the offences in the context of the possession of gold. If it was established that there was a prohibition against the import of gold and that he was found in possession of gold which he knew or had reason to believe was liable to confiscation he would be guilty of that offence. He would also be guilty of an offence under the Gold Control Act provided the gold is of a purity of atleast 9 carats. He would have violated the provisions of both the Customs Act and the Gold Control Act if the aforesaid ingredients were established. It is not as if in case he was found guilty of an offence under the Customs Act he could not have been found guilty under the Gold Control Act or vice versa. Upon being found guilty of both the offences the Court may perhaps impose a concurrent sentence in respect of both the offences but the Court has also the power to direct that the sentence shall run consecutively. There is therefore no question of framing of an alternative charge one under the Customs Act and the other under the Gold Control Act. If the ingredients of both the offences are satisfied the same act of possession of the gold would constitute an offence both under the Customs Act as also under the Gold Control Act. Such being the position it cannot be said that they could have been tried on the same facts for an alternative charge in the context of Section 236 Cr. P.C. at the time of the former proceedings. The submission urged in the context of Section 403 1 cannot therefore succeed for it cannot be said that the persons who are sought to be tried in the subsequent proceedings could have been tried on the same facts at the former trial under section 236. Para 6 CASES REFERRED 1. Maqbool Hussain v The State of Bombay and Ors. etc. etc. 1953 S.C.R. Vol. IV p. 730 2. State of Bombay v S.L.Apte and Another 1961 3 SCR p.107 THAKKAR J. 1. Does the acquittal of an accused charged with having committed an offence punishable under Section 111 read with Section 135 of the Customs Act 1969 create a legal bar to the said accused subsequently being prosecuted under Section 85 of the Gold Control Act 1968. The High Court having answered this question in the affirmative against the prosecution and having directed the dropping of the subsequent proceedings on the premise that the acquittal in the former proceedings operated as a legal bar to the prosecution of the accused in the latter proceedings operated as a legal bar to the prosecution of the accused in the latter proceedings the State has approached this Court by way of the present appeal. 2. Respondents 1 to 3 came to be prosecuted as a result of a raid at their house in which primary gold valued at Rs. 84 770 at the material time was found along with some other articles. They were prosecuted for an offence punishable under section 111 read with Section 135 of the Customs Act 1969. In that case present respondent No.3 was convicted whereas present respondent Nos. 1 and 2 were acquitted. The same alleged offenders were later on sought to be prosecuted under Section 85 of the Gold Control Act 1968 relying on the find of primary gold from the very same premises at the time and on the occasion of the very same raid which gave rise to the prosecution under the Customs Act which had culminated in the conviction of respondent No. 3 and the acquittal of respondents 1 and 2. A contention was thereupon raised on behalf of respondents 1 to 3 that the new trial was barred. The Chief Judicial Magistrate accepted this plea and ordered that the prosecution be dropped. The learned Sessions Judge confirmed the said order. The appellant challenged the order passed by the learned trial Magistrate as confirmed by the learned Sessions Judge by way of a Revision Application to the High Court the High Court affirmed the decision of the Courts below holding that the present trial was barred by virtue of Section 403 1 of the Code of Criminal Procedure 1898 Cr. P.C. . Hence this appeal. In order to determine this question it is necessary to identify the ingredients which will have to be established by the prosecution in order to bring home the guilty under the different provisions. These ingredients may be catalogued as under Ingredients of the charge for the Ingredients of the charge for offence under Section 111 read with the offence under Sec. 85 of Sec. 135 of the Customs Act 1969 the Gold Control Act 1968 in respect of which the respondents for which the respondents are were acquitted. sought to be prosecuted. i Interalia being in possession The offender owns or has of or being concerned in keeping in his possession custody or concealing of goods which the or control any primary offender knows or has reason to gold of not less than 9 believe are liable to confiscation carats in purity in under Section 111. unfinished or semi finished form or in blocks bars etc. ii The goods in question gold was imported within the Indian Customs waters contrary to a prohibition contained under the Customs Act. iii There was a prohibition in respect of the import of gold at the material time as contemplated by Sec. 111 D of the Customs Act. 3. It is therefore evident that the ingredients required to be established in respect of the offence under the Customs Act are altogether different from the ones required to be established for an offence under the Gold Control Act. In respect of the former the prosecution has to establish that there was a prohibition against the import into Indian sea waters of goods which were found to be in the possession of the offender. On the other hand in respect of the offence under the Gold Control Act it is required to be established that the offender was in possession of primary gold meaning thereby gold of a purity of not less than 9 carats in any unfinished or semi finished form. In regard to the latter offence it is not necessary to establish that there is any prohibition against the import of gold into Indian sea waters. Mere possession of gold of purity not less than 9 carats in any unfinished or semi finished form would be an offence under the Gold Control Act. It is therefore stating the obvious to say that the ingredients of the two offences are altogether different. Such being the case the question arises whether the acquittal for the offences under the Customs Act which requires the prosecution to establish altogether different ingredients operates as bar to the prosecution of the same person in connection with the charge of having committed the offence under the Gold Control Act. 4. Reliance has been placed on Section 403 1 of the Code of Criminal Procedure 1898 Cr. P.C. in support of the plea that the prosecution under the Gold Control Act would be barred on the basis of the undermentioned facts i that the respondents had been tried by a competent Court for the offence of being in possession of gold under the Customs Act and had been acquitted. ii they are sought to be prosecuted on the same facts for an offence under the Gold Control Act. It is not in dispute that the respondents were tried and acquitted for the offence under the Customs Act in connection with the possession of a quantity of gold. Their trial would be barred by Section 403 1 provided they are sought to be prosecuted on same facts for any offence for which a different charge from the one made against them might have been made under Section 236 and for which they might have been convicted under Section 237. 5. In order to successfully establish their plea of bar under Section 403 1 the concerned respondents will therefore have to establish that i It was doubtful as to which of the several offences the facts which could be proved by the prosecution would consitute. ii And they could have been charged in the alternative with having committed one or other of the said offences. In other words what they would be required to establish would be that 1 there must have been a doubt as to whether the offence under the Customs Act could be proved or whether the offence under the Gold Control Act would be proved and 2 that in the context of this doubt an alternative charge could have been framed under Section 236. Now on a true interpretation of Section 236 it would appear that the Section WOULD BE ATTRACTED where the offence would fall either under one or the other of the two alternative charges. It WOULD NOT BE ATTRACTED if an offence could fall under both of the alternative charges. What is contemplated by Section 236 if framing of an alternative charge where on the facts of the case an offence would fall under one of the two alternative charges but the act would not constitute an offence under both the charges. This point is made clear by the illustrations to Section 236 viz a A is accused of an act which may amount to theft or receiving stolen property or criminal breach of trust of cheating. He may be charged with theft receiving stolen property criminal breach of trust and cheating or he may be charged with having committed theft or receiving stolen property or criminal breach of trust or cheating. b A states on oath before the Magistrate that he saw B hit C with a club. Before the Sessions Court A states on oath that B never hit C. A may be charged in the alternative and convicted of intentionally giving false evidence although it cannot be proved which of these contradictory statements was false. 6. Illustration a refers to framing of an alternative charge in respect of theft or receiving of stolen property or criminal breach of trust or cheating. It will be seen that a person cannot be said to have committed the offence both of theft as also of receiving of stolen property . A person who himself commits the theft cannot be guilty of the charge of receiving stolen property whereas a person who may have nothing to do with the commission of theft but who may be found in possession of the stolen property would be guilty of the offence of receiving stolen property . Now the prosecution cannot foresee whether the person from whose possession the stolen article was found was himself the thief or was merely a person who had received stolen property from the thief. A person cannot be found guilty of both theft as also for receiving stolen property . And it is in such a case that an alternative charge under Section 236 could be framed. In the present case the concerned respondents could be found guilty of both the offences in the context of the possession of gold. If it was established that there was a prohibition against the import of gold and that he was found in possession of gold which he knew of had reason to believe was liable to confiscation he would be guilty of that offence. He would also be guilty of an offence under the Gold Control Act provided the gold is of a purity of atleast 9 carats. He would have violated the provisions of both the Customs Act and the Gold Control Act if the aforesaid ingredients were established. It is not as if in case he was found guilty of an offence under the Customs Act he could not have been found guilty under the Gold Control Act or vice versa. Upon being found guilty of both the offences the Court may perhaps impose a concurrent sentence in respect of both the offences but the Court has also the power to direct that the sentence shall run consecutively. There is therefore no question of framing of an alternative charge one under the Customs Act and the other under the Gold Control Act. If the ingredients or both the offences are satisfied the same act of possession of the gold would constitute an offence both under the Gold Control Act. Such being the position it cannot be said that they could have been tried on the same facts for an alternative charge in the context of Section 236 Cr. P.C. at the time of the former proceedings.The submission urged in the context of Section 403 1 cannot therefore succeed for it cannot be said that the persons who are sought to be tried in the subsequent proceedings could have been tried on the same facts at the former trial under section 236. 7. Strong reliance has been placed on behalf of the respondents on MAQBOOL HUSSAIN VS. THE STATE OF BOMBAY ORS. ETC. ETC.in support of the submission that the second prosecution is barred. In Maqbool s case the central issue in the context of the fact that a person who had arrived at an Indian Airport from abroad on being searched was found in possession of gold in contravention of the relevant notification prohibiting the import of gold. Action was taken against him by the Customs authorities and the gold seized from his possession was confiscated. Later on a prosecution was launched against him in the criminal court a Bombay charging him with having committed the offence under Section 8 of the Foreign Exchange Regulation Act Act 7 of 1947 read with the relevant notification. In the background of these facts the plea of autrefois acquit was raised seeking protection under Article 20 2 of the Constitution of India. This Court came to the conclusion that the proceedings before the Customs authority did not constitute the prosecution of the appellant. The Court also took the view that the penalty imposed on him did not constitute a punishment by the judicial tribunal. The ratio of the decision is altogether different and has no application in so far as the plea raised by the respondents is concerned. However reliance is placed on certain observations made in the course of the discussion at p. 737. To quote The test is whether the former offence and the offence now charged have the same ingredients in the sense that the facts constituting the one are sufficient to justify a conviction of the other not that the facts relied on by the Crown are the same in the two trials. A plea of autrefois acquit is not proved unless it is shown that the verdict of acquittal of the previous charge necessarily involves an acquittal the latter. Vide Halsbury s Laws of England Hailsham Edition Vol.9 pages 152 and 153 paragraph 212 . Emphasis added We have already applied the very test indicated in this passage. But we have reached the conclusion that in the present case this test does not support the respondents submission in as much as the ingredients of the two offences are different in scope and content. The facts constituting the offence under Customs Act are different and are not sufficient to justify the conviction under the Gold Control Act. It must also be realized that what is necessary is to analyze the ingredients of the two offences and not the allegations made in the two complaints as declared by this Court in STATE OF BOMBAY VS. S.L. APTE ANOTHER. 8. We have also concluded that a separate charge could have been framed in respect of the distinct offence under Gold Control Act Under the circumstances the plea raised by the difence cannot succeed. The two conclusions reached by us squarely brings the matter squarely within the parameters of the law settled by this Court decades ago in S.L. Apte s case Supra . In that case the element of dishonesty was required to be established under section 409 of Indian Penal Code whereas it was not required to be established under Section 105 of the Indian Insurance Act. In this backdrop this Court has enunciated the law in the context of the plea based on Article 20 2 of the Constitution Section 26 of the General Clauses Act and section 403 2 of the Criminal Procedure Code in no uncertain terms If therefore the offences were distinct there is no question of the rule as to double jeopardy as embodied in Art. 20 2 of the Constitution being applicable. The next point to be considered is as regards the scope of s.26 of the General Clauses Act. Though ss.26 in its opening words refers to the act or omission constituting an offence under two or more enactments the emphasis is not on the facts alleged in the ingredients which constitute the two offences with which a person is charged. This is made clear by the concluding portion of the section which refers to shall not be liable to be punished twice for the same offece . If the offences are not the same but are distinct the ban imposed by this provision also cannot be invoked. It therefore follows that in the present case as the respondents are not being sought to be punished for the same offence twice but for two distinct offences constituted or made up of different ingredients the bar of the provision is inapplicable. In passing it may be pointed out that the construction we have placed on Art. 20 2 of the Constitution and s.26 of the General Clauses Act is precisely in line with the terms of s.403 2 of the Criminal Procedure Code which runs 403 2 A person acquitted or convicted of any offence may be afterwards tried for any distinct offence for which a separate charge might have been made against him on the former trial under section 235 sub section 1 . There is no manner of doubt that section 403 1 does not come to rescue of the respondents 1 to 3 whereas section 403 2 of the Code clearly concludes the matter against them. 9. The High Court was therefore in error in holding that subsequent trial was barred. We accept the appeal on this point and reverse the decision of the Courts below and the High Court. The appellant was understandably seriously aggrieved by the crroneous enunciation of law by the High Court as it would cause prejudice in other matters involving the same point which may have been pending or might arise in future. With the position of law being now setted in the appellant s favour the main objective of the appellant is achieved. Learned counsel for the appellant indicated at the very commencement that the main purpose of the appeal was to have the true position in law setted. That 20 years have elapsed since the date of the seizure November 15 1968 is in our opinion no ground for not proceeding further with the matter inasmuch as the offence in question is a serious economic offence which undermines the entire economy of the Nation. The delay occasioned in the working of the judicial system by the ever increasing workload cannot provide an alibi for upholding such a plea. However in the present case the sessions Court has quashed the proceedings not only on this ground but also on the basis of certain factual findings as well and the learned Counsel for the appellant himself found it difficult to assail these findings at this juncture. The operative order passed by the High Court cannot therefore be disturbed in view of the facts and circumstances peculiar to this particular case. We accordingly allow the appeal to this extent and reverse the findings of the Lower Court and High Court on the question of maintainability of the subsequent prosecution but find ourselves unable to pass any further orders under the circumstances. 0 CROSS CITATION 1972 SCC 3 885 1973 SCR 1 880 CRIMINAL APPELLATE JURISDICTION Cr.A. No. 212 of 1968. Appeals by special leave from the judgment and order dated January 19 1968 ofthe Rajasthan High Court inCrl. Revision No. 383 of 1967. S. P. Singh and Shiv Pujan Singh for the appellant. Debabroto Mookerjee P. C. Kapur and K. B. Mehta for the respondent. The Judgment of the Court was delivered by Khanna J. Ayodhya Singh appellant and Hira Singhwere convicted by Additional Munsiff MagistrateJaipur for offences under section 457 and 380 read with section 75 IndianPenal Code. Ayodhya Singh was sentenced to undergo rigorous imprisonment for a period of two years and to pay a fine of rupees two thousand for the offence under section 457 read with section 75 Indian Penal Code. In default of payment of fine Ayodhya Singh was sentenced to undergo rigorous imprisonment for a further period ofsix months. Similar sentence wasawarded to Ayodhya Singh for the offence under section 380 read with section 75 Indian Penal Code. The two sentences were ordered to run consecutively. Hira Singh was sentenced to undergo rigorousimprisonment for a period of two years and to pay a fine of rupees one thousand or in default to undergo rigorousimprisonment for afurther period of six months for the offence under section 457 read with section 75 Indian Penal Code. Similar sentence was awarded to Hira Singh for the offence under section 380 read with section 75 Indian Penal Code. The two sentences of Hira Singh were also ordered to run consecutively. Appeals filed by Ayodhya Singh andHira Singh were dismissed by Additional Sessions Judge Jaipur. Revision petitions filed by Ayodhya Singh and 7 L173Sup.C.I. 73 882 Hira Singh in Rajasthan High Court met with no better fate. Ayodhya Singh thereafter filed this appeal by special leave through jail. The prosecution case is that Kistoor Chand PW 73 deals in gold and silver. He was running a shop inJohri bazar Jaipur but sometime before the occurrence he had to vacate the shop and remove the gold and silver ornaments worth over a lakh of rupees to his house situated in Manni Ramji kaRasta in Jaipur City.The house has four storeyes and the ornaments were put in a room on the third storey of the house. Cash amount was also kept by Kistoor Chand inthat room. When Kistoor Chand got up on the morning of February 9 1964 he found that the big window of the room in which ornaments had been kept was lying open. On opening the room it was found that the boxes containing ornaments were lying empty. A number of articles were seen scattered in the room.Reportabout the occurrence was lodged at police station Manak Chowk Jaipur City by Mahindra Kumar PW74 son of Kistoor Chand at 7 30 a.m. on February 9 1964. A case was then registered by the police under sections 457 and 380 Indian Penal Code. Sub Inspector Basarat Vallabh went soon after the registration of the case to Kistoor Chand s house and found that culpritshad effected their entry into the room by breaking open the window. The Sub Inspector saw a number of articles scattered in the room. The containers for keeping gold and silver ornaments were lying empty. A police photographer was sent for. The photographer developed the fingerprints left by the culprits on a silver plate lying in an almirah of the room. The photographs of the finger impressions were compared with the specimen finger impressions of Hira Singh accused and it was found that they tallied with each other. Hira Singh accused was arrested on February 21 1964. In pursuance of disclosure statement of Hira Singh Rs. 1 790 were recovered from Saraswati Bai wife of the brother of Hira Singh. A box was also recovered in pursuance of the disclosure statement of Hira Singh and a number of stolen articles werefound in that box. Hira Singh also got recovered an instrument of house breaking. As a result of the interrogation of Hira Singh the police raided the house of Ayodhya Singh appellant at Jairi on February 21 1964 and recovered from that place 18 stolen articles. Ayodhya Singh was arrested by the police on February 25 1964 at Etawah and from his personal search 26 items of stolen property were recovered. The recovered property included cash amount of Rs. 6 485 including 28 currency notes ofthe denominationof Rs. 100 . In pursuance of information supplied by 883 Ayodhya Singh the police recovered on March 3 1964 a numberof stolen gold articles wrapped in anold baniyan which had been buried in a graveyard near milestone No. 5 on the Agra Etawah Kanpur road. Identifications of recovered ornaments were held by Shri A. C. Bafna Magistrate PW 72 on July 17 1964 and July 20 1964. The recovered ornaments were then identified by Kistoor Chand and Mahendra Kumar PWs as those which belonged to them and which had been stolen. At the trialthe two accused denied the prosecution allocations against them and stated that they hadbeen falsely involved in this case. According to them the various articles which had been recovered bythe police belonged to them. Regarding the recovery of some goldbars from him the appellant stated that he got the bars prepared for the purpose of purchasing bonds. Thetrial court accepted the prosecution case and convicted and sentenced the accused as above.The recovered articles were ordered to be restored to Mahendra Kumar complainant.Appeals and revision petitions filed by the accused as stated earlier were dismissed. We have heard Mr. Singh who has argued thecase amicus curiaeon behalf of the appellant and are ofthe opinion that there is no merit in the appeal.The fact thatsome persons had broken into the house of Kistoor Chand on the night betweenFebruary 8 and February 9 1964 and had removed valuable articles consisting of cash jewellery and silverware is proved by the testimony of Kistoor Chand and Mahindra Kumar. The prosecution has also ledevidence to show that a number of stolen articles were recovered in pursuance of the disclosure statement of Hira Singh accused after he was arrested on February 21 1964. The interrogation of Hira Singh led to the police raid on the house of Ayodhya Singh appellant wherefrom a number of stolen articles wererecovered. Ayodhya Singh wasarrested on February 25 1964 and some of the stolen articleswere recovered from his person. Ayodhya Singh thereaftermade disclosure statement which led to the recovery ofmore stolenarticles from a graveyard on March 3 1964. The appellate court and the High Court accepted the evidence adduced by the prosecution in this respect. The version of the accused that the recovered articles belonged tothem was rejected. The courts below in this content reliedupon the identification of the recovered articles by Kistoor Chand and Mahindra Kumar. Nothing has been brought to our noticeby Mr. Singh as may justify interference with the appraisement of the evidence of the trial magistrate the Additional Sessions Judge and theHigh Court. One significant circumstance which shows the falsity of the claim made by the appellant that the recovered articles belonged to him is the fact that some of those articles were recovered from a graveyard near milestone No. 5 at AgraEtawahKanpur road. The articles were found to havebeen buried there 884 and were recovered in pursuance of the disclosure statement of the appellant. If the aforesaid recovered articles consisting ofgold bars belonged to the appellant it is difficult to believe that he would have buried them in a lonelyspot in a graveyard. The fact that the appellant buriedthem in a graveyard shows hisanxiety to conceal those articles so that no one may know that he was in possession of those articles. Mr. Singh has assailed the propriety of the identification of the recovered articles. In this respect we find that the evidence of Shri A. C. Bafna Magistrate PW 72 showsthat the recoveredarticles weremixed with other similar articles and all necessary precautions were taken. Kistoor Chand and Mahindra Kumar correctly identified the recovered articles. Nothing cogent has been shown to us as to why the statement of Shri Bafna in this respect be not accepted. Mr. Singh has referred to the observations of the High Court that the judgments of thetrial magistrate and the Additional Sessions Judge were not very satisfactory.This circumstance in our opinion is not very material because the High Court considered the evidence which hadbeen adduced in the caseat some length and came to the conclusion that the case against the accused hadbeen proved. In view of the fact that the evidence on record has been discussed in detail by the High Court it cannot be said that the appellant has been prejudiced because of the fact that the judgments of the trialmagistrate and the appellate court were not as elaborate as theyshouldhave been. A faint attempt was made by Mr. Singh to show that there had been misjoinder of charges. This submission is plainly without any force because the circumstances of the case show that the accused jointly committed the offences with which they were charged and that those offences were committed in the course of the same transaction. The two accused could consequently be. charged and tried together as such a course is permitted by section 239 of the Codeof Criminal Procedure. Lastly it has been argued that the conviction of the appellant should have been under section 411 Indian Penal Code and not under sections 457 and 380 Indian Penal Code. This contention is equally untenable.The house breaking and theft in the house of Kistoor Chand took place on the night between February 8 and February 9 1964.The various stolen articles were recovered from the appellant s house on February 21 1964 and thereafter from his person on February 25 1964. The appellant was in police custody after February 25 1964 and more stolen articles were recovered on March 3 1964 from the graveyard in pursuance of his disclosure statement. The articles which were recovered on March 3 1964 can consequently be held to be in the possession of the appellant on February 25 1694. It would 885 thus follow that within 17 days of the theft the appellant was found in possession of the stolen articles. According to illustration a of section 114 of the Indian Evidence Act a man who is in possession of stolen goods soon after the theft is either the thief or hasreceived the goods knowing them to be stolen unless he can account for his possession. It would in our opinion depend upon the facts and circumstances of each case whether the court should draw the presumption that a person found in possession of stolen goods soon after the theft and who has not been able to account for his possession is the thief or whether he is the receiver of the goods knowing them to be stolen. We may state at this stage that the appellant has not been able to account for his possession of the stolen articles and the explanation furnished by him is not all worthy of credence. Looking to the facts and circumstances of the case we are of the view that the courts below were justified in drawing the presumption that the appellant was guilty of the offence under section 457 and 380 Indian Penal Code. The factthat the culprits entered the room on the third floor by opening the window and thereafter broke open a large number of boxes and almirahsand removed huge quantity of gold and silverware shows that it was not the work of a single individual. The fact that the appellant was foundsoon after the theft in possession of a very large number of stolen articles shows that he was himself the thief and not the receiver of stolen goods.The present isnot acase wherein one or two or a very few of the stolen articles were found in the possession of the appellant soon after the theft. On the contrary the bulk of stolen articleswere recovered from him. The number and the nature of the stolen articles recovered from the appellant soon after the theft coupled with the other circumstances of the case in our opinion warrant the presumption that the appellant himself committed thetheft after entering the room on the third storey of Kistoor Chand s house through the window. In the result the appeal fails and is dismissed. S.C. Appeal dismissed. 886 0 CROSS CITATION 1965 SC 585 5 1962 SCR Supl. 1 8 CRIMINAL APPELLATE JURISDICTION Criminal Appeal No. 31 of 1961. Appeal by special leave from the judgment and order dated October 7 1958 of the Andhra Pradesh High Court in Criminal Appeal No. 456 of 1957. P . Ram Reddy for the appellants. Ratna Raoand K R. Choudhri for respondent No 1. A. Ganganatham Chetty and T.M. Sen. for respondent No.2. 1961. October 5. The Judgment of the Court was delivered by HIDAYATULLAH J. The two appellants who were granted special leave by this Court appeal against the judgment of the High Court of Andhra Pradesh convicting them on appeal against acquittal of an offence under. 380 of the Indian Penal Code and sentencing them to six months rigorous imprisonment and a fine Rs. 500 each with further rigorous imprisonment for one month in default of payment of fine. The prosecution case which had a chequered career in the High Court and the two Courts below is as follows In Dusi which is a partof Bhaskararaopuram there was a Press knownas Srinivasa Printing Press at Srinivasa Ashram. This Press existed for over 17 years. Pappala Chinna Ramadasu P.W.4 was admittedly a printer and for some years the declared keeper of that Press under s. 4 of the Press and Registration of Books Act 1867. The declarations were made in 1944 Ex.P.4 and 1947 Ex.P 5 . On November 21 1955 10 Pappala ChinnaRamadasu soldthis press by a registered document Ex.P. 1 to one Boddepalli Lakshminarayana forRs 4 000 of which Rs.3 500 were shown to have been paid in advance and the balance was received by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu on January10 1956 Ex.P.2 . Two applications were then made on December 1 1955 respectively by Chinna Ramadasu andBoddepalli Lakshminarayana beforethe Collector and District Magistrate for substituting the name of Boddepalli Lakshminarayana in place of that of Pappala Chinna Ramadasu in the declaration. On December 6 1955 by Ex.P.11 they were informed that they should apply under the Pressand Registration of Books Act 25 of 1867 . Subsequently on January 11 1956 a declaration under s. 4 of that Act was made by Boddepalli Lakshminarayana and was accepted Ex.P.3 . The case of the prosecution further is that Boddepalli Lakshminarayana went to Kurnoolon March 20 1956 and in hisabsence the two appellants with two others who wereprosecuted but acquitted removed the Printing Press on the night of March 25 1956 to Korlakota where the first appellant Apparao resides. A report of the offence Ex.P 13 purporting to be writtenon March 27 1956 was handed in at the police station house on the following day at 8 P.m. The policetook no action anda complaint was therefore filed on April 4 1956 by Boddepalli Laksminarayana. The Judicial Second class Magistrate Srikakulam convicted the two appellants of an offence under 8. 380 of the Indian Penal Code and acquitted the two others with whom we are not concerned and sentenced each of theappellants to imprisonment till the rising of theCourt and a fine of Rs. 250 with simple imprisonment for one month in default. On appeal the Additional District and Sessions Judge Srikakulam set aside the conviction and acquitted them. The complainant then obtained special leave of the High Court to file 11 appeal againstthis acquittal and the High Court reversed theacquittal asalready indicated above. In support of the prosecutioncase the complainant examined four witnesses including himself. Pappala Chinna Ramadasu was examined as P.W.4 to prove that he had sold the Pressto Boddepalli Lakshminarayana and two other witnesses wereexamined to prove theremoval of the Printing Press by the appellants. The defence of the appellants was as follows According to them the Press originally belonged to oneGovindachari and on October 25 1947 he transferred it to Kuna Appala Naidu by Ex. D 2. In the registered sale deed then executed Govindachari was joined formally by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu. The sale was for Rs. 6 400 and on the same day a promissory note was executed by Kuna Appala Naidu in favour of Govindachari which was attested by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu. Subsequently Appala Naidu made payments of certain amounts and endorsements on tho promissory note showing these payments were signed by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu as a witness. Kuna Appala Naidu was examinedas D.W.1 and he stated that the name of Pappala ChinnaRamadasu was formally included in the transfer deed since the declaration stood in his name. He also stated that the deed Ex. D.2 was signed as witness by one Akkala Naidu who died years before the present controversy started. Kuna Appala Naidu later sold the Press to the second appellant and one Sri K. Sriramda and the second appellant continued in possessionas owner. Pappala ChinnaRamadas continued as the printer and his declaration as the keeper of the Press also continued. In 1953 Pappala Chinna Ramadasu left the Press for good. The Press was leased out by thesecond appellant to one Appanna and this leave continued till 1956. On March 19 1956 an agreement for leave was executed in favour of the first appellant and on March 26 1956 a registered deed was duly 12 executed. According to the appellants the Press WAS removed during the day on March 27 and the lease amount was paidon the28th. According to them the second appellant was the owner in law and infact of the Press and the first appellant was the lessee and had removed the Press in the bona fide exercise ofhis right as lessee. The appellants examined eight witnesses in support of their case. The case of the prosecution hinged upon the evidence of Pappala Chinna Ramadasu when confronted with Ex. D 2 he denied his signature and stated evasively that he could not identify the signaturesof Govindachari and Appala Naidu. He admitted however that Appanna used to look after the Press after 1953 though he said that he used to visit the Press oncein two or three months before he soldit to P.W.1 and that the correspondence used to be made in his name.He also stated that he had purchased the Press from the Madras Type Foundry Co. for RH. 9 107 but that the bills were lost and he added that they were taken away along with the Press when it was removed. The case of the appellants rested upon the proof of the signature of Pappala Chinna Ramadasu on Es. D 2 and additionally the proof of the signature of Akkala Naidu beoause if Akkala Naidu signed the document in 1947 and died some four years before the present controversy started there would be goodreasonto think that a document of this character couldnot be a fabricated one. The appellants examined a handwriting expert Sri B. R. Singh D.W.8 . He statedcategoricallythat Ex.D 2bore tho signature ofPappala Chimla Ramadasu. The signature of Akkala Naidu was proved by his son Sri Rangam. He identified the signature of his father not only on that document but also on Ex. D 3 the promissory Dote. He also stated that h father had died in 1951. From thismaterial the Additional District and Sessions Judge Srikakulam found that Ex D 2 13 was not a forged document as was suggested but was amply proved as genuine by Pappala Chandrudu D.W 4 and the combined evidence of Sri Rangam D. W.3 andSri B.R. Singh D. W. 8 .He therefore held that Pappala Chinna Ramadasu had no right to sell the Pres in 1955 to Boddepalli Lakshminarayana and that his connection with the Press had effectively ceased from. 1953 even as a mere printer. It is unnecessary to examine whether this finding or the finding given by the Judicial SecondClass Magistrate Srikakulam who held otherwise wasthe correct inferencefrom the. facts. The learned Judge of the High Court who heard the appeal against the acquittal said nothing about Ex. D 2. According to him the removal of the Pressamounted to theft even though the appellants removed it under a bona fide claim of right. In this statement of the law the learned Judge was with respect clearly in error. This is what the learned Judge observed Further to a charge of theft the plea that the property was removed under a bona fide claim of right would not avail. For example aperson who bona fide believes that the fountain pen on his neighbour s desk is his has no right in law to trespass into the neighbour s houseand snatch away the pen without the latter s content. The first of the statements is certainly not the law. It is settled law that where abona fide claim of right exists it can be a good defence to a prosecution for theft. An act does not amount to theft unless there be not only no legal right but no appearance or colour of alegal right. in 2 East .659 the law was stated a long time ago thus If there be in the prisoner any fair pretence of property of right or if it be brought into doubt at all the court will direct an acquittal. 14 And accordingto I Hale P.C. 509 the best evidence is that the goodswere taken quite openly. The law thus stated by East and Hale has not been altered inmoderntimes.There are numerous casesin which Courts in India have recognised a bone fide claim of right as a defence to the charge of theft. See Ratanlal law of Crimes 19th Ed. p. 933. We are not concerned in this case with the declaration under the Press and Registrationof Books Act. A declaredkeeper of the Press is not necessarily the owner thereof so as to be able to confertitle to thePress upon another. The ownership of the Press is a matter of the general law and must follow that law. Whether Pappala Chinna Ramadasu was not only the declared keeper of thePress but also its owner can onlybe effectively decided by theCivil Court. For purposes of Criminal law the evidence prima facie pointed to a transferof thePress by Pappala Chinna Ramadasu and Govindachari to Kuna Appala Naidu. The evidence prima facie also established that the appellants had taken possession of the Press under a bona fide claim of right and that in ouropinion. was sufficient to dispose of the present case. The Additional District and Sessions Judge Srikakulam had rightly held that the matter was for the decision of the Civil Court and that this was not a case of theft under the Indian Penal Code and had rightly directed the acquittal of the appellants. The learned Judge of the High Court considered the declarationby Pappala Chinna Ramadasu which continued Unchanged as sufficient to prove anoffence of theft. In our opinion in tho circumstances and in the light of the finding given by the District and Sessions Judgewith regard to Ex. D 2 it was necessary to go further to see what right Pappala Chinna Ramadasu had to the Press at all. If this had been considered the learned Judge would have seen that there was some doubt the rightof Pappala Chinna Ramadasu 15 to transfer the Press in 1955 toBoddepalli Lakshminarayana and further that the defence that the appellantstook possession of the Press under a bona. fide claim of right was a good defence entitling them to an acquittal. In the result this appeal must succeed. The convictions ofthe appellantsand the sentences passed on them are set aside they are acquitted and their bail bonds shall stand discharged. The fines if realised are ordered to be remitted. Appeal allowed. 0 HEADNOTE SERVICE AND LABOUR LAWS Industrial Dispute Act 1947 Section 11A Natural Justice Termination Effect of acquittal in criminal case Theft of Face Milling Cutter Respondents caught in factory premises Enquiry officer held charges proved but respondents acquitted in criminal case Labour Court while holding that departmental enquiry was legal and proper also held that initiation of enquiry before disposal of criminal case was against principles of natural justice and hence termination was not justified specially when accused is acquitted by Criminal Court. Held when Labour Court upheld the departmental enquiry as being legal and proper then it should have confined itself to deciding the legality of dismissal order as per the provisions of Section 11A. Labour Court did not consider the law laid down by Apex Court in The Workmen of M s Firestone Tyre Rubber Co. of India Pvt. Ltd. s case. It even erred in holding that since appellant failed to lead any evidence to prove the charge in Labour Court dismissal orders were liable to be set aside. HELD When we examine the legality and the correctness of the Awards of the Labour Court we are of the considered opinion that the Labour Court having held and indeed rightly that the departmental enquiry conducted by the appellant was legal and proper committed an error in holding that the departmental enquiry got vitiated due to criminal court s order which had acquitted the respondents from the charge of theft. In our opinion there was no occasion for the Labour Court to examine this issue once the departmental enquiry was held legal and proper. The Labour Court in our opinion committed yet another error in holding that since the appellant failed to lead any evidence to prove the charge in Labour Court therefore the dismissal orders of respondents are liable to be set aside. This finding in our opinion was again not legally sustainable. Para 16 In other words the Labour Court should have then confined its enquiry to examine only one limited question as to whether the punishment given to the respondents was in any way disproportionate to the gravity of the charge leveled against them and this the Labour Court should have examined by taking recourse to the provisions of Section 11 A of the Industrial Dispute Act 1947 in short the Act and the law laid down by this Court in the case of The Workmen of M s Firestone Tyre Rubber Co. of India Pvt. Ltd. v. The Management Ors. 1973 1 SCC 813 . It was however not done thereby rendering the order of Labour Court legally unsustainable. Para 18 Natural justice Whether initiation of departmental enquiry should be only after decision of Criminal Court otherwise it would be against the principle of natural justice. Held criminal proceeding and departmental proceedings are two separate proceedings in law. Standard of proof required in domestic enquiry is different from that required in criminal case. In domestic enquiry it is pre ponderance of probabilities. In this case dismissal order was not based on Criminal Court s judgement. It was based on domestic enquiry which every employer has a right to conduct independently of criminal case. Divisional Controller Karnataka State Road Transport Corporation s JT 2011 13 SC 247 case relied. HELD The Labour Court should have seen that the dismissal order of the respondents was not based on the criminal Court s judgment and it could not be so for the reason that it was a case of acquittal. It was however based on domestic enquiry which the employer had every right to conduct independently of the criminal case. Para 20 This Court has consistently held that in a case where the enquiry has been held independently of the criminal proceedings acquittal in criminal Court is of no avail. It is held that even if a person stood acquitted by the criminal Court domestic enquiry can still be held the reason being that the standard of proof required in a domestic enquiry and that in criminal case are altogether different. In a criminal case standard of proof required is beyond reasonable doubt while in a domestic enquiry it is the preponderance of probabilities. See Divisional Controller Karnataka State Road Transport Corporation v. M.G. Vittal Rao jt 2011 13 SC 247 . Para 21 In the light of this settled legal position the Labour Court was not right in holding that the departmental enquiry should have been stayed by the appellant awaiting the decision of the criminal Court and that it is rendered illegal consequent upon passing of the acquittal order by the criminal Court. This finding of the Labour Court is therefore also not legally sustainable. Para 22 Dismissal Labour court held departmental proceedings to have got vitiated due to acquittal in criminal proceeding In writ High Court held enquiry to be legal but remanded the matter without directing as to what Labour Court has to decide after remand and why Writ Court could not decide such issues. Held High Court erred in doing so. Writ Court should have examined the question itself which it had left for consideration i.e. whether order of dismissal was commensurate with the charges or interference was required under Section 11 of the Act. Shankar Chakravarti s case referred. HELD Now coming to the order of writ Court Single Judge though in our opinion the Single Judge rightly held the departmental enquiry as being legal and proper but committed an error in remanding the case to the Labour Court without precisely saying as to what the Labour Court has to decide after remand and why writ Court cannot decide such issues in the writ petition. We find that the Single Judge in concluded para of the order remanded the whole case afresh for its decision on merits. Para 23 In our considered view the Single Judge Writ Court having held the enquiry to be legal and proper instead of remanding the case to the Labour Court should have himself examined the short question which had survived for consideration in the writ petition namely whether the punishment of dismissal was commensurate with the charges or it required any interference by the Court under Section 11 A of the Act. Para 24 Dismissal order Whether justified when acquittal was recorded in criminal proceedings Departmental enquiry held to be legal and proper Respondent was found committing theft while on duty. Held act of theft by employee while on duty is a serious charge which stood proved in enquiry. Hence employer was justified in dismissing the employee from service. Plea that employee was acquitted in criminal case hence reinstatement should be ordered has no merit. Dismissal order was not passed on the basis of conviction of employee by the Criminal Court which was later set aside by Superior Court. Findings were based on preponderance of probabilities and could be recorded by the enquiry officer notwithstanding the order of acquittal by Criminal Court. Dismissal order held to be legal and proper. Division Bench High Court erred in ordering reinstatement and restoration of the order of Labour Court. HELD An act of theft committed by an employee while on duty is a serious charge. This charge once proved in enquiry the employer is justified in dismissing the employee from service. Para 29 Dismissal orders had not been passed on the basis of employees conviction by the criminal Court which later stood set aside by the superior Court. Had it been so then the situation would have been different because once the conviction order is set aside by the superior Court the dismissal order which was solely based on passing of the conviction order also stands set aside. Such was not the case here. Para 31 In the case on hand the appellant employer had conducted the departmental enquiry in accordance with law independently of the criminal case wherein the Enquiry Officer on the basis of the appreciation of evidence brought on record in the enquiry proceedings came to a conclusion that a charge of theft against the delinquent employees was proved. This finding was based on preponderance of probabilities and could be recorded by the Enquiry Officer notwithstanding the order of criminal Court acquitting the respondents. Para 32 CASES REFERRED 1. Divisional Controller Karnataka State Road Transport Corporation v. M.G. Vittal Rao JT 2011 13 SC 247 Para 21 2. Shankar Chakravarti v. Britannia Biscuits Co. Ltd. Anr. AIR 1979 SC 1652 Para 25 3. The Workmen of M s Firestone Tyre Rubber Co. of India Pvt. Ltd. v. The Management Ors. 1973 1 SCC 813 Para 18 ABHAY MANOHAR SAPRE J. 1. These appeals are filed against the common final judgment and order dated 16.04.2007 passed by the High Court of Judicature at Madras in Writ Appeal Nos.3789 of 2003 and 3790 of 2003 whereby the High Court allowed the appeals filed by the respondents and directed the appellant to reinstate the respondents with continuity of service and other attendant benefits but without payment of back wages. 2. In order to appreciate the issues involved in these two appeals it is necessary to set out the facts in detail. 3. The appellant in both the appeals is a Public Sector undertaking known as Bharat Heavy Electricals Ltd. BHEL . It has a plant at Ranipet in District Vellore Tamil Nadu. M. Mani Respondent in Civil Appeal No.10766 2013 and T.A. Mathivanan since dead and represented by his legal representatives respondent in connected Civil Appeal No.10767 2013 were the employees of BHEL at all relevant time and were working as Driver Grade II in the plant. 4. On 17.02.1991 both the respondents were on duty in the night shift in the Plant. They were supposed to remain present all the time in the Transport Department of the Plant so that on receiving the call they would attend the place of call with their respective vehicles. 5. It was however noticed by the officials concerned on duty that both the respondents were not found present on their respective seats and instead were found driving one forklift FLV in another shop floor. It was also noticed that they both had unauthorizedly removed one heavy machine called Face Milling Cutter of 500 diameter from one shop floor and kept it on forklift and loaded in company s ambulance which was being driven by T.A. Mathivanan. Both of them then managed to take the said machine in ambulance outside factory premises through South gate. 6. The officials who witnessed the incident reported the incident to the appellant Management . The appellant took up the matter with seriousness and issued charge sheet to both the respondents. They were asked to submit their explanation. Both denied the charges. The appellant therefore appointed Enquiry Officer for holding regular departmental enquiry. Both the respondents participated in the enquiry proceedings. The Enquiry Officer recorded the evidence of the witnesses and submitted his report. The Enquiry Officer on evaluation of the evidence held the charges as proved against both the respondents. He held that both the respondents were involved in committing theft of Face Milling cutter and were caught in the factory premises while on duty. The appellant accepted the report and dismissed the respondents from service on 31.08.1991. Against their dismissal order the respondents filed departmental appeals. The appeals were dismissed. 7. This event gave rise to filing of two cases. One was by the State in the Court of Magistrate seeking prosecution of the respondents under Section 379 of the Indian Penal Code 1860 in short IPC and the other was by the respondents against the appellant employer in Labour Court challenging legality of their dismissal orders ID Nos. 801 and 839 of 1993 . So far as the criminal case was concerned the Magistrate by his order dated 24.11.1992 acquitted the respondents from the charge. 8. As regards the cases before the Labour Court out of which these two appeals arise the Labour Court framed three issues first whether the enquiry conducted by the Enquiry Officer was legal and proper second whether the findings of the Enquiry Officer holding the charge as proved against the respondents are correct and third whether these two employees are entitled to claim the relief of reinstatement with back wages 9. By Award dated 06.08.2001 Annexure P 9 the Labour Court answered the reference in favour of the employees by recording the following findings Hence it can not be said that there has been denial of reasonable opportunity during the enquiry. 9.1. and then in Para 7 it was held that it can not be considered that the departmental enquiry has not been held properly. 9.2. and then in Para 8 it was held that till the disposal of the criminal case the Management ought to have stayed the departmental enquiry and they should have passed the order only after the conclusion of the criminal proceedings. 9.3. and in the same Para 8 it was held that Therefore the object of this provision is that till proceedings of criminal court the departmental enquiry should not be initiated. Therefore the respondent ought not to have appointed enquiry officer to conduct the enquiry in respect of same charge which has been pending before the Criminal Court. Such an enquiry held is contrary to principles of natural justice. On this ground I hold that departmental enquiry is held not in accordance with principle of natural justice 9.4. and in last line of Para 8 it was held that it is for this reason the removal of the employee from service is not justified. 9.5. The Labour Court then lastly in para 9 held that Having held that the departmental enquiry has not been conducted according to principle of natural justice it has to be decided whether the finding of the Enquiry Officer that the charge against the petitioner is correct. When the criminal case has been pending the finding of the Enquiry Officer that the petitioner is guilty of the charge is not correct. Further the petitioner has been acquired by the criminal court. Hence when in the criminal proceedings the petitioner has been found not guilty I hold that the findings of the Enquiry Officer that the charge against the petitioner had been proved is not correct. 10. To sum up the Labour Court held that firstly the departmental enquiry was properly held secondly the employer instead of holding an enquiry should have stayed it awaiting the outcome of the criminal case thirdly since the criminal case resulted in the acquittal of the respondents the departmental enquiry stood vitiated as violating the principle of natural justice fourthly since the employer did not lead any evidence in support of the charge the charge remained unproved and lastly the dismissal orders are bad in law in the light of the four grounds and therefore the respondents be reinstated in service with payment of full back wages by the appellant. 11. The appellant felt aggrieved filed writ petitions in the High Court. The Single Judge by order dated 31.07.2003 Annexure P 11 allowed the writ petitions set aside the award of the Labour Court and remanded the case to the Labour Court for deciding both the matters afresh. The Single Judge held that when the Labour Court held the departmental enquiry to be legal and proper then the only question that remained for the Labour Court to decide was as to whether the punishment imposed on two employees i.e. dismissal was just legal and proper or it required any interference in its quantum and if so to what extent. Having observed this the writ Court remanded the cases to Labour Court to decide the cases afresh on merits. This is what the learned Single Judge in concluding para held 10. Keeping in view of all these aspects I think interest of justice would be served by quashing the awards in both the cases and directing both the matters are to be considered afresh by the Labour Court. It goes without saying that both the matters should be taken up for hearing together and shall be disposed of. Since the matter is pretty old the Industrial Disputes are to be decided as expeditiously as possible preferably within a period of six months from the date of receipt of a copy of this order. 12. Felt aggrieved the respondents filed intra court appeals in the High Court before the Division Bench. By impugned judgment the Division Bench allowed the appeals set aside the order of writ Court and directed reinstatement of the respondents by restoring the order of the Labour Court to this extent but declined to award to them any back wages except continuity of service and other attendant benefits to the respondents. 13. Felt aggrieved by the judgment of the Division Bench the appellant employer has filed these appeals by way of special leave before this Court. 14. Heard Mr. P.S. Patwalia learned senior counsel for the appellant and Mr. M.A. Chinnasamy and Mr. M.K. Perwez learned counsel for the respondents. 15. Having heard learned counsel for the parties and on perusal of the record of the case we are constrained to allow the appeals set aside the impugned judgment and uphold the dismissal order of the respondents as legal and proper. 16. To begin with when we examine the legality and the correctness of the Awards of the Labour Court we are of the considered opinion that the Labour Court having held and indeed rightly that the departmental enquiry conducted by the appellant was legal and proper committed an error in holding that the departmental enquiry got vitiated due to criminal court s order which had acquitted the respondents from the charge of theft. In our opinion there was no occasion for the Labour Court to examine this issue once the departmental enquiry was held legal and proper. The Labour Court in our opinion committed yet another error in holding that since the appellant failed to lead any evidence to prove the charge in Labour Court therefore the dismissal orders of respondents are liable to be set aside. This finding in our opinion was again not legally sustainable. 17. In our opinion once the Labour Court upheld the departmental enquiry as being legal and proper then the only question that survived for consideration before the Labour Court was whether the punishment of dismissal imposed by the appellant to the respondents was legal and proper or it requires any interference in its quantum. 18. In other words the Labour Court should have then confined its enquiry to examine only one limited question as to whether the punishment given to the respondents was in any way disproportionate to the gravity of the charge leveled against them and this the Labour Court should have examined by taking recourse to the provisions of Section 11 A of the Industrial Dispute Act 1947 in short the Act and the law laid down by this Court in the case of The Workmen of M s Firestone Tyre Rubber Co. of India Pvt. Ltd. v. The Management Ors. 1973 1 SCC 813 . It was however not done thereby rendering the order of Labour Court legally unsustainable. 19. Similarly in our considered view the Labour Court failed to see that the criminal proceedings and departmental proceedings are two separate proceedings in law. One is initiated by the State against the delinquent employees in criminal Court and other i.e. departmental enquiry which is initiated by the employer under the Labour Service Laws Rules against the delinquent employees. 20. The Labour Court should have seen that the dismissal order of the respondents was not based on the criminal Court s judgment and it could not be so for the reason that it was a case of acquittal. It was however based on domestic enquiry which the employer had every right to conduct independently of the criminal case. 21. This Court has consistently held that in a case where the enquiry has been held independently of the criminal proceedings acquittal in criminal Court is of no avail. It is held that even if a person stood acquitted by the criminal Court domestic enquiry can still be held the reason being that the standard of proof required in a domestic enquiry and that in criminal case are altogether different. In a criminal case standard of proof required is beyond reasonable doubt while in a domestic enquiry it is the preponderance of probabilities. See Divisional Controller Karnataka State Road Transport Corporation v. M.G. Vittal Rao JT 2011 13 SC 247 . 22. In the light of this settled legal position the Labour Court was not right in holding that the departmental enquiry should have been stayed by the appellant awaiting the decision of the criminal Court and that it is rendered illegal consequent upon passing of the acquittal order by the criminal Court. This finding of the Labour Court is therefore also not legally sustainable. 23. Now coming to the order of writ Court Single Judge though in our opinion the Single Judge rightly held the departmental enquiry as being legal and proper but committed an error in remanding the case to the Labour Court without precisely saying as to what the Labour Court has to decide after remand and why writ Court cannot decide such issues in the writ petition. We find that the Single Judge in concluded para of the order remanded the whole case afresh for its decision on merits. 24. In our considered view the Single Judge Writ Court having held the enquiry to be legal and proper instead of remanding the case to the Labour Court should have himself examined the short question which had survived for consideration in the writ petition namely whether the punishment of dismissal was commensurate with the charges or it required any interference by the Court under Section 11 A of the Act. 25. In other words the remand to the Labour Court in this case by the Single Judge was not called for. It would have become necessary if the Single Judge had come to a conclusion that the departmental enquiry is illegal. In such situation the question would have arisen as to whether the employer should now be given an opportunity to prove the charge before the Labour Court on merits by adducing evidence provided such opportunity had been asked for in any form by the employer See Shankar Chakravarti v. Britannia Biscuits Co. Ltd. Anr. AIR 1979 SC 1652 . 26. However this occasion did not arise because as observed supra the enquiry was held legal and proper by the Labour Court and Single Judge. 27. Now coming to the legality of the impugned judgment in our considered opinion there was absolutely no justification on the part of the Division Bench to have allowed the appeals of the respondents and restored the order of the Labour Court by setting aside the dismissal order. The Division Bench in our view did not take note of correct legal position which we have discussed above. 28. In our opinion this is a clear case where the departmental enquiry was held legal and proper. We also on going through the record of the case hold that the departmental enquiry was properly held and was therefore legal and proper. So far as the quantum of punishment imposed on the respondents is concerned having regard to the nature of charge which stood proved in the enquiry in our view the order of dismissal from service was the appropriate punishment. It was commensurate with the charge. 29. An act of theft committed by an employee while on duty is a serious charge. This charge once proved in enquiry the employer is justified in dismissing the employee from service. 30. We are not impressed by the submission urged by the learned counsel for the respondents employees when he urged that once the respondents employees were acquitted from the charge of theft by the criminal Court the dismissal orders deserve to be set aside entitling the employees to seek reinstatement in service. Learned counsel read the entire criminal Court s order to show that it was an honorable acquittal of the employees from the charge of theft. 31. The answer to the aforementioned submission lies in the law laid down by this Court in the case of Karnataka SRTC supra . At the cost of repetition we may say that in the case on hand the dismissal orders had not been passed on the basis of employees conviction by the criminal Court which later stood set aside by the superior Court. Had it been so then the situation would have been different because once the conviction order is set aside by the superior Court the dismissal order which was solely based on passing of the conviction order also stands set aside. Such was not the case here. 32. In the case on hand the appellant employer had conducted the departmental enquiry in accordance with law independently of the criminal case wherein the Enquiry Officer on the basis of the appreciation of evidence brought on record in the enquiry proceedings came to a conclusion that a charge of theft against the delinquent employees was proved. This finding was based on preponderance of probabilities and could be recorded by the Enquiry Officer notwithstanding the order of criminal Court acquitting the respondents. 33. In view of the foregoing discussion the appeals succeed and are allowed. Impugned judgment is set aside. As a consequence thereof the dismissal orders of the respondents herein are held legal and proper and accordingly upheld. 0 CROSS CITATION 2006 AIR SC 1214 2006 2 SCC 373 APPEARANCES Mrs. D. Bharathi Reddy Advocate for the Appellants. Mrs. K. Amareswari Senior Advocate Mr. B. Ramana Murthy and Mrs. Anjani Aiyagari Advocates with for the Respondent. HEADNOTE SERVICE AND LABOUR LAWS Government service Termination of service for misconduct Judicial review of administrative decisions Scope Respondent a Police Head Constable charged with the theft of lens of closed circuit TV while on security duty during the visit of US President After Departmental Enquiry services of delinquent dispensed with by the Disciplinary Authority since the charges stood proved by evidence of witnesses Delinquent given adequate opportunity of being heard in the said proceedings Appellate Authority as well as Administrative Tribunal upholding the dismissal On a writ High Court on reappreciation of the evidence upsetting the findings and directing the reinstatement of the respondent Validity. Allowing the appeal held that the Enquiry Officer having held on the basis of evidence that the charge of theft stood proved against the respondent and the said finding having been upheld by the Appellate Authority and the Tribunal the High Court erred in reappreciating the evidence and upsetting the factual findings. High Court while exercising the power of judicial review does not act as Appellate Court and judicial review is not akin to adjudication on merits by reappreciating the evidence as an Appellate Authority. Considering the gravity of the misconduct the punishment of dismissal was not disproportionate. Writ filed by the respondent therefore dismissed. HELD From the finding recorded by the High Court it clearly appears that the High Court re appreciated the evidence as an Appellate Authority. Apart from reappreciating the evidence which is not permissible in law the High Court also fell in grave error by directing the government pleader and the learned counsel for the respondent herein to again view the cassettes. It is on record that the Inquiry Officer relied on the video cassettes displayed during the Inquiry as part of additional evidence. The finding has been clearly recorded by the Inquiry Officer on the basis of the evidence adduced by PWs. 1 2 3 and 4 during the Inquiry. Para 6 By now it is a well established principle of law that the High Court exercising power of judicial review under Article 226 of the Constitution does not act as an Appellate Authority. Its jurisdiction is circumscribed and confined to correct errors of law or procedural error if any resulting in manifest miscarriage of justice or violation of principles of natural justice. Judicial review is not akin to adjudication on merit by reappreciating the evidence as an Appellate Authority. Para 7 The gravity of the offence must necessarily be measured with the nature of the offence. The respondent was a member of the Discipline Force holding the rank of head constable. The duty assigned to him was a bandobast duty during the visit of the then President Bill Clinton who ran a security risk of the highest grade. His misconduct could have led to serious security lapse resulting into fatal consequences. But because of timely detection of the electrician PW4 the lens was recovered and immediately restored. We entirely agree with the inquiry officer that the charges are serious in nature being committed by a member of Disciplinary Force who deserved stringent punishment. To instill the confidence of the public in the establishment the only appropriate punishment in such cases is dismissal from service which has been correctly awarded. Para 11 In the premises aforestated we are clearly of the view that the High Court has committed patent error of law which has resulted in miscarriage of justice. The order of the High Court is accordingly quashed. The appeal is allowed. Consequently the writ petition filed by the respondent stands dismissed. Para 13 CASES REFERRED 1.B.C. Chaturvedi v. Union of India Ors. JT 1995 8 SC 65 Para 9 2.Union of India v. Parma Nanda JT 1989 2 SC 132 Para 8 H.K. SEMA J. 1. This appeal preferred by the State of Andhra Pradesh is directed against the judgment and order of the Division Bench of the High Court of Andhra Pradesh dated 9.12.2003 in writ petition no. 14146 of 2003 quashing the order of dismissal dated 21.9.2000 of the respondent herein and the order of the appellate authority dated 20.10.2001 confirming the order of dismissal. The Division Bench of the High Court directed that the respondent herein be reinstated into service forthwith with all back wages and all attendant benefits which he could have received had he not been dismissed from service. The High Court further directed that the respondent be reinstated into service within a period of four weeks from the date of receipt of the order. This Court on 16.7.2004 while issuing notice granted interim stay of the impugned order. Further on 18.7.2005 on the submission of the learned counsel for the respondent that the respondent has been reinstated pursuant to the High Court order but the back wages have not been paid this Court stayed the payment of back wages directed by the High Court. 2. Briefly stated the facts are as follows 2.1 The respondent Mohd. Nasrullah Khan was working as head constable at Shamshabad Police Station of Ranga Reddy District. Mr. Bill Clinton the then President of the United States of America was to visit the Hi Tech City in Hyderabad and the respondent was assigned the bandobast duty at the office of the Oracle Software India Limited on the 4th Floor of Hi Tech City Madhapur Hyderabad. It is alleged that during the bandobast duty the respondent removed the CCTV Lens No. VAT 660 DSC 56894 of Watal company from ceiling of the said office and concealed the same. It is further alleged that the said removal of the lens was observed in the close circuit TV by one G. Sridhar the electrician PW4 and he immediately went to the respondent and asked him about the removal but the respondent denied the same. The electrician thereafter informed the same to the Security Supervisor and on enquiry by him though the respondent denied of having removed the lens at the first instance later handed over the same stating that the same was lying at the toilet. 2.2 A disciplinary inquiry was initiated against the respondent by the Superintendent of Police A.R. Ranga Reddy District by appointing Deputy Superintendent of Police DSP by its order dated 19.4.2000. The substance of imputations of misconduct and misbehaviour against the respondent are as follows Shri Mohd. Nasrullah Khan High Court 380 of P.S. Shamshabad u s exhibited grave misconduct in committing theft of the C.C.T.V. lens costing about Rs.15 000 from the office of Oracle India Limited Hi Tech City Madhapur on 24.3.2000 while on bandobast duty for personal gain. 2.3 In course of the inquiry the Inquiry Officer examined as many as four witnesses and after conducting detailed inquiry by affording adequate opportunity to the respondent submitted its report dated 18.8.200 holding that the charge against the respondent of theft of C.C.T.V. lens has been proved beyond all reasonable doubt. The Inquiry Officer in its report also observed as under The charges are serious in nature. The delinquent being the member of the disciplined force and being a protector of public property ought not to have attempted to commit such a delinquency. I therefore propose that the delinquent may be awarded with a stringent punishment to meet the ends of justice. 2.4 After receipt of the Inquiry Report a show cause notice was issued to the respondent herein by the Disciplinary Authority and after considering the reply to the show cause notice the Disciplinary Authority dismissed the respondent from service with immediate effect by an order dated 21.9.2000. It was further directed that the period of suspension from 30.3.2000 till the date of dismissal be treated as not on duty . Aggrieved thereby the respondent preferred an appeal before the Deputy Inspector General of Police which was dismissed on 11.5.2001. Thereafter the respondent filed O.A.No. 3700 of 2001 before the Andhra Pradesh Administrative Tribunal. The Administrative Tribunal by its order dated 1.8.2001 remanded the matter to the Appellate Authority for reconsideration of the matter. The Appellate Authority after reconsidering the representation rejected the appeal again and confirmed the order of dismissal by its order dated 20.10.2001. Being aggrieved the respondent again filed O.A. No. 8066 of 2001 before the Tribunal contending inter alia that the theft as alleged was not proved and the Appellate Authority did not properly consider the submissions of the respondent and that the Appellate Authority dismissed the appeal without application of mind. The appellant herein filed a detailed counter repudiating the allegations made in the O.A. It is stated that the order of dismissal was passed in accordance with the rules and regulations and there was no denial of principles of natural justice to the respondent nor was there any allegations of violations of rules and regulations or procedures. It was also contended that the guilt of the respondent has been proved beyond all reasonable doubt. After considering the petition and the counter the Andhra Pradesh Appellate Tribunal by its order dated 4.4.03 dismissed the O.A. confirming the order of dismissal. Aggrieved thereby the respondent preferred writ petition no. 14146 of 2003 before the High Court which was allowed by the impugned order as stated earlier. Hence the present appeal by special leave. 3. It is contended by the learned counsel for the appellant that the finding recorded by the Inquiry Officer is a finding of fact and the High Court cannot act as an appellate authority. Its jurisdiction is circumscribed and confined to correct errors of law or procedural law if any or violation of principles of natural justice. It is further contended that the High Court fell in grave error of law by reappreciating the evidence recorded by the Inquiry Officer like an appellate authority in the instant case. 4. Per contra learned counsel for the respondent contended that the alleged theft of lens or removal of lens by the respondent is not proved and therefore the finding of the Inquiry Officer is perverse and the order of dismissal on the basis of the finding recorded by the Inquiry Officer is vitiated. At this stage we may point out that there is no allegation of violation of principles of natural justice or that the inquiry was conducted without following the procedures or rules and regulations. The only case put up before us by the respondent is that the theft or removal of lens by the respondent is not proved in the course of Inquiry. This contention need not detain us any longer because going through the report of the Inquiry the Inquiry Officer after examining PWs. 1 2 3 and 4 and after affording adequate opportunity to the respondent has come to the conclusion that the charge levelled against the respondent stands proved. 5. The High Court while upsetting the order of the Tribunal dated 4.4.03 passed in O.A. No. 8066 01 and order of dismissal dated 21.1.2000 confirmed by the Appellate Authority dated 20.10.2001 recorded its finding in paragraph 5 of its judgment as under There is no dispute that the petitioner was posted on bandobast duty on the relevant date and the entire premises was under close circuit T.V. System. The question is whether the petitioner has committed the theft of camera lens. There is no direct evidence on this aspect. It is only on presumption that when once the camera was not relaying the pictures the officials of Oracle company came to that place where the camera was positioned and found that the lens was not available with the camera. Even the witnesses examined on this aspect namely the employees of Oracle company did not state that the petitioner had committed theft of the lens and further it is on record that the electrician himself traced out the camera lens which was lying outside toilet room and the entire premises was carpeted. No other independent officer has been examined to establish that the petitioner had committed theft. However we see from the report of the Enquiry Officer that he got the cassette displayed and noticed the movements of the petitioner sitting on chair getting up and coming towards the camera and touching the lens of camera hand is clearly visible between 13 58 and 13 59 hours on 24.3.2000. But this is not the function of the Enquiry Officer. It must be established by the independent evidence. When we directed the learned government pleader and the learned counsel for the petitioner to again view the cassette they stated that the visibility is beyond recognition. In such circumstances it has to be held that the findings of the Enquiry Officer appears to be based on mere surmises and conjectures and it is finding based on no evidence. In such situation the Tribunal ought to have held that the enquiry is vitiated for lack of acceptable and permissible evidence on this aspect. It is also on record that the lens was not recovered from the person of the petitioner and admittedly the petitioner was on guard duty in the premises where the cameras were positioned. In such a situation it cannot be said that simply because the lens of one camera is missing the petitioner committed theft of it. If really the police had conducted investigation they could have sent the lens to the Forensic expert with reference to the fingerprints and that could have made the matters clear. But for the reasons best known to the police they did not take such action and tried to find fault with the police constable fastening the charge of theft. Under these circumstances we are of the considered view that the Tribunal failed to take into consideration this aspect and held that the Enquiry was conducted properly and finding was validly recorded. 6. From the finding recorded by the High Court it clearly appears that the High Court re appreciated the evidence as an Appellate Authority. Apart from reappreciating the evidence which is not permissible in law the High Court also fell in grave error by directing the government pleader and the learned counsel for the respondent herein to again view the cassettes. It is on record that the Inquiry Officer relied on the video cassettes displayed during the Inquiry as part of additional evidence. The finding has been clearly recorded by the Inquiry Officer on the basis of the evidence adduced by PWs. 1 2 3 and 4 during the Inquiry. 7. By now it is a well established principle of law that the High Court exercising power of judicial review under Article 226 of the Constitution does not act as an Appellate Authority. Its jurisdiction is circumscribed and confined to correct errors of law or procedural error if any resulting in manifest miscarriage of justice or violation of principles of natural justice. Judicial review is not akin to adjudication on merit by reappreciating the evidence as an Appellate Authority. 8. We may now notice a few decisions of this Court on this aspect avoiding multiplicity. In Union of India v. Parma Nanda1 K. Jagannatha Shetty J. speaking for the Bench observed as under We must unequivocally state that the jurisdiction of the Tribunal to interfere with the disciplinary matters or punishment cannot be equated with an appellate jurisdiction. The Tribunal cannot interfere with the findings of the Inquiry Officer or competent authority where they are not arbitrary or utterly perverse. It is appropriate to remember that the power to impose penalty on a delinquent officer is conferred on the competent authority either by an Act of legislature or rules made under the proviso to Article 309 of the Constitution. If there has been an enquiry consistent with the rules and in accordance with principles of natural justice what punishment would meet the ends of justice is a matter exclusively within the jurisdiction of the competent authority. If the penalty can lawfully be imposed and is imposed on the proved misconduct the Tribunal has no power to substitute its own discretion for that of the authority. The adequacy of penalty unless it is mala fide is certainly not a matter for the Tribunal to concern itself with. The Tribunal also cannot interfere with the penalty if the conclusion of the Inquiry Officer or the competent authority is based on evidence even if some of it is found to be irrelevant or extraneous to the matter. 9. Again the same principle has been reiterated by this Court in B.C. Chaturvedi v. Union of India Ors.2. K. Ramaswamy J. speaking for the Court under Judicial review is not an appeal from a decision but a review of the manner in which the decision is made. Power of judicial review is meant to ensure that the individual receives fair treatment and not to ensure that the conclusion which the authority reaches is necessarily correct in the eye of the court. When an inquiry is conducted on charges of misconduct by a public servant the court tribunal is concerned to determine whether the inquiry was held by a competent officer or whether rules of natural justice are complied with. Whether the findings or conclusions are based on some evidence the authority entrusted with the power to hold inquiry has jurisdiction power and authority to reach a finding of fact or conclusion. But that finding must be based on some evidence. Neither the technical rules of Evidence Act nor of proof of fact or evidence as defined therein apply to disciplinary proceeding. When the authority accepts that evidence and conclusion receives support therefrom the disciplinary authority is entitled to hold that the delinquent officer is guilty of the charge. The court tribunal in its power of judicial review does not act as appellate authority to appreciate the evidence and to arrive at its own independent findings on the evidence. The court tribunal may interfere where the authority held the proceedings against the delinquent officer in a manner inconsistent with the rules of natural justice or in violation of statutory rules prescribing the mode of inquiry or where the conclusion or finding reached by the disciplinary authority is based on no evidence. If the conclusion or finding be such as no reasonable person would have ever reached the court tribunal may interfere with the conclusion or the finding and mould the relief so as to make it appropriate to the facts of each case. 10. As already said in the present case there is no allegation of violation of principles of natural justice or the inquiry being held inconsistent with the mode of procedure prescribed by the rules or regulations. 11. This takes us to the last submission of the counsel for the respondent. Learned counsel for the respondent contended that the offence said to have been committed being minor in nature and no loss being caused to the owner of the property inasmuch as the same had been recovered on the spot lenient punishment may be awarded in place of dismissal from service. We are unable to countenance this submission. The gravity of the offence must necessarily be measured with the nature of the offence. The respondent was a member of the Discipline Force holding the rank of head constable. The duty assigned to him was a bandobast duty during the visit of the then President Bill Clinton who ran a security risk of the highest grade. His misconduct could have led to serious security lapse resulting into fatal consequences. But because of timely detection of the electrician PW4 the lens was recovered and immediately restored. We entirely agree with the Inquiry Officer that the charges are serious in nature being committed by a member of Disciplinary Force who deserved stringent punishment. To instill the confidence of the public in the establishment the only appropriate punishment in such cases is dismissal from service which has been correctly awarded. 12. It is stated that the respondent was reinstated on 19.6.04 pursuant to the order passed by the High Court and has been working since then and pay and allowances have been paid from 19.6.04. Since he has been paid for the period he has worked the salary and allowances already paid to him shall not be disturbed. The respondent however shall not get his back wags. 13. In the premises aforestated we are clearly of the view that the High Court has committed patent error of law which has resulted in miscarriage of justice. The order of the High Court is accordingly quashed. The appeal is allowed. Consequently the writ petition filed by the respondent stands dismissed. Parties are asked to bear their own costs. 0 HEADNOTE CRIMINAL LAWS Indian Penal Code 1860 Sections 390 392 Evidence Act 1872 Section 3 Robbery When can be said to have been committed Principles stated. HELD The provision defines robbery which is theft or extortion when caused with violence of death hurt or wrongful restraint. When there is no theft committed then as a natural corollary there cannot be robbery. Robbery is only an aggravated form of offence of theft or extortion. Aggravation is in the use of violence of death hurt or restraint. Violence must be in course of theft and not subsequently. It is not necessary that violence actually should be committed but even attempt to commit it is enough. Para 8 The words for that end in Section 390 clearly mean that the hurt caused must be with the object of facilitating the committing of the theft or must be caused while the offender is committing theft or is carrying away or is attempting to carry away property obtained by the theft. Para 10 Sections 390 392 395 Evidence Act 1872 Section 3 Robbery PWs going on scooter at 9 p.m. Gold chain thali ear drops scooter and cash snatched by threatening with knife Next day arrested Stolen goods recovered and identified by victims No dispute that place was highway. Held that offence was established. Conviction and sentence of 10 years RI and fine of Rs. 5000 upheld. Paras 3 12 CASES REFERRED 1.State of Karnataka v. Puttaraja JT 2003 9 SC 603 Para 13 DR. ARIJIT PASAYAT J. 1. Leave granted. 2. Challenge in this appeal is to the order of a learned Single Judge of the Karnataka High Court holding the appellants guilty of offence punishable under Section 392 of the Indian Penal Code 1860 in short the IPC and sentencing each of 10 years imprisonment. 3. Prosecution version in a nutshell is as follows 3.1. On 24.6.2001 at 9.00 p.m. on Mulbagal Punganoor road PWs 2 and 3 were going on a Bajaj Scooter. When they were near Kirumani Mitta of Buddadoru village accused persons 2 to 5 intercepted PWs 2 and 3 and robbed the gold chain golden ear drops thali and cash of Rs.400 by threatening with knife. The accused tied the legs and hands of PW 2 and PW 3 and threatened them not to escape and get out from the place for about ten minutes after their departure. The victims went to Punganoor Police Station and later on lodged First Information Report with Nangali Police Kolar Dist. on 25.6.2001. The Traffic Police while checking found A 2 A 3 and A 4 were going on the scooter M.O.6 they had robbed from PW 2 the deadly weapons like knives pistol iron rod etc. were hidden in the scooter. On interrogation the accused persons admitted the commission of offence in question. A 5 and A 8 were arrested on the information given by A 2 to A 4. At the instance of A 2 the gold jewellery M.Os.2 and 3 are recovered from PW 6 Pawn broker. The Bajaj Scooter M.O.6 was seized from A 2 A 3 and A 4. PW 13 with whom the ear studs and the chain were pledged by A 2 testified to the said fact. PWs 2 and 3 identified A 2 to A 5 as the persons who robbed them. Prosecution claimed that the identification of accused persons by PWs 2 and 3 coupled with the recovery of jewellery at the instance of A 2 and seizure of scooter from A 2 A 3 and A 4 clinchingly established the guilt of A 2 to A 5. 3.2. The investigating agency submitted charge sheet for alleged commission of offence punishable under Section 395 of IPC. The case was split up against A 1 A 6 and A 7 as they were absconding. 3.3. Learned Additional Sessions Judge Kolar referred to the evidence of PWs 1 and 2 the recovery of the scooter the recovery of stolen articles and identification thereon to conclude that accused persons are guilty and accordingly A 2 to A 5 were convicted for offence punishable under Section 395 IPC. Accused 7 and 8 were acquitted as the evidence was not sufficient to find them guilty. Considering the gravity of the offence custodial sentence of 10 years imprisonment and a fine of Rs.5 000 each was imposed. In appeal the High Court found that the offence committed was covered under Section 392 IPC but considering the gravity of the offence upheld the sentence. 4. In support of the appeal learned counsel for the appellants submitted that the evidence of PWs 2 and 3 does not show that any knife was used for robbery. On the contrary evidence of victim clearly shows that she raised hue and cry when accused persons tried to snatch the stolen articles from her. It was also submitted that the appellants have suffered custody of more than nearly 8 years and the sentence deserves to be reduced to the period already undergone. 5. Learned counsel for the respondent State on the other hand submitted that there is no minimum sentence prescribed and the maximum sentence is 10 years. It is submitted that the robbery was committed on the highway at about 9.00 p.m. That being so the sentence can be upto 14 years. Considering the gravity of the offence and the large scale highway robberies no leniency should be shown. 6. Section 392 IPC provides for punishment for robbery. The essential ingredients are as follows 1.Accused committed theft 2.Accused voluntarily caused or attempted to cause. i death hurt or wrongful restraint. ii Fear of instant death hurt or wrongful restraint. 3.He did either act for the end. i to commit theft. ii While committing theft. iii In carrying away or in the attempt to carry away property obtained by theft. 7. It is to be noted that the Section 392 provides punishment for robbery. It is punishment for the offence defined in Section 390. Punishment is higher if it is committed on a highway and between sunset and sunrise. Section 390 which defines robbery reads as follows 390. Robbery. In all robbery there is either theft or extortion. When theft is robbery. Theft is robbery if in order to the committing of the theft or in committing the theft or in carrying away or attempting to carry away property obtained by theft the offender for the end voluntarily causes or attempts to cause to any person death or hurt wrongful restraint or fear of instant death or of instant hurt or of instant wrongful restraint. When extortion is robbery. Extortion is robbery if the offender at the time of committing the extortion is in the presence of the person put in fear and commits the extortion by putting that person in fear of instant death of instant hurt or of instant wrongful restraint to that person or to some other person and by so putting in fear induces the person so put in fear then and there to deliver up the thing extorted. Explanation. The offender is said to be present if he is sufficiently near put the other person in fear of instant death of instant hurt or of instant wrongful restraint. 8. The provision defines robbery which is theft or extortion when caused with violence of death hurt or wrongful restraint. When there is no theft committed then as a natural corollary there cannot be robbery. Robbery is only an aggravated form of offence of theft or extortion. Aggravation is in the use of violence of death hurt or restraint. Violence must be in course of theft and not subsequently. It is not necessary that violence actually should be committed but even attempt to commit it is enough. 9. The authors of the Code observed as follows In one single class of cases theft and extortion are in practice confounded together so inextricably that no judge however sagacious could discriminate between them. This class of cases therefore has in all systems of jurisprudence ... been treated as a perfectly distinct class ... we have therefore made robbery a separate crime. There can be no case of robbery which does not fall within the definition either of theft or of extortion but in a practice it will perpetually be a matter of doubt whether a particular act of robbery was a theft or an extortion. A large proportion of robberies will be half theft half extortion. A seizes Z threatens to murder him unless he delivers all his property and begins to pull off Z s ornaments. Z in terror begs that A will take all he has and spare his life assists in taking off his ornaments and delivers them to A. Here such ornaments as A took without Z s consent are taken by theft. Those which Z delivered up from fear of death are acquired by extortion. It is by no means improbable that Z s right arm bracelet may have been obtained by theft and left arm bracelet by extortion that the rupees in Z s girdle may have been obtained by theft and those in his turban by extortion. Probably in nine tenths of the robberies which are committed something like this actually takes place and it is probable that a few minutes later neither the robber nor the person robbed would be able to recollect in what proportions theft and extortion were mixed in the crime nor is it at all necessary for the ends of justice that this should be ascertained. For though in general the consent of a sufferer is a circumstance which very materially modifies the character of the offence and which ought therefore to be made known to the Courts yet the consent which a person gives to the taking of this property by a ruffian who holds a pistol to his breast is a circumstance altogether immaterial . 10. The words for that end in Section 390 clearly mean that the hurt caused must be with the object of facilitating the committing of the theft or must be caused while the offender is committing theft or is carrying away or is attempting to carry away property obtained by the theft. 11. As the provision itself provides when the highway robbery is committed deterrent punishment is called for. 12. In the instant case the evidence of the victim her husband the factum of recovery of the vehicle used has clearly established the commission of offence by the appellants. The offence was committed on a public road. There is no dispute that it was not a highway. It is also not in dispute that the offence was committed during sunset and sunrise that is at about 9.00 p.m. 13. In State of Karnataka v. Puttaraja JT 2003 9 SC 603 2004 1 SCC 475 it was inter alia observed as follows Imposition of sentence without considering its effect on the social order in many cases may be in reality a futile exercise. The social impact of the crime e.g. where it relates to offences against women like the case at hand dacoity kidnapping misappropriation of public money treason and other offences involving moral turpitude or moral delinquency which have great impact and serious repercussions on social order and public interest cannot be lost sight of and per se require exemplary treatment. Any liberal attitude by imposing meager sentences or taking too sympathetic a view merely on account of lapse of time or considerations personal to the accused only in respect of such offences will be resultwise counterproductive in the long run and against societal interest which needs to be cared for and strengthened by the required string of deterrence inbuilt in the sentencing system. 14. Above being the position there is no merit in this appeal which is accordingly dismissed. 0 CROSS CITATION 1990 AIR SC 882 1990 2 SCC 659 1990 2 SCR 733 APPEARANCES Mr. K.S. Bindra Senior Advocate Mr. R.K. Maheshwari and Mr. G.S. Gujananip Advocates with him for the appellant. Mr. Prem Sunder Jha Advocate for the Respondent. HEADNOTE ELECTRICITY SUPPLY Disconnection of Service of notice on the consumer is a pre requisite for disconnection. HELD ... the service of notice is a prerequisite for disconnection and the appellant can not be allowed to go back upon its words and refuse the consumer the benefit of notice as contemplated by the agreement. The learned counsel for the appellant urged that the Delhi Electric Supply Undertaking will seriously suffer if this view is upheld. We do not understand as to what is the difficulty in the way of the appellant to serve a notice on the consumer before discontinuing the supply. It has to be appreciated that the licensee Undertaking is performing a public duty and is governed by a special statute and the law also contemplates service of a notice before disconnection of supply of electricity. The courts below have made it clear that they have not examined the case on merits. The question whether the allegations of theft are true or not has to be examined and decided in an appropriate proceeding and the appellant will not therefore be prejudiced by the present judgment in its claim. Para 4 CASES REFERRED 1. Jagarnath Singh v. B.S. Ramaswamy 1966 1 SCR 885 Distinguished. SHARMA J. 1. This appeal by special leave arises out of a suit filed by the respondent company against the appellant Municipal Corporation of Delhi for a mandatory injunction to restore the supply of electricity discontinued during the pendency of the suit. Initially the suit was filed for a prohibitory injunction from disconnecting the electric connection. The plaint was amended following stoppage of the supply of energy. 2. According to the plaintiff s case the suit had to be filed as the Delhi Electricity Supply Undertaking was threatening disconnection without disclosing any reason. Subsequently some officers of the Undertaking made an inspection of the meters and alleged theft of electricity after tampering with the seals affixed on the meters. A First Information Report was lodged with the police. 3. Admittedly no notice was served by the Delhi Electricity Supply Undertaking on the plaintiff before severing the electric connection. The learned trial court however dismissed the suit and the plaintiff appealed. The First Additional District Judge Delhi who heard the appeal decreed the suit on the sole ground of non service of notice as required under condition no. 36 in regard to supply of electricity by the appellant. The Delhi High Court dismissed the appellant s second appeal at the admission stage by a reasoned judgment. 4. The learned counsel for the appellant has contended that in view of the conduct of the plaintiff in stealing electricity the Court should in its discretion refuse to issue a direction for restoration of the electric supply. We are afraid it is not possible to agree with the appellant for more reasons than one. The plaintiff is seriously denying the allegation of theft and it is not possible to assume the accusation as correct without a full fledged trial on this issue. The case of Jagarnath Singh v. B.S. Ramaswamy 1966 1 SCR 885 relied upon on behalf of the appellant is clearly distinguishable inasmuch as the consumer in that case was convicted under the Indian Penal Code and the conviction was being maintained in appeal. Besides the service of notice is a prerequisite for disconnection and the appellant can not be allowed to go back upon its words and refuse the consumer the benefit of notice as contemplated by the agreement. The learned counsel for the appellant urged that the Delhi Electric Supply Undertaking will seriously suffer if this view is upheld. We do not understand as to what is the difficulty in the way of the appellant to serve a notice on the consumer before discontinuing the supply. It has to be appreciated that the licensee Undertaking is performing a public duty and is governed by a special statute and the law also contemplates service of a notice before disconnection of supply of electricity. The courts below have made it clear that they have not examined the case on merits. The question whether the allegations of theft are true or not has to be examined and decided in an appropriate proceeding and the appellant will not therefore be prejudiced by the present judgment in its claim. In the result the appeal is dismissed but without costs. 0 CONTRACTS INSURANCE CONSUMER DISPUTES General insurance Insurance of property Burglary and or housebreaking policy Theft If included in the risks Respondent taking out a policy against burglary and house breaking in respect of property which included the godowns used for storing food grains Theft of food grain bags from the godown Notice by the insured Respondent lodging FIR and subsequently raising a claim from the insurance company Company repudiating the claim on the ground that theft was not covered by the policy and there was no burglary Respondent raising a consumer dispute District Forum holding that burglary included theft and hence appellant insurer directed to settle the claim State Commission and National Commission too upholding the decision of the District Forum Validity. Whether burglary included theft Whether insurer liable for the loss arising from theft. Allowing the appeal of the insurer held that the terms of the contract have to be strictly read and natural meaning should be given and no outside help should be sought unless the meaning is ambiguous. When the term burglary has been defined in the policy then the cause should fall within the definition. The element of force and violence is a condition precedent for burglary or housebreaking and therefore in terms of the definition the theft should have preceded with force or violence and it is for the claimant to establish that theft or burglary took place precedent with force or violence and if it is not then the insurance company will be well within their right to repudiate the claim. Decision of the District Forum as upheld by the State and National Commissions held not sustainable. However the claim amount having been paid by the insurer on the point of equity said decision not disturbed. HELD The policy is a contract between the parties and both parties are bound by the terms of contract. As per the definition of the word burglary followed with violence makes it clear that if any theft is committed it should necessarily precede with violence i.e. entry into the premises for committing theft should involve force or violence or threat to insurer or to his employees or to the members of his family. Therefore the element of force and violence is a condition precedent for burglary and housebreaking. The term burglary as defined in the English Dictionary means an illegal entry into the building with an intent to commit crime such as theft. But in absence of violence or force the insurer cannot claim indemnification against the insurance company. The terms of the policy have to be construed as it is and we cannot add or subtract something. Howsoever liberally we may construe the policy but we cannot take liberalism to the extent of substituting the words which are not intended. It is true that in common parlance the term burglary would mean theft but it has to be preceded with force or violence. If the element of force and violence is not present then the insurer cannot claim compensation against theft from the insurance company. Para 6 It is settled law that the terms of the contract has to be strictly read and natural meaning be given to it. No outside aid should be sought unless the meaning is ambiguous. Para 14 From the above discussion we are of the opinion that theft should have preceded with force or violence as per the terms of insurance policy. In order to substantiate a claim an insurer has to establish that theft or burglary took place preceding with force or violence and if it is not then the insurance company will be well within their right to repudiate the claim of the insurer. Para 15 However all the three forums have already awarded compensation and the amount has been paid to the respondent therefore on the point of equity we would not like to disturb the payment which has already been made. However in view of legal position stated by us the orders of the District Forum State Commission and the National Commission cannot be upheld. Para 16 CASES REFERRED 1.National Insurance Company Ltd. v. Public Type College II 2001 CPJ 26 NC . Para 5 2.Oriental Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Samayanallur Primary Agricultural Co op. Bank JT 1999 9 SC 9 Para 10 3.Oriental Insurance Co.Ltd. v. Sony Cheriyan reported in JT 1999 6 SC 149 Para 12 4.General Assurance Society Ltd. v. Chandumull Jain and Anr. 1966 3 SCR 500 Para 13 Foreign Cases Referred 1.Halsbury s Laws of England Fourth Edition 203 Reissue Para 646. Para 6 2.George and the Goldsmiths and General Burglary Insurance Association Limited 1899 1 Q.B.595 Para 7 3.Dino Services Ltd. v. Prudential Assurance Co. Ltd. 1989 1 All ER 422 Para 7 A.K. MATHUR J. 1. Leave granted. 2. This appeal is directed against the order passed by the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission New Delhi in Revision Petition No.2159 of 2002 confirming the order passed by the State Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission New Delhi as well as the order passed by the Consumer Disputes Redressal Forum II District Forum II New Delhi. 3. The brief facts which are necessary for the disposal of the appeal are as follows. The respondent took out a policy by the appellant company for a sum of Rs.7 lacs against burglary and or house breaking policy with effect from September 22 1991 to September 21 1992. Necessary provisions of the policy read as under THE COMPANY HEREBY AGREES subject to the terms and conditions contained herein endorsed or otherwise expressed hereon that if a The property hereinafter described or any part thereof be LOST or DAMAGED by BURGLARY and or HOUSE BREAKING or b ANY DAMAGE be caused to the premises to be made good by the insured from BURGLARY and or HOUSE BREAKING or any attempt thereat. 4. The term Burglary and or Housebreaking has been defined in terms of the policy also which reads as under. Burglary and or Housebreaking shall mean theft involving entry to or exit from the premises stated therein by forcible and violent means or following assault or violence or threat thereof to the insured or to his employees or to the members of his family 5. There are exceptions to it with which we are not concerned. During the currency of the policy the respondent had his stock of food grains kept in godown no.48 Srinagar Colony Bharat Nagar New Delhi. Shri Ashok Kumar Bansal one of the partners of the respondent visited his godown on July 2 1992 and there he found out that 197 bags of gwar were stolen. An F.I.R. was lodged at Police Station Sarai Rohilla under Section 380 of the Indian Penal Code on July 24 1992. Therefore the respondent raised a claim against the appellant company under the aforesaid policy for incurring the aforesaid loss by theft. The appellant company repudiated the claim of the respondent on the ground that theft is not covered by the insurance policy as no burglary took place in the godown by use of force or violence. Therefore the respondent approached the Consumer Disputes Redressal Forum II District Forum and made a claim for the loss of 197 bags of gwar. The appellant company contested the claim and took the stand that the claim is not covered as per the insurance policy. However the District Forum overruled the objection and held that burglary includes theft and by its order dated June 1 1998 directed the appellant company to release the claim of the respondent within two months with interest at the rate of 15 per annum and also awarded cost quantified at Rs.1 000 . Aggrieved against the said order of the District Forum the appellant company preferred an appeal before the State Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission New Delhi which was registered as Appeal No.881 of 1998. The State Commission also by its order dated June 19 2002 upheld the claim of the respondent taking the view that notwithstanding the definition of the term burglary and or housebreaking as defined in the policy burglary includes theft also. It also relied upon a decision of the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission in the case of National Insurance Company Ltd. v. Public Type College1 . The State Commission thus dismissed the appeal filed by the appellant company. Aggrieved by the said order of the State Commission a revision was filed before the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission. The National Commission by its impugned order affirmed the claim of the respondent and dismissed revision on May 20 2003. Hence the present appeal by way of special leave. 6. The question before us is whether in terms of the policy the repudiation of the claim of the respondent by the appellant company is justified or not. We have already reproduced the terms of the policy as also the definition of burglary and or housebreaking as defined in the policy. The definition given in the policy is binding on both the parties. The policy is a contract between the parties and both parties are bound by the terms of contract. As per the definition of the word burglary followed with violence makes it clear that if any theft is committed it should necessarily precede with violence i.e. entry into the premises for committing theft should involve force or violence or threat to insurer or to his employees or to the members of his family. Therefore the element of force and violence is a condition precedent for burglary and housebreaking. The term burglary as defined in the English Dictionary means an illegal entry into the building with an intent to commit crime such as theft. But in absence of violence or force the insurer cannot claim indemnification against the insurance company. The terms of the policy have to be construed as it is and we cannot add or subtract something. Howsoever liberally we may construe the policy but we cannot take liberalism to the extent of substituting the words which are not intended. It is true that in common parlance the term burglary would mean theft but it has to be preceded with force or violence. If the element of force and violence is not present then the insurer cannot claim compensation against theft from the insurance company. This expression appearing in the insurance policy came up for interpretation before the English Court and the English Courts in no uncertain terms laid down that burglary or theft has to be preceded with force or violence in order to be indemnified by the insurance company. In this connection reference may be made to the statement of law as summarized in Halsbury s Laws of England Fourth Edition 203 Reissue Para 646. It reads as under 646. Forcible and violent entry. The terms of a burglary insurance may exclude liability in certain circumstances unless there is forcible and violent entry into the premises. If so the entry must be obtained by the use of both force and violence or the definition is not satisfied and the policy does not apply. An entry obtained by turning the handle of an outside door or by using a skeleton key though sufficient to constitute a criminal offence is not within the policy since the element of violence is absent. However an entry obtained by picking the lock or forcing back the catch by means of an instrument involves the use of violence and is therefore covered. The policy may be so framed as to apply only to violent entry from the outside or the violent entry into a room within the insured premises may be sufficient. In any case the violence must be connected with the act of entry if the entry is obtained without violence the subsequent use of violence to effect the theft as for instance where a show case is broken open does not bring the loss within the policy. 7. In this connection a reference may be made to an earlier decision Queen s Bench Division in re George and the Goldsmiths and General Burglary Insurance Association Limited1. In this case a policy was taken out for loss or damage by burglary and housebreaking. A theft took place at premises No.78 Strand in a shop where the front door was shut but not locked or bolted and access to the shop could be obtained by turning the handle of the door. In the early morning before business hours during the temporary absence of a servant of the assured some person opened the front door entered the shop and breaking open a locked up compartment or show case and certain properties were stolen. Reversing the judgment of the Divisional Court the Court of Appeal held that the loss which has occurred as above mentioned was not covered by the policy. Two propositions were advanced before the Court The first that an entry effected by the exercise of any force however slight was sufficient to constitute an entry within the meaning of policy. The contention was advanced that pushing a door open if it were ajar or turning the handle of a door if the door were shut and could be opened in that way was sufficient force to satisfy the language of the policy. The second proposition was that if that was so and therefore it could not be said that the original entry in the case was effected by force within the meaning of the policy yet nevertheless the language of the policy was satisfied by the fact that the thief after having entered the shop without force proceeded to prise off an iron plate to which a locked padlock was attached securing a show case in which valuables were placed. Their Lordships considered both the propositions and after reproducing the definition observed that as per the plain reading of the expression used in terms of the policy violence is a condition precedent. The Court of Appeal reversed the decision of Queen s Bench. This view was reiterated subsequently in the case of Dino Services Ltd. v. Prudential Assurance Co. Ltd.1. In this case also the proposition of law as enunciated in the case of George and Goldsmith and General Burglary Insurance Association Ltd. was reaffirmed. It was held as follows In the context of a policy of insurance against theft from premises by forcible and violent means of entry the word violent was to be construed according to its ordinary meaning and meant entry by the use of any force which was accentuated or accompanied by a physical act which could properly be described as violent in nature and character. In the context of such a policy the word violent accordingly referred to the physical character of the means of entry and not merely to its unlawful character. It followed that the thieves by gaining entry to the premises simply by using the proper keys to unlock the doors of the premises had not entered the premises by violent means. Accordingly the plaintiff s loss was not covered by the policy. The appeal would therefore be allowed. 8. Similarly view has been expressed by American Courts also in American Jurisprudence 2nd Vol. 44 1401 which is as follows 1401 Provisions as to visible marks or evidence or use of force or violence It is not uncommon for insurance companies to include in their theft or burglary policies provisions restricting their liability to cases where there were some visible marks or visible evidence of the use of force or violence. It is generally competent for an insurer to insert such a clause in the contract of insurance and since such a provision is unambiguous it does not justify the applicability of the general principle that the insurance policy will be construed most favourable to the insured. However the courts will not read such a requirement into a policy and do not require compliance with such clauses unless the unmistakable language of the policy so requires. Such a policy requirement has been considered either as a limitation on the liability of the insurer or as a rule characterizing the evidence upon which liability must be predicated but in either event the validity of the requirement has been recognized and rarely questioned although in at least one instance such a requirement has been held in contravention of public policy under the particular terms of the policy involved and the particular circumstances. Just as policies insuring against burglary of an insured s premises commonly require visible marks upon the insured s premises or upon the exterior of the insured s premises so also do safe burglary policies commonly require visible marks either upon the insured s safe or upon the exterior of the insured s safe or upon the exterior of the doors of the insured s safe and in some instances the requirement of visible marks or visible evidence has been imposed in policies pertaining to theft of property from an insured s automobile. The determination of what constitutes visible marks or visible evidence within the meaning of such a provision and of where such marks or evidence must be located in order to satisfy the policy requirement is to a great extent depend upon the particular facts involved in relation to the specific requirements imposed by the policy. Where for example a burglary or theft policy requires that there must be visible marks of force or violence at the place of entry into the premises this requirement has been held complied with if the visible marks are only on one of the outer doors to the insured s premises which the burglars or thieves must have used to accomplish their deed. However under such a requirement if the only visible marks are those on inside doors which are not at the entrance to the premises recovery will be denied. Similarly a policy providing against loss by burglary by felonious entry into a safe by actual force evidenced by visible marks made upon the exterior of all the doors does not cover loss sustained by felonious entry into the safe by a manipulation of the lock on the outer door with no visible marks made thereon although the inner door of the safe did contain such marks although there is contrary authority. The opening of a safe by manipulation of the combination within the period covered by a policy of burglary insurance which was made possible by force applied to the safe before such period leaving visible marks upon the safe was not within the terms of the policy insuring against loss through felonious entry into the safe by actual force and violence leaving visible marks upon the safe and occurring within the policy period with an exemption from liability from loss effected by opening the safe by manipulation of the lock. 9. It is possible that an insurer may sustain loss in technical terms of the criminal law but no relief can be given to him unless his case is covered by the terms of the policy. It is not open to interpret the expression appearing in policy in terms of common law but it has to give meaning to the expression as defined in the policy. The act that causes the loss must fall within the definition in the policy and it cannot take the cover and contents of the definition as laid down in the criminal law. Therefore when the definition of the word burglary has been defined in the policy then the cause should fall within that definition. Once a party has agreed to a particular definition he is bound by it and the definition of criminal law will be of no avail. In this connection the decision of the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission in the case of National Insurance Company Ltd. v. Public Type College which has taken the colour and content of the definition given in the criminal law does not lay down the correct proposition of law. It is settled law that terms of the policy shall govern the contract between the parties they have to abide by the definition given therein and all those expressions appearing in the policy should be interpreted with reference to the terms of policy and not with reference to the definition given in other laws. It is a matter of contract and in terms of the contract the relation of the parties shall abide and it is presumed that when the parties have entered into a contract of insurance with their eyes wide open they cannot rely on definition given in other enactment. Thus the decision of the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission in the case of National Insurance Company Ltd. v. Public Type College is not a good law and all the Tribunals i.e. National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission State Commission District Forum having applied the ratio of that case the impugned order cannot be sustained. 10. Reference in this connection may be made to the decision of this Court in the case of Oriental Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Samayanallur Primary Agricultural Co op. Bank1 . In this case question came for interpretation of the similar policy i.e. policy against burglary. The bank had two insurance policies with the Oriental Insurance Company Ltd. out of which one was cash insurance policy for Rs. 1 lac and the second was a burglary insurance policy for Rs. 25 lacs. The relevant terms of the policy were 3 a Are all valuables secured in Burglary resistance safes when Premises are locked Yes b If so state name or maker of safe and cost Tansi 11. The answer to the question 3 a was in positive. The question arose that according to the complaint burglary took place from the cashier s cash box. The surveyor s report was that the stolen jewels had not been kept in safe locker and the theft was not covered under burglary insurance policy. Though the District Forum directed the insurance company to pay a sum of Rs. 43 729.25 however the State Commission observed that what is insured is not the contents of the cash box but the jewels kept in the safe which means a safety locker made by Tansi as agreed to in the proposal form. And it was observed that jewels kept in the cashier s cash box which were not covered by the policy. The State forum overruled the order passed by the District Forum. The order passed by the State Commission in revision was reversed by the National Commission. The matter came before this Court in special leave petition by insurance company. Their Lordships observed that there was no necessity of referring to the dictionaries for understanding the meaning of the word safe which the parties in the instant case are proved to have understood while submitting the proposal and accepting the insurance policy. The cashier s box could not be equated with the safe within the meaning of the insurance policy. The alleged burglary and the removal of the jewellery from cash box the cash box was not covered by the insurance policy between the parties. The insurance policy has to be construed having reference only to the stipulations contained in it and no artificial far fetched meaning could be given to the words appearing in it. And therefore they set aside the order of the National Commission. 12. Similarly in the case of Oriental Insurance Co.Ltd. v. Sony Cheriyan2 an insurance was taken out under the Motor Vehicles Act 1988 in which their Lordships observed The insurance policy between the insurer and the insured represents a contract between the parties. Since the insurer undertakes to compensate the loss suffered by the insured on account of risks covered by the insurance policy the terms of the agreement have to be strictly construed to determine the extent of liability of the insurer. The insured cannot claim anything more than what is covered by the insurance policy. 13. Similarly in the case of General Assurance Society Ltd. v. Chandumull Jain and Anr.1 the Constitution Bench has observed that the policy document being a contract and it has to be read strictly. It was observed In interpreting documents relating to a contract of insurance the duty of the court is to interpret the words in which the contract is expressed by the parties because it is not for the court to make a new contract however reasonable if the parties have not made it themselves. Looking at the proposal the letter of acceptance and the cover notes it is clear that a contract of insurance under the standard policy for fire and extended to cover flood cyclone etc. had come into being. 14. Therefore it is settled law that the terms of the contract has to be strictly read and natural meaning be given to it. No outside aid should be sought unless the meaning is ambiguous. 15. From the above discussion we are of the opinion that theft should have preceded with force or violence as per the terms of insurance policy. In order to substantiate a claim an insurer has to establish that theft or burglary took place preceding with force or violence and if it is not then the insurance company will be well within their right to repudiate the claim of the insurer. 16. However all the three forums have already awarded compensation and the amount has been paid to the respondent therefore on the point of equity we would not like to disturb the payment which has already been made. However in view of legal position stated by us the orders of the District Forum State Commission and the National Commission cannot be upheld. 17. But before parting with the case we would like to observe that the terms of the policy as laid down by the insurance company should be suitably amended by the insurance company so as to make it more viable and facilitate the claimants to make their claim. The definition is so stringent in the present case that it gives rise to difficult situation for the common man to understand that in order to maintain their claim they will have to necessarily show evidence of violence or force. The definition of the word burglary should be given meaning which is closer to the realities of life. The common man understands that he has taken out the policy against theft. He hardly understands whether it should precede violence or force. Therefore a policy should be a meaningful policy so that a common man can understand what is the meaning of burglary in common parlance. Though we have interpreted the present policy strictly in terms of the policy but we hope that the insurance companies will amend their policies so as to make them more meaningful to the public at large. It should have the meaning which a common man can easily understand rather than become more technical so as to defeat the cause of the public at large. 18. In the result we allow this appeal set aside the order passed by the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission New Delhi confirming the order of the State Commission District Forum. But the amount of compensation which has already been paid to the respondent shall not be recovered in the facts and circumstances of the present case. No order as to costs. 0 HEADNOTE CRIMINAL LAWS Penal Code 1860 Sections 457 380 34 Theft Recovery Gold chain worn by PW2 lost on the night of 12 11 1995 while she was sleeping No complaint filed as PWs 1 and 2 were not aware FIR filed after sixteen days when police caught appellant roaming in a suspicious manner and he disclosed about the theft Discovery statement made to PW7 circle inspector regarding sale of chain to PW8 PW 8 who allegedly purchased the gold chain did not support prosecution s case Police official PW3 corroborated PW7 s version Conviction on the basis of alleged recovery at his instance Out of three two accused acquitted. Held it is difficult to believe that PW2 was not aware about the theft of chain she was wearing. Only evidence against appellant is the alleged recovery of gold chain and Trial Court erred in convicting him on that basis alone. PW8 turned hostile. It is not safe to convict appellant on the evidence of police officials. Benefit of doubt given. HELD FIR was registered after about sixteen days from the date of alleged theft. PWs 1 and 2 did not even realize that the chain was stolen. It is only when the accused were brought to their house after about sixteen days that they realized that the chain was stolen and FIR was lodged. The chain in question was being worn by PW2. It is stated to have been stolen while she was sleeping. It is inconceivable that she would not realize that she had lost her chain. The incident in our view is not unfolded truthfully. A1 and A3 have been rightly acquitted because nothing links them to the offence. But similar is the case with the appellant. The only evidence against him is the alleged recovery of gold chain at his instance. That cannot connect the appellant to the theft. The Trial Court has stated that since chain was recovered at the instance of the appellant the only inference which can be drawn is that he committed the theft. Drawing such inference in the facts of this case would be totally unjust. Pertinently PW8 from whose shop the chain is said to have been recovered has turned hostile. Thus the prosecution is relying only on police witnesses. In this case it is unsafe to do so. Grave doubt is therefore created as to whether the appellant could be involved in the offence of theft. We are therefore of the view that benefit of doubt must be given to the appellant and he must be acquitted. Para 9 Smt. RANJANA PRAKASH DESAI J. 1. Leave granted. 2. The appellant A2 Azeez along with two others i.e. A1 Khalid and A3 Babu was tried by the Judicial Magistrate First Class I Aluva for offences punishable under Sections 457 and 380 read with Section 34 of the Indian Penal Code for short the IPC . By order dated 15 12 2000 learned Magistrate convicted the appellant under Section 457 of the IPC and sentenced him to undergo rigorous imprisonment for one year. The appellant was further convicted for offence under Section 380 of the IPC and sentenced to undergo rigorous imprisonment for two years. The substantive sentences were ordered to run concurrently. A1 Khalid and A3 Babu were acquitted. 3. The appellant challenged the said order before the Additional Sessions Judge Ernakulam. Learned Sessions Judge by his order dated 28 11 2002 confirmed the conviction and sentence and dismissed the appeal. Being aggrieved by the said conviction and sentence the appellant filed a criminal revision petition in the Kerala High Court. By the impugned judgment the High Court dismissed the revision petition. Hence this appeal by special leave is filed against the said judgment. 4. According to the prosecution the appellant along with A1 Khalid and A3 Babu with an intention of committing theft entered the house of PW1 Radha at Karumalloor Village on 12 11 1995 at 4.00 a.m. through the door which was kept open. They entered the bedroom where PW2 Renuka Devi was sleeping and committed theft of a gold chain weighing 14 grams worth Rs.7 500 which PW2 was wearing while she was sleeping. A1 and A3 assisted the appellant in committing the offence. They gave the gold chain to the appellant for selling. The appellant sold the gold chain and the accused divided the sale proceeds and thereby committed the offence. 5. This case presents rather unusual facts. PW7 the Circle Inspector stated that he arrested the accused on 28 11 1995 at 1 a.m. near the parking area Municipal Buildings Aluva while they were moving in suspicious circumstances. On questioning them it was revealed that they had committed the offence involved in this case hence they proceeded to the house of PW1 at Aduvathuruthu and recorded her F.I.R. Ext.P1 . 6. PW1 in her evidence stated that her daughter PW2 was sleeping in her room on the night of 12 11 1995. PW2 was wearing Thara fashion gold chain. The gold chain was stolen but no complaint was lodged at the police station because PW2 did not realize that her gold chain was stolen. It is only on 28 11 1995 when the police came to their house along with the accused and the gold chain was shown to her that she realized that the gold chain was stolen. She identified the gold chain MO1. FIR Ext.P1 was then lodged. PW2 the daughter stated that on 12 11 1995 at about 11 p.m. she went to sleep. On the next day morning the gold chain was not seen. On 28 11 1995 when the police came to her house with the accused and showed her the chain she realized that her chain was stolen. She identified the chain. 7. Evidence of PWs 1 and 2 raise several question marks. If gold chain worn by PW2 was removed by the accused at night it is unbelievable that she would not realize it in the morning. Even PW1 the mother did not realize that the chain worn by PW2 was not around her neck. Assuming this to be true PWs 1 and 2 would at least realize the loss on the next day or a day thereafter. They did not realize that the chain was stolen till 28 11 1995 when the police came to their house with the accused and showed them the chain. At that time they realized that chain was stolen. It is on 28 11 1995 that PW1 lodged her complaint. Thus the complaint came to be lodged about sixteen days after the incident that too after the police came to PW1 s house with the chain. The sequence of events is not convincing and does not stand to reason. 8. According to the prosecution the appellant made a discovery statement to PW7 the Circle Inspector and pursuant to that statement PW7 went to the shop of PW8 Pradeep along with the appellant. The appellant is stated to have pointed out to PW8 as the man to whom he had sold the chain. However PW8 has not supported the prosecution case. The courts below have while convicting the appellant placed reliance on the evidence of PW7 the Circle Inspector and PW3 the Head Constable who sought to corroborate the version of PW7 regarding recovery of chain at the instance of the appellant from the shop of PW8. We find it difficult to do so. Trial Court has observed that offence under Section 457 of the IPC is not made out because according to PW1 the thieves entered the door which was kept open. The Trial Court therefore acquitted the appellant of the offence punishable under Section 457 of the IPC. The Trial Court also acquitted A1 and A3 of the offence punishable under Section 457 read with Section 34 of the IPC. The Trial Court however observed that from the evidence of PWs 1 and 2 it is seen that theft had taken in the room in which PW2 was sleeping the thief entered the house and committed theft of gold chain which PW2 was wearing and therefore this act will be covered by Section 451 of the IPC i.e. house trespass in order to commit offence punishable with imprisonment. The Trial Court further held that since the recovery of gold chain was effected on the basis of statement given by the appellant the only inference that can be drawn is that he committed the theft of gold chain and therefore the case is covered by Section 380 of the IPC i.e. theft in a dwelling house. After observing that there is nothing in the evidence of PWs 1 to 8 to connect A1 and A3 with the crime the Trial Court acquitted them of all the offences. This view is affirmed by the Sessions Court and the High Court. 9. We find it difficult to uphold the above view so far as it relates to the appellant. As we have already noted that FIR was registered after about sixteen days from the date of alleged theft. PWs 1 and 2 did not even realize that the chain was stolen. It is only when the accused were brought to their house after about sixteen days that they realized that the chain was stolen and FIR was lodged. The chain in question was being worn by PW2. It is stated to have been stolen while she was sleeping. It is inconceivable that she would not realize that she had lost her chain. The incident in our view is not unfolded truthfully. A1 and A3 have been rightly acquitted because nothing links them to the offence. But similar is the case with the appellant. The only evidence against him is the alleged recovery of gold chain at his instance. That cannot connect the appellant to the theft. The Trial Court has stated that since chain was recovered at the instance of the appellant the only inference which can be drawn is that he committed the theft. Drawing such inference in the facts of this case would be totally unjust. Pertinently PW8 from whose shop the chain is said to have been recovered has turned hostile. Thus the prosecution is relying only on police witnesses. In this case it is unsafe to do so. Grave doubt is therefore created as to whether the appellant could be involved in the offence of theft. We are therefore of the view that benefit of doubt must be given to the appellant and he must be acquitted. 10. We therefore allow the appeal. The impugned judgment and order is quashed and set aside. The appellant is acquitted of the offences under Sections 380 and 451 of the IPC. The appellant is in jail. He is directed to be released forthwith unless he is required in any other case. 0 HEADNOTE CRIMINAL LAW Indian Penal Code 1860 Section 395 Dacoity Ingredients No evidence of any theft or attempt to commit theft Accused exploding a bomb and also firing gun Only evidence of theft in realm of hearsay. Held that offence under section 395 IPC is not made out. Paras 5 6 Criminal Procedure Code 1973 Section 211 ii with Indian Penal Code 1860 Section 457 Scope Accused charged with offence under section 395 311 IPC Offence not proved If can be con victed under section 457 Armed accused shown to have forcibly entered the house. Held that they can be convicted under section 457 IPC even if they were not charged with said offence. Paras 7 8 ORDER 1. Out of five persons challaned before the sessions court for the offence under section 395 IPC four were convicted by the trial court and sentenced each of them to rigorous imprisonment for ten years. The four convicted persons filed appeals before the High Court. The conviction was confirmed in respect of two of them who are appellants before us while acquitting A4 Tara Kant Jha and A5 Badri Jha. However the High Court reduced the sentence to rigorous imprisonment for seven years. 2. The occurrence happened during the night of 10th January 1981 the next morning was 11th . The prosecution case is that all the five accused entered into the courtyard of the house of PW5 Ram Prasad. The male persons of the house were then sleeping in the courtyard. After the assailants entered the courtyard they trussed up three persons belonging to that house PW1 Bimal PW2 Ramchander and PW3 Mahender . They were threatened not to make any noise lest they would be killed. Thereafter the assailants pushed the door of the house open and committed mischief there including theft of some silver ornaments. When PW4 Shatrughan Prasad Yadav tried to escape one of the assailants fired a gun shot which hit him on the hand. While decamping they exploded a bomb. Hearing the commotion the neighbouring people rushed to the scene and haystacks were set fire to by them. In the light of the flames the faces of the assailants were identified by the villag ers also. 3. It is unnecessary for us in this appeal to deal with the evidence in detail. We conclude that the case alleged against the convicted persons stand proved to the following extent They entered into the house and tied up the three inmates of the house. They exploded something like a bomb though none was injured thereby. They entered into the house forcibly opening the door. The story that one of them fired a gun at PW5 is not sub stantiated. When the villagers rushed in all the assailants left the place. 4. The prosecution attempted to make out that an offence of dacoity was committed. But they can succeed only if there was either theft or at least attempt to commit theft. There is no evidence that there was any act of theft or even attempt to commit theft. Of course PW5 said that two lady inmates of the house reported to him later that their silver necklaces were snatched away by the dacoits. Unfortunately those ladies were not examined and hence the version of PW5 remained only in the realm of hearsay evidence. PW1 made an attempt to say that there was looting or that silver ornaments were stolen by the assail ants. This was not what he saw and perhaps this too would have been only reported to him. In cross examination he definitely said that he did not see any act of theft. No such ornament was recovered by the police during investigation. 5. Thus there is total lack of evidence to show that the intrud ers committed theft or made any attempt to commit theft. Theft or extortion or attempt to commit any one of the two is an inevi table ingredient for robbery. In such a situation it is extremely difficult for the prosecution to sustain the conviction for the offence under section 395 of the IPC. We therefore set aside the conviction and sentence passed on the appellants for the aforesaid offence. 6. The above is not enough to dispose of this appeal nor to exonerate the appellants completely from the charge. The acts proved by the prosecution would fall within the ambit of section 457 of the IPC. Learned counsel for the appellants made a bid to contend that the said count was not included in the charge and hence the appellants are not liable to be convicted thereunder. Section 221 ii enables the court to convict the appellants of the offence which they have shown to have committed although they were not charged with it. If any such alteration is to be made the question is whether any prejudice would be caused to the appellants. We asked learned counsel for the appellants whether they want another opportunity to cross examine the prose cution witnesses focusing on the offence under section 457 IPC. Learned counsel fairly submitted that it is not necessary. 7. We therefore convict the appellants for the offence under section 457 read with section 34 of the IPC. We are told that the first appellant has undergone RI for more than three years and the second appellant has undergone RI for more than four years. We feel that the sentence for the aforesaid offence can be limit ed to imprisonment for the period already undergone by the ap pellants We do so. 8. The appeal is disposed of accordingly. 9. We direct the jail authorities to release the appellants from jail forthwith unless they are required in any other case. 0 HEADNOTE GENERAL INSURANCE General insurance Insurance against theft Distinction between theft and criminal breach of trust Respondent a jewellery shop owner taking out a Jeweller Block Policy from the appellant Customer visiting the shop taking away some ornament Res pondent lodging a claim with the insurer besides registering criminal complaint Insurer rejecting the claim holding that entrustment of jewellery to customer did not constitute theft covered by the policy State Consumer Protection Council also finding the claim of respondent to be unsustainable High Court on appeal holding that it was not a case of entrustment but the act of removal of the goods by the customer constituted theft and therefore the insurer was liable Whether High Court correct in holding so. Upholding the decision of the High Court held the customer in the instant case being an unknown person as seen from the FIR there was no occasion for the respondent to entrust the jewellery to him and it being a case of theft the insurer was clearly liable to make good the loss in terms of the policy taken by the respondent. HELD It is not in dispute that an insurance cover against theft was granted by the appellant. The insurance policy thus covered the risk of theft also. An insurer determines the extent of its risk. It floats the policy knowing fully well the risk it seeks to cover. Having regard to the determination of the risk only he fixes the quantum of premium. The insured while entering into a contract of insurance must precisely know the extent of his cover so that he may take out additional insurance if it is so required. Para 7 Clause 8 of the contract of insurance would be attracted only where the offences specified therein are committed by any of the persons mentioned therein. For defeating the claim of the respondent it was thus obligatory on the part of the appellant to establish that the conditions prescribed therein were satisfied. Para 9 The word entrust would imply giving responsibility to a person upon whom the owner has confidence. It envisages establishment of a relationship. When a customer enters into a jewellery shop as of necessity the owner or his agent must allow him to inspect the merchandise the customer intends to purchase. For the said purpose possession in the legal sense is not handed over. The owner or his agent does not loose complete control thereover. Para 13 For the purpose of arriving at a conclusion as to whether the exclusion clause is attracted or not loss or damage must be occasioned inter alia by a customer in respect of the property entrusted to him. The word customer contained in clause 8 c of the Insurance Policy must be read ejusdem generis. A customer con templated thereunder must have to be one who would be a man of trust. If a customer is not a man of trust or the property had not been entrusted to him the exclusion clause would not apply. The customer who committed theft of jewellery was an unknown person. It was so categorically stated in the First Information Report. There was thus no occasion for the respondent to entrust the jewellery to him. Para 14 We therefore are clearly of the opinion that the view taken by the High Court was correct. The High Court s judgment is upheld. The appeal is dismissed. We in the facts and circumstances of this case also direct the appellant to pay and bear the cost of the respondent throughout. Counsel s fee in this appeal is assessed at Rs.50 000 . Para 24 CASES REFERRED 1.M s Peacock Plywood Pvt. Ltd. v. The Oriental Insurance Co. Ltd. JT 2007 1 SC 191 Para 8 2.United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Kiran Combers Spinners 2007 1 SCC 368 Para 8 3.United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Pushpalaya Printers JT 2004 4 SC 352 Para 8 4.Ram Narayan Popli etc. v. Central Bureau of Investigation etc. JT 2003 1 SC 184 Para 23 5.Superintendent and Re membrancer of Legal Affairs W.B. v. S.K. Roy AIR 1974 SC 794 Para 22 6.The State of Gujarat v. Jaswant Lal Natha Lal 1968 2 SCR 408 Para 21 S.B. SINHA J. 1. Appellant insurer is before us questioning the correctness or otherwise of a judgment and order dated 10.09.1999 passed by a Division Bench of the High Court of Jammu Kashmir in CIMA 21 of 1998 allowing the appeal preferred by the respondent herein from a judgment and order dated 16.12.1997 passed by the Jammu Kashmir Consumers Protection Com mission. 2. Respondent herein carries on business in jewellery It obtained a policy known as Jeweller Block Policy . A theft of 140 gms of jewellery worth of Rs.63 000 occurred in his business premises. A First Information Report was lodged therefor. Respondent also lodged a claim with the appellant herein. The same having not been settled for a long time an application was filed before the State Consumers Protection Commission constituted under the J K Consumers Protection Act 1987. 3. The question raised before the Commission was as to whether the loss in question was covered by the insurance policy. Appellant contended that the claim of the respondent is covered by an exclusion clause contained in the policy which reads as under 8. Loss or damage occasioned by theft or dishonesty or any attempt there at committed by or where such loss or damage has been expedited or in any way sustained or brought about by a any of the insured s family members b any servant or traveller or messenger in the exclusive employment of the insured c any customer or broker or their customer or angadias or cutters or goldsmiths in respect of the property hereby insured entrusted to them by the insured his or their servants or agents. 4. The Commission by reason of its order dated 16.12.1997 inter alia found the said claim to be not sustainable on the ground that the loss was not covered by the said policy stating ...It appears to us that while preparing the insurance agreement the insurer was aware of the fact that this could be the easiest way for any Jeweller to raise claims against the insurance companies and that is why this clause has been deliberately introduced and theft by customer if any has been put in exclusive clause of the policy... 5. The High Court as indicated hereinbefore by reason of its judgment and order dated 10.09.1999 did not agree therewith. It was held What is meant by the term entrustment and does handing over of jewellery to a customer amounts to entrustment The dictionary meaning of the word entrust would be to give to another for care protection or to commit something trustfully or plays trust upon a person . If a customer enters the premises of a shopkeeper and examines some movable property and takes away the same then there hardly arises any occasion for entrustment to such a customer. In the present case a customer entered the business premises and removed 140 gms. of Jewellery. There was no entrustment on the part of the owner to the customer. The act of removal of the goods by the customer is nothing but a plain theft. This is a dishonest taking and removing of the property by the customer with the intent of permanently depriving the owner. 6. A short question which thus arises for our consideration is as to whether clause 8 of the policy is applicable to the facts and circumstances of the present case. 7. It is not in dispute that an insurance cover against theft was granted by the appellant. The insurance policy thus covered the risk of theft also. An insurer determines the extent of its risk. It floats the policy knowing fully well the risk it seeks to cover. Having regard to the determination of the risk only he fixes the quantum of premium. The insured while entering into a contract of insurance must precisely know the extent of his cover so that he may take out additional insurance if it is so required. 8. However there may be an express clause excluding the applicability of insurance cover. Wherever such exclusionary clause is contained in a policy it would be for the insurer to show that the case falls within the purview thereof. In a case of ambiguity it is trite the contract of insurance shall be construed in favour of the insured. See United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Pushpalaya Printers1 M s Peacock Plywood Pvt. Ltd. v. The Oriental Insurance Co. Ltd.2 and United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Kiran Combers Spinners3. 9. Clause 8 of the contract of insurance would be attracted only where the offences specified therein are committed by any of the persons mentioned therein. For defeating the claim of the respondent it was thus obligatory on the part of the appellant to establish that the conditions prescribed therein were satisfied. 10. Keeping in view the aforementioned legal aspect of the matter we may advert to the meaning of the word entrust . Its ordinary meaning would mean to charge or invest with a trust to commit to another with a certain confidence regarding his care See Advanced Law Lexicon by P. Ramanatha Aiyar 3rd Edn. Book 2 page1613 . 11. It requires no elaboration that offences of breach of trust and theft contain different ingredients. Whereas theft has been defined in Section 378 of the Indian Penal Code breach of trust has been defined in Section 405 thereof which reads as under 378. Theft. Whoever intending to take dishonestly any moveable property out of the possession of any person without that person s consent moves that property in order to such taking is said to commit theft. 12. Illustration d appended thereto reads as under d A being Z s servant and entrusted by Z with the care of Z s plate dishonestly runs away with the plate without Z s consent. A has committed theft. 405. Criminal breach of trust. Whoever being in any manner entrusted with property or with any dominion over property dishonestly misappropriates or converts to his own use that property or dishonestly uses or disposes of that property in violation of any direction of law prescribing the mode in which such trust is to be discharged or of any legal contract express or implied which he has made touching the discharge of such trust or willfully suffers any other person so to do commits criminal breach of trust 13. The word entrust would imply giving responsibility to a person upon whom the owner has confidence. It envisages establishment of a relationship. When a customer enters into a jewellery shop as of necessity the owner or his agent must allow him to inspect the merchandise the customer intends to purchase. For the said purpose possession in the legal sense is not handed over. The owner or his agent does not loose complete control thereover. 14. For the purpose of arriving at a conclusion as to whether the exclusion clause is attracted or not loss or damage must be occasioned inter alia by a customer in respect of the property entrusted to him. The word customer contained in clause 8 c of the Insurance Policy must be read ejusdem generis. A customer contemplated thereunder must have to be one who would be a man of trust. If a customer is not a man of trust or the property had not been entrusted to him the exclusion clause would not apply. The customer who committed theft of jewellery was an unknown person. It was so categorically stated in the First Information Report. There was thus no occasion for the respondent to entrust the jewellery to him. 15. Mr. Vishnu Mehra the learned counsel appearing for the appellant has relied upon the meaning of the word entrust as contained in Black s Law Dictionary 8th Edn. and Webster s Universal Dictionary. 16. In Black s Law Dictionary the word entrust has been defined as under To give a person the responsibility for something after establishing a confidential relationship. 17. In Webster s Universal Dictionary meaning of the word entrust reads as under To confer as a responsibility duty etc. to place something in another s care. 18. Apart from the fact that the said meaning of the term entrustment goes against the submission of Mr. Mehra we may notice that in Black s Law Dictionary the word entrusting in commercial law has been described as The transfer of possession of goods to a merchant who deals in goods of that type and who may in turn transfer the goods and all rights to them to a purchaser in the ordinary course of business. Transfer of possession of goods therefore is a sine qua non for entrustment. The person must be handed over the possession of the property. Illustration d appended to Section 378 IPC envisages a situation of this nature. It by no stretch of imagination would have contemplated a situation where an unknown customer would have committed theft. 19. The word entrustment moreover must be read in the context in which it has been used. 20. In Colinvaux s Law of Insurance 7th Edn. by Robert Merkin at page 50 it is stated Words in context The above generality is not applicable when it is clear from the context that the words are not used in a colloquial popular sense. Thus the word flood in the phrase strom tempest or floor does not cover a case where a house holder s bathroom is affected by upward seepage of water to a depth of three inches as the context of the word requires an event violent sudden or abnormal. Similarly heavy rain is not in itself likely to constitute a storm. It has also been held that the phrase sum actually paid in a reinsurance agreement referred to a sum which the reinsured is merely liable to pay as the agreement read as a whole was against liability rather than actual payment. 21. In The State of Gujarat v. Jaswant Lal Natha Lal1 this Court held ...The expression entrustment carries with it the implication that the person handing over any property or on whose behalf that property is handed over to another continues to be its owner. Further the person handing over the property must have confidence in the person taking the property so as to create a fiduciary relationship between them. A mere transaction of sale cannot amount to an entrustment... 22. In Superintendent and Re membrancer of Legal Affairs W.B. v. S.K. Roy1 this Court held 12. To constitute an offence under Section 409 IPC it is not required that misappropriation must necessarily take place after the creation of a legally correct entrustment or dominion over property. The entrustment may arise in any manner whatsoever. That manner may or may not involve fraudulent conduct of the accused. Section 409 IPC covers dishonest misappropriation in both types of cases that is to say those where the receipt of property is itself fraudulent or improper and those where the public servant misappropriates what may have been quite properly and innocently received. All that is required is what may be described as entrustment or acquisition of dominion over property in the capacity of a public servant who as a result of it becomes charged with a duty to act in a particular way or atleast honestly. 23. Yet again in Ram Narayan Popli etc. v. Central Bureau of Investigation etc.2 it was held 361. To constitute an offence of criminal breach of trust there must be an entrustment there must be misappropriation or conversion to one s own use or use in violation of a legal direction or of any legal contract and the misappropriation or conversion or disposal must be with a dishonest intention. When a person allows others to misappropriate the money entrusted to him that amounts to a criminal breach of trust as defined by Section 405. The section is relatable to property in a positive part and a negative part. The positive part deals with criminal misappropriation or conversion of the property and the negative part consists of dishonestly using or disposing of the property in violation of any direction and of law or any contract touching the discharge of trust. 362. In Jaswantrai Manilal Akhaney v. State of Bombay it was held that if the Managing Director of the Bank entrusted with securities owned by the pledgor disposes of their securities against the stipulated terms of the contract entered into by the parties with an intent to cause wrongful loss to the pledgor and wrongful gain to the Bank there can be no question but that the Managing Director has necessary mens rea required by Section 405. 363. The term entrustment is not necessarily a term of law. It may have different implications in different contexts. In its most general signification all it imports is the handing over possession for some purpose which may not imply the conferring of any proprietary right at all. 364. When a person misappropriates to his own use the property that does not belong to him the misappropriation is dishonest even though there was an intention to restore it at some future point of time. 24. We therefore are clearly of the opinion that the view taken by the High Court was correct. The High Court s judgment is upheld. The appeal is dismissed. We in the facts and circumstances of this case also direct the appellant to pay and bear the cost of the respondent throughout. Counsel s fee in this appeal is assessed at Rs.50 000 . 0 HEADNOTE INSURANCE LAW Rule of contra proferentem Insurance Policy covered theft following an actual forcible and violent entry or exit from the premises Appellant made a case for theft without forcible entry Respondent No.1 rejected the claim as for a valid claim violent and forcible entry was necessary Appellant invoked Rule of contra proferentem alleging ambiguity in terms of policy. Held it is well settled law that there is no difference between a contract of insurance and any other contract and that it should be construed strictly without adding or deleting anything from the terms thereof. A plain reading of the policy shows that a forcible entry should precede the theft and unless that is proved claim cannot be accepted. There being no ambiguity in the relevant clause of the policy rule of contra proferentem cannot be invoked. United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures P Ltd. JT 2016 1 SC 147 General Assurance Society Ltd. cases referred. HELD We are of the opinion that there is no error committed by the MRTP Commission in rejecting the Claim of the Appellant. It is clear from the facts of the present case that the Appellant has made out a case of theft without a forcible entry. The case of the Appellant is that forcible entry is not required for a claim to be made under the policy. Following the well accepted principle that a contract of insurance which is like any other commercial contract should be interpreted strictly we are of the opinion that the policy covers loss or damage by burglary or house breaking which have been explained as theft following an actual forcible and violent entry from the premises. A plain reading of the policy would show that a forcible entry should precede the theft and unless they are proved the claim cannot be accepted. Para 7 It is well settled law that there is no difference between a contract of insurance and any other contract and that it should be construed strictly without adding or deleting anything from the terms thereof. On applying the said principle we have no doubt that a forcible entry is required for a claim to be allowed under the policy for burglary house breaking. Para 9 The Policy in this case is in a standard form. The policy for Burglary and House Breaking in United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures P Ltd. supra and the policy in this case are identical. If there is any ambiguity or doubt the clause in the Policy should be interpreted in favour of the insured. But we see no ambiguity in the relevant clause of the policy and the rule of contra proferentem is not applicable. Para 12 For the aforementioned reasons we uphold the order of the MRTP Commission and dismiss the Appeal with no order as to costs. Para 13 RULE OF CONSTRUCTION Rule of contra proferentem Verba chartarum fortius accipiuntur contra proferentem What is. Held the rule states that ambiguity in the wording of the policy is to be resolved against the party who prepared it. MacGillivray s case Colinvaux s Law of Insurance referred. Para 10 CASES REFERRED 1.United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures P Ltd. JT 2016 1 SC 147 Para 4.1 2.United India Assurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal JT 2004 8 SC 8 Para 5 3.General Assurance Society Ltd. v. Chandmull Jain and Anr. 1966 3 SCR 500 Para 11 L. NAGESWARA RAO J. 1. The Appellant is a wholly owned Public Sector Undertaking of the Government of Orissa. The Appellant finances medium and large scale industries within the State of Orissa and is also involved in setting up joint sector industries with private entrepreneurs. The Appellant extended a term loan of Rs. 40 74 000 to M s. Josna Casting Centre Orissa Pvt. Ltd. As the loan amount was not repaid the Appellant exercising its power under Section 29 of the State Finance Corporation Act 1951 took over the assets of M s. Josna Casting Centre Orissa Private Limited on 14 02 1992. On 23 01 1996 the Appellant insured the said assets with Respondent No. 1 for a sum of Rs. 46 00 000 under the Miscellaneous Accident Policy Rs. 60 40 000 under the Fire Policy and Rs. 46 00 000 under the Burglary and House Breaking Policy. 2. The seized assets were put to auction by the Appellant on 22 01 1997 at which point of time it was detected that some parts of the plant and machinery were missing from the factory premises. The Appellant registered an FIR on 25 01 1997 in the Remona Police Station Balasore regarding the theft burglary of the plant and machinery. On 07 02 1997 the Appellant informed Respondent No. 1 about the theft and requested for issuance of a claim form. A claim was lodged with Respondent No. 1 on 16 12 1997 for an amount of Rs. 34 40 650 under the Burglary and House Breaking Policy. The valuation reports given by GEC Calcutta the machines supplier and Alpha Transformer Ltd. Bhubaneswar were relied upon by the Appellant Claimant. The claim of the Appellant was repudiated by Respondent No. 1 on 31 03 1998 on the ground that the alleged loss did not come within the purview of the insurance policy. 3. The Appellant filed compensation application No. 45 of 2001 under Section 12 B read with Section 36 A of the Monopolies and Restrictive Trade Practices MRTP Act 1969 which was rejected by the MRTP Commission New Delhi by its Order dated 17 08 2005. Aggrieved by the said Order the Appellant has preferred the present Appeal. 4. Mr. Raj Kumar Mehta counsel for the Appellant took us through the proposal form for Burglary and House Breaking Insurance Business Premises. The scope of cover in the said proposal form is as follows SCOPE OF COVER This Insurance Policy provides cover against loss or damage by Burglary or House breaking i.e. theft following an actual forcible and violent entry of and or exit from the premises in respect of contents of offices warehouses shops etc. and cash in safe or strong room and also damage caused to the premises except as detailed below 4.1 It was further submitted by Mr. Mehta that the rule of contra proferentem would be applicable to the present case and he relied upon the judgment of this Court in United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures P Ltd. reported at JT 2016 1 SC 147 2016 3 SCC 49 . 5. Mr. Mehta submitted that the words theft following an actual forcible and violent entry or exit from the premises are with reference only to house breaking and not burglary. According to him forcible and violent entry is not necessary for making a valid claim under the policy. It would be sufficient that there is theft of certain goods from the factory premises which fact has been proved by the Appellant. Mr. Mehta referred to a judgment of this Court in United India Assurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal reported in JT 2004 8 SC 8 2004 8 SCC 644 which related to a claim pertaining to a theft and attempted to distinguish it. He submitted that the clause in the policy in that case is different from that involved in the present case. He urged that the Commission committed an error in relying upon the said judgment to reject the Claim Application for the Appellant. 6. Mr. Salil Paul Advocate for Respondent No.1 submitted that there is no difference in the policies involved in the case cited supra and the instant case. He also urged that an insurance policy is akin to a commercial contract and has to be construed strictly. Mr. Paul submitted that a forcible entry and or exit is compulsory for maintainability of a claim under the policy. 7. Having considered the submissions made on both sides we are of the opinion that there is no error committed by the MRTP Commission in rejecting the Claim of the Appellant. It is clear from the facts of the present case that the Appellant has made out a case of theft without a forcible entry. The case of the Appellant is that forcible entry is not required for a claim to be made under the policy. Following the well accepted principle that a contract of insurance which is like any other commercial contract should be interpreted strictly we are of the opinion that the policy covers loss or damage by burglary or house breaking which have been explained as theft following an actual forcible and violent entry from the premises. A plain reading of the policy would show that a forcible entry should precede the theft and unless they are proved the claim cannot be accepted. The provisions of the policy in United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal supra read as under THE COMPANY HEREBY AGREES subject to the terms and conditions contained herein endorsed or otherwise expressed hereon that if the property hereinafter described or any part thereof be LOST or DAMAGED by BURGLARY and or HOUSE BREAKING or ANY DAMAGE be caused to the premises to be made good by the insured from BURGLARY and or HOUSE BREAKING or any attempt thereat. 7.1 The term burglary and or house breaking has been defined in terms of the policy which are as follows Burglary and or house breaking shall mean theft involving entry to or exit from the premises stated therein by forcible and violent means or following assault or violence or threat thereof to the insured or to his employees or to the members of his family. 8. A comparison of the above terms as defined in the policy in the case of United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal supra and the scope of cover in the proposal form in the instant case are similar. This Court in the said judgment of United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Harchand Rai Chandan Lal supra considered the scope of a policy involving burglary and house breaking and held as follows The policy is a contract between the parties and both parties are bound by the terms of contract. As per the definition of the word burglary followed with violence makes it clear that if any theft is committed it should necessarily be preceded with violence i.e. entry into the premises for committing theft should involve force or violence or threat to insurer or to his employees or to the members of his family. Therefore the element of force and violence is a condition precedent for burglary and housebreaking. The term burglary as defined in the English Dictionary means an illegal entry into the building with an intent to commit crime such as theft. But in absence of violence or force the insurer cannot claim indemnification against the insurance company. The terms of the policy have to be construed as it is and we cannot add or subtract something. Howsoever liberally we may construe the policy but we cannot take liberalism to the extent of substituting the words which are not intended. It is true that in common parlance the term burglary would mean theft but it has to be preceded with force or violence. If the element of force and violence is not present then the insurer cannot claim compensation against theft from the insurance company. This expression appearing in the insurance policy came up for interpretation before the English Courts and the English Courts in no uncertain terms laid down that burglary or theft has to be preceded with force or violence in order to be indemnified by the insurance company. In this connection reference may be made to the statement of law as summarized in Halsbury s Laws of England Fourth Edition 2003 Reissue Para 646. It reads as under 646. Forcible and violent entry. The terms of a burglary insurance may exclude liability in certain circumstances unless there is forcible and violent entry into the premises. If so the entry must be obtained by the use of both force and violence or the definition is not satisfied and the policy does not apply. An entry obtained by turning the handle of an outside door or by using a skeleton key though sufficient to constitute a criminal offence is not within the policy since the element of violence is absent. However an entry obtained by picking the lock or forcing back the catch by means of an instrument involves the use of violence and is therefore covered. The policy may be so framed as to apply only to violent entry from the outside or the violent entry into a room within the insured premises may be sufficient. In any case the violence must be connected with the act of entry if the entry is obtained without violence the subsequent use of violence to effect the theft as for instance where a show case is broken open does not bring the loss within the policy. 9. It is well settled law that there is no difference between a contract of insurance and any other contract and that it should be construed strictly without adding or deleting anything from the terms thereof. On applying the said principle we have no doubt that a forcible entry is required for a claim to be allowed under the policy for burglary house breaking. 10. We proceed to deal with the submission made by counsel for the Appellant regarding the rule of contra proferentem. The Common Law rule of construction verba chartarum fortius accipiuntur contra proferentem means that ambiguity in the wording of the policy is to be resolved against the party who prepared it. MacGillivray on Insurance Law 1 deals with the rule of contra proferentem as follows The contra proferentem rule of construction arises only where there is a wording employed by those drafting the clause which leaves the court unable to decide by ordinary principles of interpretation which of two meanings is the right one. One must not use the rule to create the ambiguity one must find the ambiguity first. The words should receive their ordinary and natural meaning unless that is displaced by a real ambiguity either appearing on the face of the policy or possibly by extrinsic evidence of surrounding circumstances. footnotes omitted Colinvaux s Law of Insurance 2 propounds the contra proferentem rule as under Quite apart from contradictory clauses in policies ambiguities are common in them and it is often very uncertain what the parties to them mean. In such cases the rule is that the policy being drafted in language chosen by the insurers must be taken most strongly against them. It is construed contra proferentes against those who offer it. In a doubtful case the turn of the scale ought to be given against the speaker because he has not clearly and fully expressed himself. Nothing is easier than for the insurers to express themselves in plain terms. The assured cannot put his own meaning upon a policy but where it is ambiguous it is to be construed in the sense in which he might reasonably have understood it. If the insurers wish to escape liability under given circumstances they must use words admitting of no possible doubt. But a clause is only to be contra proferentes in cases of real ambiguity. One must not use the rule to create an ambiguity. On must find the ambiguity first. Even where a clause by itself is ambiguous if by looking at the whole policy its meaning becomes clear there is no room for the application of the doctrine. So also where if one meaning is given to a clause the rest of the policy becomes clear the policy should be construed accordingly. footnotes omitted 11. This court in General Assurance Society Ltd. v. Chandmull Jain and Anr. reported in 1966 3 SCR 500 held that there is no difference between a contract of insurance and any other contract except that in a contract of insurance there is a requirement of uberima fides i.e. good faith on the part of the insured and the contract is likely to be construed contra proferentes i.e. against the company in case of ambiguity or doubt. It was further held in the said judgment that the duty of the Court is to interpret the words in which the contract is expressed by the parties and it is not for the Court to make a new contract however reasonable. 12. In United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures P Ltd. supra cited by the Counsel for the Appellant it was held that there is no ambiguity in the insurance policy and so the rule of contra proferentem was not applicable. A standard policy of insurance is different from other Contracts and in a claim under a standard policy the rule of contra proferentem is to be applied. The Policy in this case is in a standard form. The policy for Burglary and House Breaking in United India Insurance Co. Ltd. v. Orient Treasures P Ltd. supra and the policy in this case are identical. If there is any ambiguity or doubt the clause in the Policy should be interpreted in favour of the insured. But we see no ambiguity in the relevant clause of the policy and the rule of contra proferentem is not applicable. 13. For the aforementioned reasons we uphold the order of the MRTP Commission and dismiss the Appeal with no order as to costs. 0 HEADNOTE CONSTITUTION OF INDIA 1950 Article 32 Army service Petitioner dismissed from service for having abetted the commission of offence of theft Principal accused acquitted of the offence Abetment fails when substantive offence is not established against the principal offender Respondents directed to pay the entire pension and other entitlements to the petitioner. CRIMINAL LAW Abetment Abetment of offence of theft Principal accused acquitted Abetment fails when substantive offence is not established against the principal offender. SERVICE AND LABOUR LAW Army Service Reinstatement Petitioner dismissed from service for having abetted the commission of offence of theft Principal accused acquitted of the offence Abetment fails when substantive offence is not established against the principal offender Respondents directed to pay the entire pension and other entitlements to the petitioner Constitution of India 1950 Article 32. HELD Having examined the facts in the instant case we are of the view that the ratio laid down in Faguna Kanta Nath s case and later followed in Madan Raj Bhandari s case is attracted. The petitioner was charged with the offence of abetment by conspiracy of the commission of the offence of theft by Major Trilok Chand. The High Court of Allahabad has clearly held that there was no evidence that Major Trilok Chand has committed the theft therefore unless the substantive offence against the principal offender is established the question of abettor being held guilty under these circumstances does not arise. The petitioner is alleged to have entered into a conspiracy alongwith eight others and abetted the commission of the offence. All the other alleged abettors are acquitted and the principal offender Major Trilok Chand is also acquitted and the petitioner alone remains in the picture as one having abetted the offence by entering into conspiracy. It is axiomatic that there cannot be a conspiracy of one. In Topan Das v. The State of Bombay 1955 2 SCR 881 it was held that two or more persons must be parties to such an agreement and one person along can never be held guilty of criminal conspiracy for the reason that one cannot conspire with oneself. Para 9 CASES REFERRED 1. Lt. Col. TS Harbans Singh Sandhu v. Union of India and Others Judgment dated 22.1.1978. 2. Madan Raj Bhandari v. State of Rajasthan 1970 1 SCR 688 3. Jamuna Singh v. State of Bihar AIR 1967 SC 553 4. Faguna Kanta Nath v. The State of Assam 1959 Supp. 2 SCR 1 5. Topan Das v. The State of Bombay 1955 2 SCR 881 REDDY J. 1. This petition is filed under Article 32 of the Constitution of India seeking an appropriate writ directing the respondents i.e. Union of India and the Chief of the Army Staff to restore the petitioner to service with all consequential benefits and grant of pension. 2. The petitioner entered the Indian Army in 1939 and served in Burma during the Second World War and later joined Indian National Army and fought under the leadership of the Netaji Subhash Chander Bose and on India attaining independence he rejoined Indian Army in 1948 and was promoted to the rank of Hawaldar. He was released from Army service on 15.10.1964 consequent to the reduction of manpower and consequently he joined Defence Security Corps on 14.9.1967 and served till 29.7.78. While serving in Defence Security Corps in 1976 at Pathankot he alongwith Major Trilok Chand who at the relevant time was serving as their Officer and nine others was charge sheeted by the Court martial. The charge against them was that Trilok Chand committed the theft of 250 wheel drums while getting them loaded in a civil truck and that the others abetted the commission of the said offence. Major Trilok Chand was found guilty and out of the nine abetters eight abetters were acquitted. Major Trilok Chand was awarded one year imprisonment. The petitioner was dismissed from the service with an imprisonment of 90 days in civil prison. Major Trilok Chand questioned the proceedings of the Court martial before the High Court of Allahabad in Writ Petition No. 13161 of 1981. The High Court allowed the writ petition and held that there was no evidence that it was Trilok Chand who removed the wheel drums and consequently the High Court found that there was no material to support the charge of theft. The review petition filed by the Union of India was dismissed by the High Court and the S.L.P. No. 9294 of 1987 filed by the Union of India in the Supreme Court was dismissed on 5.10.87. Consequently Major Trilok Chand has been reinstated in the service. 3. In view of the fact that the main accused has been acquitted and reinstated in service the petitioner requested the authorities to review his case and give the necessary relief but his request was rejected. Hence the present petition. 4. Learned counsel for the petitioner submitted that since the principal accused Major Trilok Chand has been acquitted of the charge of theft and has also been reinstated the petitioner who was only charged of abetment of the said offence of theft can not be found guilty. 5. In support of his submissions learned counsel has relied on some of the decisions of this Court in Faguna Kanta Nath v. The State of Assam 1959 Supp. 2 SCR 1 Jamuna Singh v. State of Bihar AIR 1967 SC 553 and Madan Raj Bhandari v. State of Rajasthan 1970 1 SCR 688. 6. In Faguna Kanta Nath s case the appellant was tried for an offence under Section 165A of the Indian Penal Code for having abetted the commission of an offence by an officer. The said officer was acquitted on the ground that no offence under Section 161 was committed. Consequently the Court held that appellant s conviction for the offence of abetment was not maintainable. 7. This case is referred to in Jamuna Singh s case and it is held that it cannot be held in law that a person cannot ever be convicted of abetting a certain offence when the person alleged to have committed that offence in consequence of the abetment has been acquitted. The question of the abettor s guilt depends on the nature of the act abetted and the manner in which the abetment was made. The offence of abetment is complete when the alleged abettor has instigated another or engaged with another in a conspiracy to commit the offence. It is not necessary for the offence of abetment that the action abetted must be committed. It is only in the case of a person abetting an offence by intentionally aiding another to commit that offence that the charge of abetment against him would be expected to fail when the person alleged to have committed the offence is acquitted of that offence. 8. Madan Raj Bhandari s is a case where the appellant was charged with having abetted one Mst. Radha in causing miscarriage to a woman and that Mst. Radha was acquitted but the appellant was convicted. This Court referred to the principle laid down in Faguna Kantha Nath s case and held that the facts of the present case fell within the rule that a charge of abetment fails ordinarily when the substantive offence is not established against the principal offender. It may not be necessary to multiply the discussions on this aspect. 9. Having examined the facts in the instant case we are of the view that the ratio laid down in Faguna Kanta Nath s case and later followed in Madan Raj Bhandari s case is attracted. The petitioner was charged with the offence of abetment by conspiracy of the commission of the offence of theft by Major Trilok Chand. The High Court of Allahabad has clearly held that there was no evidence that Major Trilok Chand has committed the theft therefore unless the substantive offence against the principal offender is established the question of abettor being held guilty under these circumstances does not arise. The petitioner is alleged to have entered into a conspiracy alongwith eight others and abetted the commission of the offence. All the other alleged abettors are acquitted and the principal offender Major Trilok Chand is also acquitted and the petitioner alone remains in the picture as one having abetted the offence by entering into conspiracy. It is axiomatic that there cannot be a conspiracy of one. In Topan Das v. The State of Bombay 1955 2 SCR 881 it was held that two or more persons must be parties to such an agreement and one person along can never be held guilty of criminal conspiracy for the reason that one cannot conspire with oneself. 10. We may also mention here that under similar circumstances this Court in Writ Petition No. 553 of 1972 Lt. Col. TS Harbans Singh Sandhu v. Union of India and Others Judgment dated 22.11.78 directed the payment of pension and the gratuity as per the rules. 11. For all these reasons we direct the respondents to pay the entire pension gratuity and other entitlements to the petitioner as per the rules within four months. The Writ Petition is accordingly allowed with costs. 0 HEADNOTE ELECTRICITY LAWS Indian Electricity Act 1910 Sections 39 and 44 Electricity supply Tampering of electricity meter and theft of electricity by two industrial users a company and a partnership firm located side by side Theft detected by surprise raid during the night Managing director of the company and the partners of the firm convicted by the trial court and sentenced to three months imprisonment besides monetary fine Lower appellate court dismissing the appeals High Court also dismissing the revision Validity. Held large scale theft of electricity being an alarming problem causing enormous loss to the Electricity Suppliers should be dealt with firmly and besides disconnection of supply and conviction of the erring persons heavy monetary fine should be levied. In the instant cases theft of enormous electricity having been established no interference was called for in so far as the conviction of the appellants is concerned. However in view of peculiar facts since the appellants had already served out a part of the sentence instead of making them serve out the remainder term after a lapse of 17 years in the interest of justice monetary fine imposed by the lower court enhanced. HELD On consideration of the totality of the entire case we do not find any merit in the submissions made on behalf of the appellants. In our view no interference is called for in the impugned judgment so far as conviction of the appellants under Sections 39 and 44 of the Act is concerned and consequently we uphold the impugned judgment as far as conviction of the appellants is concerned. Para 28 We have also heard the learned counsel for the appellants on the point of sentence. It was submitted before the Trial Court and before this Court also that it is the first offence of the appellants. They have family members and minor dependents. Appellant number 2 is a lady. More than 17 years have elapsed and now sending the appellants to jail for serving out the remaining part of their sentence would be extremely harsh. The appellants have already served out a part of their sentence and sending them back to jail to serve out the remaining sentence would cause tremendous hardship to the appellants and their family members. Para 29 Large scale theft of electricity is a very alarming problem faced by all the State Electricity Boards in our country which is causing loss to the State revenue running into hundreds of crores every year. In our considered view after proper adjudication of the cases of all those who are found to be guilty of the offence of committing theft of electricity apart from the sentence of conviction the Court should invariably impose heavy fine making theft of electricity a wholly non profitable venture. The most effective step to curb this tendency perhaps could be to discontinue supply of electricity to those consumers for temporarily or permanently who have been caught abstracting electricity in a clandestine manner on more than one occasion. The legislature may consider incorporating this suggestion as a form of punishment by amending Section 39 of the Indian Electricity Act of 1910. Para 30 On consideration of the peculiar facts and circumstances of the case where the appellants have already served out a part of the sentence and instead of compelling them to serve out the remaining sentence after lapse of 17 years in the interest of justice we deem it appropriate to increase the fine from Rs.40 000 each to Rs.3 00 000 each in case of appellants number 1 and 3 Jagmodhan Mehatabsing Gujaral and Harcharanpalsing Nanda respectively and from Rs.20 000 to Rs.2 00 000 under Section 39 of the Act in case of appellant number 2 Mrs. Rupender Kaur Harcharanpalsing . The appellants are further sentenced to pay a fine of Rs.5 000 each under Section 44 of the Act. Para 31 Dalveer Bhandari J. 1. Leave granted. 2. This appeal is directed against the judgment of the High Court of Judicature at Bombay dated 23.1.2006 in Criminal Revision Application No.458 2005 and Criminal Revision Application No.11 of 2006. 3. The appellants in this appeal had been convicted by the Additional Chief Judicial Magistrate First Class Pune by the judgment dated 21.12.1996 under Sections 39 and 44 of the Indian Electricity Act 1910 hereinafter referred to as the Act and were also directed to pay a fine. These appellants were directed to suffer three months rigorous imprisonment. Appellants number 1 3 were also directed to pay a fine of Rs.40 000 each and appellant number 2 to pay a fine of Rs.20 000 under Section 39 of the Act. 4. The appellants aggrieved by the said judgment of the Additional Chief Judicial Magistrate Pune filed an appeal before the Ad hoc Additional Sessions Judge Pune being Appeal No. 12 of 1997. The learned Additional Sessions Judge again evaluated the entire evidence and examined the documents on record and reached the same finding and consequently dismissed the appeal filed by the appellants. 5. The Criminal Revision filed against the said judgment of the Additional Sessions Judge was dismissed by the High Court of Judicature at Bombay vide judgment dated 23.1.2006. Both the learned Additional Sessions Judge and the High Court upheld the decision of the Additional Chief Judicial Magistrate. 6. The brief facts which are relevant to dispose of this appeal are recapitulated as under. 7. Appellant number 1 was the Managing Director of M s. Nanda Glass Industries Pvt. Ltd. located at Gat No. 679 680 Valu Taluka Bhor and appellants number 2 and 3 are the partners of the partnership firm M s. Technoframes. Both the industries were adjacent to each other. 8. The Consumer number of M s. Nanda Glass Industries Pvt. Ltd. is 17941 900102 3 with sanctioned load CD 225 KVA for toughening of glass. The Consumer number of M s. Technoframes is 1 416 with Meter No. 9030013 TPHR 605 dated 10.7.1986. The sanctioned load of Consumer number 1 416 is 60 H.P. for toughening of glass. 9. Upon receiving information that there was theft of electric energy being committed by the appellants at these two electric connections for their industry at night the complainant V. G. Kokane the then Dy. Executive Engineer and in charge of flying squad of MSEB and Executive Engineer Kadam with their other testing staff etc. and two Panchas went to M s. Nanda Glass Industries Pvt. Ltd. and Technoframes in the intervening night of 3 4.10.1989 for the purpose of inspection and checking. 10. It was found that the power of 225 KVA was sanctioned to accused no. 1 on contract demand with H.T. metering for the purposes of recording consumption. One iron box was provided for Trivector Meter. The box was closed and duly sealed under the seal of M.S.E.B. There was CTPC unit provided at D.P. Pole from which the wires were brought into the Meter Box through a conduit pipe so that they could not be tampered. The appellants dislocated the conduit pipe at the bend and socket. They had cut and removed voltage wire of one phase and current wire of another phase so that actual consumption could not be recorded by the meter. Similarly the appellants by tampering meters ensured that actual consumption of power used for main furnaces and blower was not recorded from December 1987 so that there could not be any difficulty in putting explanation if any called upon by the M.S.E.B. The daily consumption of power was to be recorded by the consumer in prescribed G 7 form but it was found that it was written only once in every month. On 3.5.1988 while it was inspected by the Testing Division abruptly abnormal difference was found between the entries noted by the consumer in G 7 form and the reading recorded by the officers of the M.S.E.B. The copies of these forms were attached to the complaint. 11. In the intervening night of 3 4 10 1989 when the complainant and his companions went to the premises they found one watchman on the gate who was called Bapu Bhagwan Alder. He was said to be a Shift Operator cum Supervisor and he showed the actual condition of the connections to them. Bapu Bhagwan Alder had put his signatures on the Inspection Reports drawn on the spot being exhibit Nos.90 and 91. He also voluntarily gave one statement in writing marked as exhibit No. 80 stating that the industry was actually working at the time of the visit. The factory was normally working in three shifts. It was found at the place of L.T. Connection supplied for Technoframes that though the said company was bearing a different name the electric power was being used for toughening of glass in M s. Nanda Glass Industries. The members of the raid team along with complainant found drastic changes and tampering done by the accused in the said connection wherein three incoming wires and other three outgoing wires of the meter were joined together at their respective ends by taking them out from outgoing phase of the terminal box of the meter. Therefore the meter was totally by passed and it was not recording the electricity which was consumed. The meter terminal cover and the seals of the M.S.E.B. were not available and there was 100 theft of energy of 60 H.P. The complainant V.G. Kokane had taken photographs to show the tampering of the electric connection and taking of such photographs was indicated in the seizure panchanama. 12. The appellants did not pay any amount more than the minimum charges to the Board whereas the actual consumption of the electricity was much more. It was assessed by the complainant as an Expert in the field that there was consumption of 10 00 000 units and 16075 VA power worth of Rs.12 00 000 from H.T. connection whereas 5 00 000 units worth of Rs.4 50 000 from L.T. connection and the theft of energy of Rs.16 50 000 committed by them. The photographs of the actual position seen by the raiding party were taken on the spot and that they were produced in the police station during investigation. Similarly the original seals of H.T. Meter Box were cut and seized in a closed packet duly sealed under the signatures of the Panchas which were also produced by them in the police station. As it was likely that there will be rejoining or change in the position of the L.T. Connection I 416 the room in which it was installed was duly locked and the lock was sealed with paper bearing signatures of the Panchas was pasted on it. Both the keys of the lock were also given by the complainant in the police station along with the complaint. The complaint was registered at the Bhor Police Station at about 7.30 p.m. on 4.10.1989. The original panchnama drawn by the M.S.E.B. officials and the Panchas at the time of actual raid were also produced by the complainant with true statement of consumption of M s. Nanda Glass Industries for the purposes of evidence in support of the allegations. 13. After proper investigation of the entire case the charges against the appellants were framed under Sections 39 and 44 of the Electricity Act to which the appellants pleaded not guilty. It may be pertinent to mention that the presence of accused Ravindra Birbal Khadake could not be secured in spite of issuing warrants and the Chief Judicial Magistrate was pleased to order for separation of trial against him. We are not concerned with the said accused in this appeal. 14. In the trial of the instant case the prosecution had examined seven witnesses Ramchandra Paigude PW1 attested the panchanama of exhibit 74. It was drawn during the surprise visit by the raiding party in the night. He also proved exhibit 78 a sealed packet that was opened in the court containing three seats which were removed from the meter in the premises of the glass industry. Shankar Anpat PW2 Executive Engineer Lokhote PW3 Junior Engineer Security Officer complainant Vijay Kokane PW4 Dy. Executive Engineer and in charge of flying squad and Pathan PW5 Junior Vigilance Officer were employees of the MSEB. These officials of the board described how they had visited the factory and detected existence of fraudulent means of abstraction of electricity without recording consumption in the meter. PW6 is one of the panch witnesses who had attested exhibit 101. In his presence another panch had climbed atop the meter room located in the premises of Technoframes. It was found that planks in the roof were newly fitted with fresh nailing. Vishnu Mane PW7 had investigated the offence and sent charge sheet to the court. 15. Ramchandra Paigude PW1 an independent witness fully supported the prosecution version. He was under no obligation to favour the Board officials. He had also stated that the watchman Wadkar had called Bapu Aldar and he was introduced as shift supervisor and had taken the raiding party to the electric installations. 16. The defence of the appellants is that of denial of abstraction and dishonest consumption or use of electric energy by them directly or by any artificial means or the means not authorized by the licensee. 17. The appellants were found guilty of the offences punishable under Sections 39 and 44 of the Electricity Act. According to the Trial Court the prosecution had succeeded in establishing the commission of theft of the electric energy worth about Rs.16 50 000 . 18. The appellants aggrieved by the judgment of the Trial Court preferred an appeal before the learned Sessions Court Pune. The first Appellate Court again examined in detail the entire evidence and the arguments advanced by the parties. The first Appellate Court also examined the relevant decided cases of this Court and other courts. The appeal filed by the appellants was dismissed by a detailed and comprehensive judgment dated 27.12.2005. 19. The appellants preferred a revision petition before the High Court of Judicature at Bombay which was dismissed vide order dated 23.1.2006. The appellants aggrieved by the said judgment of the High Court have preferred this appeal. 20. It was submitted by the appellants that the complainant was not authorized to file FIR. The Trial Court had considered this argument of the appellants. The Trial Court has correctly mentioned in its judgment that by the amendment in the provisions of Section 50 the word Government or a State Electricity Board or an Electric Inspector or a person aggrieved by same has been amended and the officers of the State Electricity Board or a person aggrieved by the theft are authorized by the notification to lodge a complaint. The complainant was fully justified in filing the complaint. We do not find any merit in this argument of the appellants. 21. The appellants submitted that there is manifest error in the judgment of the Trial Court which was affirmed by the first appellate court and the High Court by which the appellants were convicted and sentenced to three months rigorous imprisonment on the ground that the theft of electricity to the extent of an amount of Rs.17 35 453.52 was extracted by the appellants whereas the Civil Court had come to the conclusion and passed the decree in favour of the respondent Maharashtra State Electricity Board in Civil Suit No.156 92 for only Rs.3 07 999.74. 22. On evaluation of the entire evidence and documents on record when the case of theft has been fully proved then whether the theft of energy was to the extent of Rs.17 35 453.52 or Rs.3 07 999.74 really makes no difference as there was theft of energy on a large scale for a long time. The appellants cannot take advantage of the fact that the respondents had not appealed against the judgment of the Joint Civil Judge Senior Division Pune who had passed the decree for Rs.3 07 999.74. 23. The appellants had also alleged that 48 hours notice was not given to the appellants before conducting the raid. 24. The Trial Court had dealt with the aspect of giving 48 hours notice before conducting the raid. In a case of a surprise raid 48 hours notice to the appellants is not envisaged by the Legislature and otherwise also it would have been counter productive because there was a strong possibility of obliterating and or destroying the entire evidence to connect the appellants with the crime. Moreover even if it is so accepted it is on record that the Watchman and Bapu Bhagwan Alder were found present in the premises on behalf of the appellants and that they did assist the raiding team to carry on their work. It is reported by the police in reply to summons that Bapu Bhagwan Alder was serving in some Glass Factory in Pune but he could not be traced out for the purpose of tendering the evidence before the Court. In fact it was possible for the appellants to bring him in the box at least as defence witness to state that he had no concern with the industry of the accused. Moreover the employment record or muster roll of the Industry of the accused was not brought for inspection by this Court. Suppression of this clearly gives rise to considerable substance in the allegations of the prosecution. By and large this negatives the arguments on behalf of the appellants that the raid is illegal or otherwise defective. Therefore we do not find any substance in this submission made by the appellants. 25. The appellants further submitted that the courts in the impugned judgment ought to have appreciated the circumstance that more than 17 years have elapsed that one of the accused appellants is a lady partner in the firm and that in fact the public prosecutor had consented and argued for reducing the sentence. 26. The appellants further submitted that the courts below have not properly considered the entire case in the proper perspective because there was no evidence about the tampering with the meter. 27. In the Panchnama it is categorically mentioned that exhibit no. 91 is the Inspection Sheet pertaining to M s. Technoframes Consumer No. I 416 and the observations made are as under Meter Terminal Box Seal and cover missing. All the coming and outgoing wires are connected together in the incoming hole resulting total buy passing of meter and no consumption is recorded in the meter. Therefore we find no substance in this submission that there was no evidence of tampering of electricity meters by the appellants. 28. On consideration of the totality of the entire case we do not find any merit in the submissions made on behalf of the appellants. In our view no interference is called for in the impugned judgment so far as conviction of the appellants under Sections 39 and 44 of the Act is concerned and consequently we uphold the impugned judgment as far as conviction of the appellants is concerned. 29. We have also heard the learned counsel for the appellants on the point of sentence. It was submitted before the Trial Court and before this Court also that it is the first offence of the appellants. They have family members and minor dependents. Appellant number 2 is a lady. More than 17 years have elapsed and now sending the appellants to jail for serving out the remaining part of their sentence would be extremely harsh. The appellants have already served out a part of their sentence and sending them back to jail to serve out the remaining sentence would cause tremendous hardship to the appellants and their family members. 30. Large scale theft of electricity is a very alarming problem faced by all the State Electricity Boards in our country which is causing loss to the State revenue running into hundreds of crores every year. In our considered view after proper adjudication of the cases of all those who are found to be guilty of the offence of committing theft of electricity apart from the sentence of conviction the Court should invariably impose heavy fine making theft of electricity a wholly non profitable venture. The most effective step to curb this tendency perhaps could be to discontinue supply of electricity to those consumers for temporarily or permanently who have been caught abstracting electricity in a clandestine manner on more than one occasion. The legislature may consider incorporating this suggestion as a form of punishment by amending Section 39 of the Indian Electricity Act of 1910. 31. On consideration of the peculiar facts and circumstances of the case where the appellants have already served out a part of the sentence and instead of compelling them to serve out the remaining sentence after lapse of 17 years in the interest of justice we deem it appropriate to increase the fine from Rs.40 000 each to Rs.3 00 000 each in case of appellants number 1 and 3 Jagmodhan Mehatabsing Gujaral and Harcharanpalsing Nanda respectively and from Rs.20 000 to Rs.2 00 000 under Section 39 of the Act in case of appellant number 2 Mrs. Rupender Kaur Harcharanpalsing . The appellants are further sentenced to pay a fine of Rs.5 000 each under Section 44 of the Act. 32. The appellants in case have already paid fine imposed by the Trial Court under Section 39 of the Act then the appellants are directed to deposit only the remaining amount of fine within a period of eight weeks from the date of this judgment. In case the amount of fine as directed by this Court under Sections 39 and 44 of the Act is not deposited within the stipulated time then the appellants shall be taken into custody to serve out the remaining part of their sentence as imposed by the Trial Court and upheld in the impugned judgment by the High Court. 33. This appeal is accordingly disposed of in terms of the aforesaid observations. 0 HEADNOTE SERVICE AND LABOUR LAWS Industrial Disputes Act 1947 Section 11A Workman Dismissal for misconduct Proportionality of punishment Employee of State Road Transport Corporation committing thefts of automobile parts from Depot Management instituting an enquiry proceedings and also initiating criminal proceedings Court absolving the employee in the criminal proceedings Enquiry proceedings establishing the theft Corporation dismissing the employee from service Before the Labour Court delinquent employee admitting the theft and pleading to be excused as being the first offence Labour Court upholding the dismissal Single Judge of High Court on a writ filed by the delinquent holding that the dismissal was disproportionate and therefore directing his reinstatement with continuity in service but without back wages Division Bench dismissing the appeal Validity Whether dismissal was disproportionate to the act of misconduct. Allowing the appeal of the Corporation held that the employee having committed a serious misconduct of theft and admitted the same before the Labour Court and thus having lost the confidence of the employer the High Court erred in considering the punishment of dismissal to be disproportionate to the act of misconduct. Order of Labour Court upholding the dismissal accordingly restored. HELD In our view the theft committed by the respondent amounts to misconduct and therefore we have no hesitation to set aside the orders passed by the learned Single Judge and also of the Division Bench and restore the order of removal of the respondent from service. When the Labour Court has proved the charges no interference by the learned Single Judge or by the Division Bench of the High Court was called for. In the instant case the jurisdiction vested with the Labour Court has been exercised judiciously and fairly. In our opinion the conclusion arrived at by the High Court in ordering reinstatement continuity of service was shockingly disproportionate to the nature of charges already proved which is in the nature of theft. Para 22 It is also not open to the Tribunal and Courts to substitute their subjective opinion in place of the one arrived at the domestic Tribunal. In the instant case the opinion arrived at by the Corporation was rightly accepted by the Tribunal but not by the Court. We therefore hold that the order of reinstatement passed by the Single Judge and the Division Bench of the High Court is contrary to the law on the basis of a catena of decisions of this Court. In such cases there is no place for generosity or sympathy on the part of the judicial forums for interfering with the quantum of punishment of removal which cannot be justified. Similarly the High Court can modify the punishment in exercise of its jurisdiction under Article 226 of the Constitution only when it finds that the punishment imposed is shockingly disproportionate to the charges proved. Para 23 Interfering therefore with the quantum of punishment of the respondent herein is not called for. In our opinion the respondent has no legal right to continue in the Corporation. As held by this Court in a catena of judgments that the loss of confidence occupies the primary factor and not the amount of money and that sympathy and generosity cannot be a factor which is permissible in law in such matters. When the employee is found guilty of theft there is nothing wrong in the Corporation losing confidence or faith in such an employee and awarding punishment of removal. In such cases there is no place of generosity or place of sympathy on the part of the judicial forums and interfering with the quantum of the punishment. Para 24 For the aforementioned reasons we hold that the orders passed by learned Single Judge and as modified and affirmed by the learned Judges of the Division Bench in Writ Appeal No. 108 of 2005 dated 29.06.2005 deserves to be set aside. Accordingly we do so. Para 25 Dr. AR. Lakshmanan J. 1. Leave granted. 2. The Department Manager A.P.S.R.T.C. is the appellant in this appeal. The respondent joined as cleaner in the A.P.S.R.T.C. in short the Corporation on 02.10.1976. While working as mechanic he was involved in a serious case of theft. On 23 24.08.1986 while working in the night shift he committed a theft of Fuel Injection Pump. This apart he was also involved in stealing an alternator bearing while working in the night shift on 11.09.1986. 3. He also unauthorisedly entered into the tyre section of the depot and stole a new tube of 900 x 20 size on 23 24.09.1986. A sponge sheet was also stolen from the garage of Gajuwaka Depot where he was working. A charge sheet was issued to the respondent framing four charges. 4. The charges are as under 1.For having stolen the Corporation property of fuel injection pump bearing No. AVD 2305 which was fitted to the engine No. 170207 during the night shift on 23 24.08.86 in the garage which constitutes misconduct under Reg. No. 28 x of APSRTC Employees conduct Reg.1963. 2. For having stolen the Corporation property of an alternator bearing No. 3440 during the night shift of 11.09.86 when it was fitted to the parked vehicle in the garage which constitutes misconduct under Reg. No. 28 x of APSRTC Employees Conduct Regulations 1963. 3. For having unauthorisedly entered into the tyres section and stolen the new tube of 900 x 20 size on 23 24.09.86 which constitutes misconduct under Reg. No. 28 x of APSRTC Employees Conduct Regulations 1963. 4. For having stolen the sponge sheets SR from the garage of Gajuwaka depot which constitutes misconduct under Reg. No. 28 x of APSRTC Employees Conduct Regulations 1963. 5. An Enquiry Officer was appointed to enquire into the charges and submit a report. In the domestic enquiry conducted on the charges levelled against the respondent full and fair opportunity was given to him to defend himself. The Enquiry Officer on completion of the domestic enquiry had submitted a report holding the respondent guilty of all the charges that were levelled against him. 6. A criminal case was also initiated against the respondent in C.C. No. 751 1987. The Criminal Court by its judgment and order dated 16.05.1987 acquitted the respondent of the charges that were levelled against him. 7. Basing on the Enquiry Officer s report the Depot Manager on independently examining the matter came to a conclusion that orders of removal would be an appropriate punishment for the proved charges of theft. Accordingly the Depot Manager issued proceedings for removing the respondent from the services of the Corporation. 8. Aggrieved by the order of his removal the respondent raised an Industrial Dispute. In I.D. No. 139 1992 the Labour Court came to the conclusion that the charges holding that the respondent was involved in a case of theft of the property belonging to the Corporation were correctly proved and the punishment of removal was justified under the factual circumstances of the case. 9. Aggrieved by the award of the Labour Court the respondent preferred a writ petition before the High Court of Andhra Pradesh at Hyderabad. 10. The learned Single Judge of the High Court came to a conclusion that the charges of theft were correctly proved against the respondent. But however came to a conclusion that punishment of removal was not in consonance with the gravity of the charges proved against the respondent. Accordingly the High Court held that the Labour Court ought to have exercised its power under Section 11A of the Industrial Disputes Act. Accordingly the Single Judge held that the respondent had put in 12 years of unblemished service and deserved a lenient view in the matter. Hence by his judgment and order dated 31.12.2004 the learned Single Judge passed a judgment by setting aside the order of removal and directed reinstatement of the respondent with continuity of service but without back wages. 11. The appellant Corporation preferred a writ appeal before the Division Bench of the High Court under Clause 15 of Letters Patent. 12. By its impugned order dated 29.06.2005 the Division Bench of the High Court dismissed the writ appeal filed by the appellant herein. Aggrieved against the order passed by the Division Bench the above civil appeal has been filed in this Court. 13. We heard Mr. Mahesh Babu learned counsel for the appellant and Mr. Vijaya Bhaskar learned counsel for the respondent. Learned counsel for the appellant submitted that the High Court has failed to appreciate that the misconduct of theft involved in by the respondent was a serious misconduct warranting no less a punishment than removal from services of the Corporation and that the High Court has also failed to appreciate that the delinquent employee gave a statement in which he admitted that he had stolen the property of the Corporation but handed over the same to his friend for sale and that the Labour Court on the basis of the said evidence rightly removed the respondent from the services of the Corporation. Arguing further learned counsel for the appellant submitted that the Division Bench of the High Court has also failed to appreciate that once the Labour Court in its award passed orders of removal by taking into consideration the entire factual circumstances of the case it does not deserve interference. The High Court in its extraordinary jurisdiction under Article 226 of the Constitution could not interfere with the said order of removal. 14. Mr. Vijaya Bhaskar learned counsel for the respondent strenuously contended that the order passed by learned Single Judge and by the Division Bench of the High Court does not call for any interference and that the Division Bench of the High Court has ordered only reinstatement of the respondent without back wages and therefore the Corporation is not prejudiced in any manner. He further submitted that the respondent had put in 12 years of service and deserves a lenient view in the matter. 15. Learned counsel for the respondent further submitted that the respondent had an unblemished career in the past and therefore a lenient view should have been taken as rightly taken by the learned Single Judge and as modified by the Division Bench of the High Court in ordering only reinstatement. 16. We have carefully considered the rival submissions and perused the orders passed by the Labour Court and of the High Court and other annexures. In our opinion the High Court has failed to appreciate that the delinquent employee categorically admitted that he had stolen the property of the Corporation. The Labour Court on a careful perusal of the evidence rightly ordered removal of the respondent from service. When the delinquent employee admitted his guilt before the Enquiry Officer that he had handed over the alternator from pan shop to the police authorities and further deposed that he had handed over the stolen property and requested the Labour Court to excuse him since it was his first offence. The Tribunal rightly set aside the request by taking into consideration the entire factual circumstances on record and after careful examination of the same and held that the delinquent employee does not deserve any sympathy and therefore he ordered removal from service. 17. Learned Single Judge of the High Court likewise also failed to appreciate the statement given by the delinquent employee admitting the guilt and however ordered reinstatement continuity of service but without back wages. 18. Likewise the learned Judges of the Division Bench also failed to appreciate that once the Labour Court in its award held removal from service by taking into consideration the entire facts and circumstances of the case it does not deserve interference and that the High Court in its extraordinary jurisdiction under Article 226 of the Constitution could not have interfered with the said orders of the removal. 19. The enquiry reports also clearly reveal that the departmental enquiry was conducted after giving fair and reasonable opportunity to the delinquent official after following the procedure and as per the regulations. 20. The learned Single Judge considered the past conduct of the delinquent employee as one of the ground in taking a lenient view. In our view past conduct of workman is not relevant in departmental proceedings. Likewise the learned Single Judge has erred in holding that the workman did not involve in any misconduct of theft during his past services and on that ground granted reinstatement with continuity of service. 21. Learned Judges of the High Court have also failed to appreciate that once an employee lost the confidence of employer it would not be safe and in the interest of the Corporation to continue the employee in the service. The punishment imposed by the management in the facts and circumstances of the case is not disproportionate and that the punishment of removal from service is the just and reasonable and proportionate to the proved misconduct. 22. In our view the theft committed by the respondent amounts to misconduct and therefore we have no hesitation to set aside the orders passed by the learned Single Judge and also of the Division Bench and restore the order of removal of the respondent from service. When the Labour Court has proved the charges no interference by the learned Single Judge or by the Division Bench of the High Court was called for. In the instant case the jurisdiction vested with the Labour Court has been exercised judiciously and fairly. In our opinion the conclusion arrived at by the High Court in ordering reinstatement continuity of service was shockingly disproportionate to the nature of charges already proved which is in the nature of theft. 23. It is also not open to the Tribunal and Courts to substitute their subjective opinion in place of the one arrived at the domestic Tribunal. In the instant case the opinion arrived at by the Corporation was rightly accepted by the Tribunal but not by the Court. We therefore hold that the order of reinstatement passed by the Single Judge and the Division Bench of the High Court is contrary to the law on the basis of a catena of decisions of this Court. In such cases there is no place for generosity or sympathy on the part of the judicial forums for interfering with the quantum of punishment of removal which cannot be justified. Similarly the High Court can modify the punishment in exercise of its jurisdiction under Article 226 of the Constitution only when it finds that the punishment imposed is shockingly disproportionate to the charges proved. 24. Interfering therefore with the quantum of punishment of the respondent herein is not called for. In our opinion the respondent has no legal right to continue in the Corporation. As held by this Court in a catena of judgments that the loss of confidence occupies the primary factor and not the amount of money and that sympathy and generosity cannot be a factor which is permissible in law in such matters. When the employee is found guilty of theft there is nothing wrong in the Corporation losing confidence or faith in such an employee and awarding punishment of removal. In such cases there is no place of generosity or place of sympathy on the part of the judicial forums and interfering with the quantum of the punishment. 25. For the aforementioned reasons we hold that the orders passed by learned Single Judge and as modified and affirmed by the learned Judges of the Division Bench in Writ Appeal No. 108 of 2005 dated 29.06.2005 deserves to be set aside. Accordingly we do so. 26. In the result the appeal filed by the appellant Corporation stands allowed and order of removal passed by the Labour Court is confirmed. However there shall be no order as to costs. 0 0 